Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2077.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin POLLUTION CONTROL AGENCYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 157,580,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 163,566,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 9,122,000 new text end new text begin 9,072,000 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 90,000 new text end new text begin 90,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 119,906,000 new text end new text begin 125,675,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 21,962,000 new text end new text begin 22,229,000 new text end new text begin Closed Landfill Investment new text end new text begin 6,500,000 new text end new text begin 6,500,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin The commissioner must present the agency's biennial budget for fiscal years 2028 and 2029 to the legislature in a transparent way by agency division, including the proposed budget bill and presentations of the budget to committees and divisions with jurisdiction over the agency's budget. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Environmental Analysis and Outcomes new text end new text begin 23,077,000 new text end new text begin 25,027,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 283,000 new text end new text begin 296,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 22,575,000 new text end new text begin 24,511,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 219,000 new text end new text begin 220,000 new text end new text begin (a) $128,000 the first year and $131,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for a municipal liaison to assist municipalities with water quality standards and NPDES/SDS permitting processes, including enhanced economic analysis in the water quality standards rulemaking processes, identification of cost-effective permitting opportunities, simplifying the variance process, and coordinating with the Public Facilities Authority to identify and advocate for needed resources for municipalities to achieve permit requirements. new text end new text begin (b) $1,182,000 the first year and $1,191,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for an air-monitoring program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.454, including ambient air for hazardous pollutants, and for operating a mobile emissions regulatory monitoring trailer. new text end new text begin (c) $144,000 the first year and $148,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for monitoring water quality and operating assistance programs. new text end new text begin (d) $109,000 the first year and $109,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for duties related to harmful chemicals in children's products under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116.9401 to 116.9407. Of this amount, $70,000 the first year and $70,000 the second year are transferred to the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (e) $137,000 the first year and $139,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for registering wastewater laboratories. new text end new text begin (f) $1,527,000 the first year and $1,529,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to continue perfluorochemical biomonitoring in eastern metropolitan communities, as recommended by the Environmental Health Tracking and Biomonitoring Advisory Panel, and to address other environmental health risks, including air quality. The communities must include Hmong and other immigrant farming communities. Of this amount, up to $1,248,000 the first year and $1,248,000 the second year are for transfer to the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (g) $64,000 the first year and $65,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for the listing procedures for impaired waters required under this act. new text end new text begin (h) $79,000 the first year and $80,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for the leaking underground storage tank program to investigate, clean up, and prevent future releases from underground petroleum storage tanks and for the petroleum remediation program for vapor assessment and remediation. These same annual amounts are transferred from the petroleum tank fund to the remediation fund. new text end new text begin (i) $283,000 the first year and $296,000 the second year are from the general fund to support communities in planning to implement projects that will allow for adaptation for a changing climate. new text end new text begin (j) $2,139,000 the first year and $2,160,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to develop and implement a program related to emerging issues, including Minnesota's PFAS Blueprint. new text end new text begin (k) $1,893,000 the first year and $1,915,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to support improved management of data collected by the agency and its partners and regulated parties to facilitate decision-making and public access. new text end new text begin (l) $1,448,000 the second year is from the environmental fund to adopt rules and implement air toxics emissions requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.062. new text end new text begin (m) $904,000 the first year and $911,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for monitoring ambient air for hazardous air pollutants in Hennepin, Ramsey, Washington, and Olmsted Counties. new text end new text begin (n) $175,000 the first year and $175,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to address wastewater effluent limits and variances for backlogged permits. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Industrial new text end new text begin 24,144,000 new text end new text begin 27,443,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 782,000 new text end new text begin 789,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 21,376,000 new text end new text begin 24,641,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 1,986,000 new text end new text begin 2,013,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,876,000 the first year and $1,902,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for the leaking underground storage tank program to investigate, clean up, and prevent future releases from underground petroleum storage tanks and for the petroleum remediation program for vapor assessment and remediation. These same annual amounts are transferred from the petroleum tank fund to the remediation fund. new text end new text begin (b) $457,000 the first year and $457,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to further evaluate the use and reduction of trichloroethylene around Minnesota and identify its potential health effects on communities. Of this amount, $149,000 the first year and $149,000 the second year are for transfer to the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (c) $257,000 the first year and $264,000 the second year are from the general fund for implementation of the odor management requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.064. new text end new text begin (d) $148,000 the second year is from the environmental fund for the purposes of the public informational meeting requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivision 4m. new text end new text begin (e) $2,698,000 the first year and $2,718,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for prioritizing air regulatory program work in environmental justice areas. new text end new text begin (f) $2,539,000 the second year is from the environmental fund for implementing the environmental justice cumulative impact analysis and other requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.065. new text end new text begin (g) $730,000 the first year and $740,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to improve the coordination, effectiveness, transparency, and accountability of the environmental review and permitting process. new text end new text begin (h) $700,00 the first year and $700,000 the second year are to address backlogged permits. Of this amount, $525,000 the first year and $525,000 the second year are from the general fund and $175,000 the first year and $175,000 the second year are from the environmental fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Municipal new text end new text begin 11,271,000 new text end new text begin 11,410,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 90,000 new text end new text begin 90,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 11,181,000 new text end new text begin 11,320,000 new text end new text begin (a) $228,000 the first year and $233,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for a municipal liaison to assist municipalities with water quality standards and NPDES/SDS permitting processes, including enhanced economic analysis in the water quality standards rulemaking processes, identification of cost-effective permitting opportunities, simplifying the variance process, and coordinating with the Public Facilities Authority to identify and advocate for needed resources for municipalities to achieve permit requirements. new text end new text begin (b) $50,000 the first year and $50,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for transfer to the Office of Administrative Hearings to establish sanitary districts. new text end new text begin (c) $2,511,000 the first year and $2,535,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for subsurface sewage treatment system (SSTS) program administration; for community technical assistance and education, including grants and technical assistance to communities for water-quality protection, new technology review, and enforcement under Minnesota Statutes, sections 115.55 to 115.58; and to complete the requirements of Laws 2003, chapter 128, article 1, section 165. Of this amount, $350,000 each year is for assistance to counties through grants for SSTS program administration. A county receiving a grant from this appropriation must submit the results achieved with the grant to the commissioner as part of its annual SSTS report. Any unexpended balance in the first year does not cancel but is available in the second year. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, 2027, as grants or contracts for subsurface sewage treatment systems, surface water and groundwater assessments, storm water, and water-quality protection in this subdivision are available until June 30, 2030. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Operations new text end new text begin 15,584,000 new text end new text begin 15,650,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 4,219,000 new text end new text begin 4,115,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 8,733,000 new text end new text begin 8,870,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 2,632,000 new text end new text begin 2,665,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,187,000 the first year and $1,201,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for the leaking underground storage tank program to investigate, clean up, and prevent future releases from underground petroleum storage tanks and for the petroleum remediation program for vapor assessment and remediation. These same annual amounts are transferred from the petroleum tank fund to the remediation fund. new text end new text begin (b) $3,204,000 the first year and $3,300,000 the second year are from the general fund to support agency information technology services provided at the enterprise and agency level. new text end new text begin (c) $955,000 the first year and $965,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to develop and maintain systems to support permitting and regulatory business processes and agency data. new text end new text begin (d) $278,000 the first year and $280,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to support current and future career pathways for underrepresented students. new text end new text begin (e) $375,000 the first year and $380,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to support financial planning and analysis to assist with risk and compliance management across agency programs and financial systems. new text end new text begin (f) $538,000 the first year and $542,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for Operations Division legal services that support compliance programs. new text end new text begin (g) $815,000 the first year and $815,000 the second year are from the general fund for developing tools to improve permitting issuance processes. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (h) $200,000 the first year is from the general fund to expand outreach under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivision 13. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (i) The total general fund base for the Operations Division for fiscal year 2028 and later is $3,300,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 23,861,000 new text end new text begin 24,068,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 642,000 new text end new text begin 646,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 16,719,000 new text end new text begin 16,922,000 new text end new text begin Closed Landfill Investment new text end new text begin 6,500,000 new text end new text begin 6,500,000 new text end new text begin (a) All money for environmental response, compensation, and compliance in the remediation fund not otherwise appropriated is appropriated to the commissioners of the Pollution Control Agency and agriculture for purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 115B.20, subdivision 2, clauses (1), (2), (3), (6), and (7). At the beginning of each fiscal year, the two commissioners must jointly submit to the commissioner of management and budget an annual spending plan that maximizes resource use and appropriately allocates the money between the two departments. new text end new text begin (b) $4,965,000 the first year and $5,036,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for the leaking underground storage tank program to investigate, clean up, and prevent future releases from underground petroleum storage tanks and for the petroleum remediation program for vapor assessment and remediation. These same annual amounts are transferred from the petroleum tank fund to the remediation fund. new text end new text begin (c) $316,000 the first year and $316,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for transfer to the commissioner of health for private water-supply monitoring and health assessment costs in areas contaminated by unpermitted mixed municipal solid waste disposal facilities and drinking water advisories and public information activities for areas contaminated by hazardous releases. new text end new text begin (d) $350,000 the first year and $350,000 the second year are from the remediation fund to review and mitigate the impacts from the backlog of high-priority sites in the Superfund site assessment program. new text end new text begin (e) $6,500,000 the first year and $6,500,000 the second year are from the closed landfill investment fund for costs not otherwise covered with other resources under the landfill cleanup program in Minnesota Statutes, sections 115B.39 to 115B.444. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. The commissioner must report on all work plans and expenditures from this appropriation to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over environment policy and finance by February 15, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Resource Management and Assistance new text end new text begin 46,830,000 new text end new text begin 46,985,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 70,000 new text end new text begin 70,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 46,760,000 new text end new text begin 46,915,000 new text end new text begin (a) Up to $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year may be transferred from the environmental fund to the small business environmental improvement loan account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.993. new text end new text begin (b) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for competitive recycling grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.565. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (c) $694,000 the first year and $694,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for emission-reduction activities and grants to small businesses and other nonpoint-emission-reduction efforts. Of this amount, $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are to continue work with Clean Air Minnesota, and the commissioner may enter into an agreement with Environmental Initiative to support this effort. new text end new text begin (d) $18,450,000 the first year and $18,450,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for SCORE block grants to counties. new text end new text begin (e) $119,000 the first year and $119,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for environmental assistance grants or loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.0716. new text end new text begin (f) $400,000 the first year and $400,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for grants to develop and expand recycling markets for Minnesota businesses. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (g) $770,000 the first year and $770,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for reducing and diverting food waste, redirecting edible food for consumption, and removing barriers to collecting and recovering organic waste. Of this amount, $500,000 each year is for grants to increase food rescue and waste prevention. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (h) $2,829,000 the first year and $2,835,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 473.844. new text end new text begin (i) $479,000 the first year and $481,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to address chemicals in products, including to implement and enforce flame retardant provisions under Minnesota Statutes, section 325F.071, and perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in food packaging provisions under Minnesota Statutes, section 325F.075. Of this amount, $80,000 the first year and $80,000 the second year are transferred to the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (j) $650,000 the first year and $650,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for Minnesota GreenCorps investment. new text end new text begin (k) $1,143,000 the first year and $1,152,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for implementation of the PFAS requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.943. Of this amount, $468,000 the first year and $468,000 the second year are for transfer to the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (l) $175,000 the first year and $175,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to address land permitting activities. new text end new text begin (m) $215,000 the first year and $215,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to enhance existing work to reduce or eliminate mercury-containing skin-lightening products. The base is $195,000 in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text end new text begin (n) Any unencumbered grant and loan balances in the first year do not cancel but are available for grants and loans in the second year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, 2027, as contracts or grants for environmental assistance awarded under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.0716; technical and research assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.152; technical assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.52; and pollution prevention assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 115D.04, are available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Watershed new text end new text begin 11,268,000 new text end new text begin 11,401,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 2,459,000 new text end new text begin 2,459,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 8,403,000 new text end new text begin 8,533,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 406,000 new text end new text begin 409,000 new text end new text begin (a) $2,459,000 the first year and $2,459,000 the second year are from the general fund for grants to delegated counties to administer the county feedlot program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.0711, subdivisions 2 and 3. Money remaining after the first year is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (b) $137,000 the first year and $138,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for the leaking underground storage tank program to investigate, clean up, and prevent future releases from underground petroleum storage tanks and for the petroleum remediation program for vapor assessment and remediation. These same annual amounts are transferred from the petroleum tank fund to the remediation fund. new text end new text begin (c) Any unencumbered grant and loan balances in the first year do not cancel but are available for grants and loans in the second year. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Environmental Quality Board new text end new text begin 1,545,000 new text end new text begin 1,582,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 1,309,000 new text end new text begin 1,343,000 new text end new text begin Environmental new text end new text begin 236,000 new text end new text begin 239,000 new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Transfers new text end new text begin The commissioner must transfer up to $24,000,000 the first year and $24,000,000 the second year from the environmental fund to the remediation fund for purposes of the remediation fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.155, subdivision 2. For fiscal years 2028 through 2031, the commissioner of management and budget must include a transfer of $24,000,000 each year from the environmental fund to the remediation fund when preparing each forecast from the effective date of this section through the February 2027 forecast under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin NATURAL RESOURCESnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 396,596,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 397,706,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 130,981,000 new text end new text begin 131,435,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 133,926,000 new text end new text begin 134,324,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 130,852,000 new text end new text begin 131,098,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 117,000 new text end new text begin 117,000 new text end new text begin Permanent School new text end new text begin 720,000 new text end new text begin 732,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Land and Mineral Resources Management new text end new text begin 10,569,000 new text end new text begin 10,615,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 5,069,000 new text end new text begin 5,099,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 4,929,000 new text end new text begin 4,940,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 344,000 new text end new text begin 344,000 new text end new text begin Permanent School new text end new text begin 227,000 new text end new text begin 232,000 new text end new text begin (a) $319,000 the first year and $319,000 the second year are for environmental research relating to mine permitting, of which $200,000 each year is from the minerals management account in the natural resources fund and $119,000 each year is from the general fund. new text end new text begin (b) $3,639,000 the first year and $3,650,000 the second year are from the minerals management account in the natural resources fund for use as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 93.2236, paragraph (c), for mineral resource management, projects to enhance future mineral income, and projects to promote new mineral-resource opportunities. new text end new text begin (c) $227,000 the first year and $232,000 the second year are from the permanent school fund to secure maximum long-term economic return from the school trust lands consistent with fiduciary responsibilities and sound natural resources conservation and management principles. new text end new text begin (d) $573,000 the first year and $573,000 the second year are from the water management account in the natural resources fund for only the purposes specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.27, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (e) $160,000 the first year is from the general fund for completing the condemnation of certain land in Mille Lacs County authorized under Laws 2024, chapter 116, article 8, section 13. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Ecological and Water Resources new text end new text begin 46,772,000 new text end new text begin 48,202,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 22,470,000 new text end new text begin 22,732,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 18,478,000 new text end new text begin 19,646,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 5,824,000 new text end new text begin 5,824,000 new text end new text begin (a) $6,947,000 the first year and $6,952,000 the second year are from the invasive species account in the natural resources fund and $1,631,000 the first year and $1,631,000 the second year are from the general fund for management, public awareness, assessment and monitoring research, and water access inspection to prevent the spread of invasive species; management of invasive plants in public waters; and management of terrestrial invasive species on state-administered lands. new text end new text begin (b) $7,801,000 the first year and $8,791,000 the second year are from the water management account in the natural resources fund for only the purposes specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 103G.27, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) $124,000 the first year and $124,000 the second year are for a grant to the Mississippi Headwaters Board for up to 50 percent of the cost of implementing the comprehensive plan for the upper Mississippi within areas under the board's jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (d) $264,000 the first year and $264,000 the second year are for grants for up to 50 percent of the cost of implementing the Red River mediation agreement. new text end new text begin (e) $2,598,000 the first year and $2,598,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for only the purposes specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (1). new text end new text begin (f) $1,150,000 the first year and $1,150,000 the second year are from the nongame wildlife management account in the natural resources fund for nongame wildlife management. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 290.431, $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year may be used for nongame wildlife information, education, and promotion. new text end new text begin (g) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 84.943, $48,000 the first year and $48,000 the second year from the critical habitat private sector matching account may be used to publicize the critical habitat license plate match program. new text end new text begin (h) $4,555,000 the first year and $4,555,000 the second year are for the following activities: new text end new text begin (1) financial reimbursement and technical support to soil and water conservation districts or other local units of government for groundwater-level monitoring; new text end new text begin (2) surface water monitoring and analysis, including installing monitoring gauges; new text end new text begin (3) groundwater analysis to assist with water-appropriation permitting decisions; new text end new text begin (4) permit application review incorporating surface water and groundwater technical analysis; new text end new text begin (5) precipitation data and analysis to improve irrigation use; new text end new text begin (6) information technology, including electronic permitting and integrated data systems; and new text end new text begin (7) compliance and monitoring. new text end new text begin (i) $410,000 the first year and $410,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund, and $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the general fund are for the Minnesota Aquatic Invasive Species Research Center at the University of Minnesota to prioritize, support, and develop research-based solutions that can reduce the effects of aquatic invasive species in Minnesota by preventing spread, controlling populations, and managing ecosystems and to advance knowledge to inspire action by others. new text end new text begin (j) $129,000 the first year is from the general fund for providing research, policy review, and assisting the Sustainable Foraging Task Force. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Forest Management new text end new text begin 60,623,000 new text end new text begin 61,293,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 42,800,000 new text end new text begin 43,383,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 16,206,000 new text end new text begin 16,293,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 1,617,000 new text end new text begin 1,617,000 new text end new text begin (a) $7,521,000 the first year and $7,521,000 the second year are for prevention, presuppression, and suppression costs of emergency firefighting and other costs incurred under Minnesota Statutes, section 88.12. The amount necessary to pay for presuppression and suppression costs during the biennium is appropriated from the general fund. By January 15 each year, the commissioner of natural resources must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate committees and divisions having jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance that identifies all firefighting costs incurred and reimbursements received in the prior fiscal year. These appropriations may not be transferred. Any reimbursement of firefighting expenditures made to the commissioner from any source other than federal mobilizations must be deposited into the general fund. new text end new text begin (b) $15,706,000 the first year and $15,793,000 the second year are from the forest management investment account in the natural resources fund for only the purposes specified in Minnesota Statutes, section 89.039, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) $1,617,000 the first year and $1,617,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund to advance ecological classification systems (ECS), forest habitat, and invasive species management. new text end new text begin (d) $940,000 the first year and $947,000 the second year are for the Forest Resources Council to implement the Sustainable Forest Resources Act. new text end new text begin (e) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the forest management investment account in the natural resources fund for forest road maintenance on state forest roads. new text end new text begin (f) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are for forest road maintenance on county forest roads. new text end new text begin (g) $400,000 the first year and $400,000 the second year are for grants to local and Tribal governments and nonprofit organizations to enhance community forest ecosystem health and sustainability under Minnesota Statutes, section 88.82. The commissioner may use a reasonable amount of this appropriation for administering ReLeaf grants. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Parks and Trails Management new text end new text begin 115,352,000 new text end new text begin 113,212,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 37,076,000 new text end new text begin 36,474,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 75,976,000 new text end new text begin 74,438,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 2,300,000 new text end new text begin 2,300,000 new text end new text begin (a) $8,925,000 the first year and $9,238,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for state trail, park, and recreation area operations. This appropriation is from revenue deposited in the natural resources fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (2). new text end new text begin (b) $23,859,000 the first year and $23,615,000 the second year are from the state parks account in the natural resources fund to operate and maintain state parks and state recreation areas. new text end new text begin (c) $1,300,000 the first year and $1,300,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for park and trail grants to local units of government on land to be maintained for at least 20 years for parks or trails. Priority must be given for projects that are in underserved communities or that increase access to persons with disabilities. This appropriation is from revenue deposited in the natural resources fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (4). Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (d) $9,624,000 the first year and $9,624,000 the second year are from the snowmobile trails and enforcement account in the natural resources fund for the snowmobile grants-in-aid program. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (e) $2,610,000 the first year and $2,510,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for the off-highway vehicle grants-in-aid program. Of this amount, $2,060,000 the first year and $1,960,000 the second year are from the all-terrain vehicle account, $225,000 each year is from the off-highway motorcycle account, and $325,000 each year is from the off-road vehicle account. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (f) $2,750,000 the first year and $2,750,000 the second year are from the state land and water conservation account in the natural resources fund for priorities established by the commissioner for eligible state projects and administrative and planning activities consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 84.0264, and the federal Land and Water Conservation Fund Act. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (g) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are from the general fund for matching grants for local parks and outdoor recreation areas under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.019, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (h) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are from the general fund for matching grants for local trail connections under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.019, subdivision 4c. new text end new text begin (i) $600,000 the first year and $600,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for projects and activities that connect diverse and underserved Minnesotans through expanding cultural environmental experiences, exploration of their environment, and outdoor recreational activities. This appropriation is from revenue deposited in the natural resources fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (j). new text end new text begin (j) $400,000 the first year is from the general fund for a grant to the city of Silver Bay for construction of the Silver Bay Trailhead. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (k) $500,000 the first year is from the general fund for a grant to the city of Chisholm for trail development, maintenance, and related amenities at Redhead Mountain Bike Park. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (l) $752,000 the first year is from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund for a grant to St. Louis County for all-terrain vehicle trail projects. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. The grant is for the following projects: new text end new text begin (1) $75,000 for the Alborn Dirt Devils Club to engineer, permit, and acquire right-of-way for the County Road 166 to Ostman Road ATV trail project; new text end new text begin (2) $480,000 for the Ranger Snowmobile/ATV Club to engineer and construct the Seven Beavers ATV trail project; new text end new text begin (3) $100,000 for the Twig Area Trail Riders ATV Club to permit, design, engineer, and acquire right-of-way for the Lumberjack to Brookston ATV trail; and new text end new text begin (4) $97,000 for the Quad Cities ATV Club to engineer, survey, test, design, and construct the club trailhead project. new text end new text begin (m) $200,000 the first year is from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund for a grant to the city of Duluth and Head of the Lakes ATV Riders for a Duluth area all-terrain vehicle route study to establish connectivity to and through the western part of the city of Duluth. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (n) $380,000 the first year is from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund for a grant to St. Louis County for design, right-of-way acquisition, permitting, and construction of trails within the Voyageur Country ATV trail system. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin (o) $175,000 the first year is from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund for a grant to St. Louis County for design, right-of-way acquisition, permitting, and construction of trails and a new trail bridge within the Prospectors Loop trail system. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Fish and Wildlife Management new text end new text begin 97,566,000 new text end new text begin 98,019,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 9,120,000 new text end new text begin 9,185,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 2,182,000 new text end new text begin 2,424,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 86,264,000 new text end new text begin 86,410,000 new text end new text begin (a) $12,125,000 the first year and $12,097,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund only for activities specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (1). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, five percent of this appropriation may be used for expanding hunter and angler recruitment and retention. new text end new text begin (b) $8,546,000 the first year and $8,546,000 the second year are from the deer management account in the game and fish fund for the purposes identified in Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.075, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for grants for natural-resource-based education and recreation programs serving youth under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.976. The commissioner may use a reasonable amount of this appropriation for administering grants authorized under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.976. Priority must be given to projects benefiting underserved communities. new text end new text begin (d) Up to $2,225,000 the first year and up to $2,225,000 the second year are available for transfer from the critical habitat private sector matching account to the reinvest in Minnesota fund for wildlife management areas acquisition, restoration, and enhancement according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.943, subdivision 5, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (e) $3,032,000 the first year and $3,032,000 the second year are from the general fund and $1,675,000 the first year and $1,675,000 the second year are from the game and fish fund for statewide response and management of chronic wasting disease. Of this amount, up to $2,750,000 each year from the general fund is for inspections, investigations, and enforcement activities taken for the white-tailed deer farm program. new text end new text begin (f) $500,000 the first year and $348,000 the second year are from the general fund for the Outdoor School for All program under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.9766. new text end new text begin (g) $225,000 the first year is from the general fund to expand outreach under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.027, subdivision 21. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (h) $177,000 the first year is from the game and fish fund for a study of muskellunge movement and survival in Leech Lake. The study must be conducted in collaboration with Bemidji State University. By October 1, 2028, the commissioner of natural resources must submit a report on the results of the study to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house and senate committees and divisions having jurisdiction over environment and natural resources. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Enforcement new text end new text begin 63,890,000 new text end new text begin 64,534,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 14,225,000 new text end new text begin 14,341,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 15,045,000 new text end new text begin 15,473,000 new text end new text begin Game and Fish new text end new text begin 34,503,000 new text end new text begin 34,603,000 new text end new text begin Remediation new text end new text begin 117,000 new text end new text begin 117,000 new text end new text begin (a) $1,718,000 the first year and $1,718,000 the second year are from the general fund for enforcement efforts to prevent the spread of aquatic invasive species. new text end new text begin (b) $2,980,000 the first year and $2,980,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for only the purposes specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (1). new text end new text begin (c) $1,442,000 the first year and $1,442,000 the second year are from the water recreation account in the natural resources fund for grants to counties for boat and water safety. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (d) $315,000 the first year and $315,000 the second year are from the snowmobile trails and enforcement account in the natural resources fund for grants to local law enforcement agencies for snowmobile enforcement activities. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (e) $250,000 the first year and $250,000 the second year are from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund for grants to qualifying organizations to assist in safety and environmental education and monitoring trails on public lands under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.9011. Grants issued under this paragraph must be issued through a formal agreement with the organization. By December 15 each year, an organization receiving a grant under this paragraph must report to the commissioner with details on expenditures and outcomes from the grant. Of this appropriation, $25,000 each year is for administering these grants. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (f) $510,000 the first year and $510,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for grants to county law enforcement agencies for off-highway vehicle enforcement and public education activities based on off-highway vehicle use in the county. Of this amount, $498,000 each year is from the all-terrain vehicle account, $11,000 each year is from the off-highway motorcycle account, and $1,000 each year is from the off-road vehicle account. The county enforcement agencies may use money received under this appropriation to make grants to other local enforcement agencies within the county that have a high concentration of off-highway vehicle use. Of this appropriation, $25,000 each year is for administering the grants. Any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of the first year and is available for the second year. new text end new text begin (g) $262,000 the first year and $262,000 the second year are from the water recreation account in the natural resources fund for investigating, notification, and removal of abandoned watercraft on or adjacent to public waters and public land. new text end new text begin (h) $20,000 the first year and ....... the second year are from the off-highway motorcycle account in the natural resources fund for grants to qualifying off-highway motorcycle organizations to assist in providing safety and environmental education and monitoring trails on public lands according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.9011. Grants awarded under this paragraph must be issued through a formal agreement with the organization. By December 15 each year, an organization receiving a grant under this paragraph must report to the commissioner with details on how the money was expended and what outcomes were achieved. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Pass Through Funds new text end new text begin 1,824,000 new text end new text begin 1,831,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 221,000 new text end new text begin 221,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 1,110,000 new text end new text begin 1,110,000 new text end new text begin Permanent School new text end new text begin 493,000 new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin (a) $510,000 the first year and $510,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for grants to be divided equally between the city of St. Paul for the Como Park Zoo and Conservatory and the city of Duluth for the Lake Superior Zoo. This appropriation is from revenue deposited to the natural resources fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (5). new text end new text begin (b) $221,000 the first year and $221,000 the second year are from the general fund for the Office of School Trust Lands. new text end new text begin (c) $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year are from the permanent school fund for transaction and project management costs for divesting of school trust lands within Boundary Waters Canoe Area Wilderness. new text end new text begin (d) $343,000 the first year and $350,000 the second year are from the permanent school fund for the Office of School Trust Lands. new text end new text begin (e) $600,000 the first year and $600,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for parks and trails of regional significance outside the seven-county metropolitan area under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.535, based on the recommendations from the Greater Minnesota Regional Parks and Trails Commission. This appropriation is from revenue deposited in the natural resources fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (i). new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Transfers new text end new text begin $720,000 the first year and $732,000 the second year are transferred from the forest suspense account to the permanent school fund. For fiscal years 2028 through 2031, the commissioner of management and budget must include a transfer of $732,000 each year from the forest suspense account to the permanent school fund when preparing each forecast from the effective date of this section through the February 2027 forecast under Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.103. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Extensions new text end new text begin The appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 3, subdivision 5, paragraph (p), for a boat launch on the Mississippi River is extended to June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin BOARD OF WATER AND SOIL RESOURCESnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 15,945,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 16,102,000 new text end new text begin (a) $3,116,000 the first year and $3,116,000 the second year are for grants and payments to soil and water conservation districts for accomplishing the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 103C, and for other general purposes, nonpoint engineering, and implementation and stewardship of the reinvest in Minnesota reserve program. Expenditures may be made from this appropriation for supplies and services benefiting soil and water conservation districts. Any district receiving a payment under this paragraph must maintain a website that publishes, at a minimum, the district's annual report, annual audit, annual budget, and meeting notices. new text end new text begin (b) $1,560,000 the first year and $1,560,000 the second year are for the following: new text end new text begin (1) $1,460,000 the first year and $1,460,000 the second year are for cost-sharing programs of soil and water conservation districts for accomplishing projects and practices consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 103C.501, including perennially vegetated riparian buffers, erosion control, water retention and treatment, water quality cost-sharing for feedlots and nutrient and manure management projects in watersheds where there are impaired waters, and other high-priority conservation practices; and new text end new text begin (2) $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are for invasive species and weed management programs and to restore native plants at selected invasive species management sites. new text end new text begin (c) $166,000 the first year and $166,000 the second year are to provide technical assistance to local drainage management officials and for the costs of the Drainage Work Group. The board must coordinate the activities of the Drainage Work Group according to Minnesota Statutes, section 103B.101, subdivision 13. new text end new text begin (d) $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are for a grant to the Red River Basin Commission for water quality and floodplain management, including program administration. This appropriation must be matched by nonstate funds. new text end new text begin (e) $140,000 the first year and $140,000 the second year are for grants to Area II Minnesota River Basin Projects for floodplain management. new text end new text begin (f) $240,000 the first year and $240,000 the second year are for a grant to the Lower Minnesota River Watershed District to defray the annual cost of sustaining the state, national, and international commercial and recreational navigation on the lower Minnesota River. new text end new text begin (g) $203,000 the first year and $203,000 the second year are for soil health programming consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 103F.06, and for coordination with the University of Minnesota Office for Soil Health. new text end new text begin (h) $3,423,000 the first year and $3,423,000 the second year are for natural resources block grants to local governments to implement the Wetland Conservation Act and shoreland management program under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 103F, and local water management responsibilities under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 103B. The board may reduce the amount of the natural resources block grant to a county by an amount equal to any reduction in the county's general services allocation to a soil and water conservation district from the county's previous year allocation when the board determines that the reduction was disproportionate. new text end new text begin (i) $6,997,000 the first year and $7,154,000 the second year are for agency administration and operation of the Board of Water and Soil Resources. new text end new text begin (j) The board may shift funds in this section and may adjust the technical and administrative assistance portion of the funds to leverage federal or other nonstate funds or to address accountability, oversight, local government performance, or high-priority needs. new text end new text begin (k) The appropriations for grants and payments in this section are available until June 30, 2029, except returned grants and payments are available for two years after they are returned or regranted, whichever is later. Funds must be used consistent with the purposes of this section. If an appropriation for grants in either year is insufficient, the appropriation in the other year is available for it. new text end new text begin (l) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.97, grants awarded from appropriations in this section are exempt from the Department of Administration, Office of Grants Management Policy 08-08 Grant Payments and 08-10 Grant Monitoring. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin METROPOLITAN COUNCILnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 11,740,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 11,740,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 2,540,000 new text end new text begin 2,540,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 9,200,000 new text end new text begin 9,200,000 new text end new text begin (a) $2,540,000 the first year and $2,540,000 the second year are for metropolitan-area regional parks operation and maintenance according to Minnesota Statutes, section 473.351. new text end new text begin (b) $9,200,000 the first year and $9,200,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund for metropolitan-area regional parks and trails maintenance and operations. This appropriation is from revenue deposited in the natural resources fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (3). new text end Sec. 6. new text begin CONSERVATION CORPS MINNESOTA AND IOWAnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,070,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,070,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 580,000 new text end new text begin 580,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 490,000 new text end new text begin 490,000 new text end new text begin Conservation Corps Minnesota and Iowa may receive money appropriated from the natural resources fund under this section only as provided in an agreement with the commissioner of natural resources. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin ZOOLOGICAL BOARDnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,180,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 14,532,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 13,925,000 new text end new text begin 14,277,000 new text end new text begin Natural Resources new text end new text begin 255,000 new text end new text begin 255,000 new text end new text begin $255,000 the first year and $255,000 the second year are from the natural resources fund from revenue deposited under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (5). new text end Sec. 8. new text begin SCIENCE MUSEUMnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,260,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,260,000 new text end Sec. 9. new text begin LEGISLATIVE COORDINATING COMMISSIONnew text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 198,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin $198,000 the first year is for the administrative costs of the Sustainable Foraging Task Force. This is a onetime appropriation new text end Sec. 10. Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 2, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Transfers (a) The commissioner must transfer up to $24,000,000 the first year and $24,000,000 the second year from the environmental fund to the remediation fund for purposes of the remediation fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.155, subdivision 2. The base for this transfer is $24,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and beyond. (b) By June 30, 2024, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer $27,397,000 from the general fund to the metropolitan landfill contingency action trust account in the remediation fund to restore the money transferred from the account as intended under Laws 2003, chapter 128, article 1, section 10, paragraph (e), and Laws 2005, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 17, and to compensate the account for the estimated lost investment income. deleted text begin (c) Beginning in fiscal year 2024, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer $100,000 each year from the general fund to the metropolitan landfill contingency action trust account in the remediation fund to restore the money transferred from the account as intended under Laws 2003, chapter 128, article 1, section 10, paragraph (e), and Laws 2005, First Special Session chapter 1, article 3, section 17. deleted text end Sec. 11. new text begin CANCELLATION.new text end new text begin $3,915,000 of the unencumbered balance of the general fund appropriation from Laws 2022, chapter 95, article 3, section 6, paragraph (b), cancels no later than June 30, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 2 ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are appropriated to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the environment and natural resources trust fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. Any unencumbered balance remaining in the first year does not cancel and is available for the second year or until the end of the appropriation. These are onetime appropriations. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MINNESOTA RESOURCESnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 103,326,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 0 new text end new text begin This appropriation is from the environment and natural resources trust fund. The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definition new text end new text begin "Trust fund" means the Minnesota environment and natural resources trust fund established under the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Foundational Natural Resource Data and Information new text end new text begin 22,084,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Fond du Lac Deer Study - Phase 1 new text end new text begin $1,441,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities for Bemidji State University to collect baseline deer demographic, movement, and habitat-use data before elk restoration to better inform management of both elk and deer populations on the Fond du Lac Reservation and surrounding areas. new text end new text begin (b) Are All Walleye Created Equal? Probably Not. new text end new text begin $298,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to investigate Minnesota walleye strain physiology and disease responses to warming water and to build a tool to guide adaptive management of walleye in a warming climate. new text end new text begin (c) Deer Survival Within Minnesota's Densest Wolf Population new text end new text begin $809,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to evaluate how wolves, winter severity, and habitat affect deer mortality and survival across space and time within the Voyageurs region. new text end new text begin (d) Evaluating Anticoagulant Rodenticide Exposure in Minnesota's Carnivores new text end new text begin $247,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute in Duluth to determine anticoagulant rodenticide exposure rates and concentrations in Minnesota bobcats and fishers, factors influencing exposure risk, and negative effects of rodenticide exposure on carnivore health. new text end new text begin (e) Digitizing the Science Museum of Minnesota's Mollusk Specimens new text end new text begin $386,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Science Museum of Minnesota to make the museum's Minnesota mollusk specimen collection available for research and education by identifying and organizing all relevant specimens and digitizing the museum's data. new text end new text begin (f) Integrating Wildlife Objectives in Long-Term Forest Management Planning new text end new text begin $316,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop a harvest-scheduling model that integrates wildlife habitat metrics with timber production objectives in the forest-planning process for more sustainable forest landscape-level outcomes. new text end new text begin (g) Surveying Minnesota's Secretive Marsh Birds new text end new text begin $413,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the National Audubon Society, Upper Mississippi River office, to conduct a breeding marsh bird survey and provide state and federal agencies with an assessment of marsh bird population status and wetland habitat. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (h) Improving Conservation Outcomes for Imperiled Wood Turtles new text end new text begin $242,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Minnesota Zoological Society to restore imperiled wood turtles by increasing remnant populations, quantifying effectiveness of habitat management strategies, establishing baseline information on disease prevalence, and creating a new decision-support tool for prioritizing future conservation actions. new text end new text begin (i) Maximizing the Impact of Wildlife Movement Data new text end new text begin $216,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to create a centralized and accessible database of wildlife movement data from prior trust fund-supported studies and demonstrate tools biologists can use to analyze these data to benefit Minnesota wildlife. new text end new text begin (j) Expanding the Statewide Motus Wildlife Tracking Network new text end new text begin $234,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Minnesota Zoological Society to expand the statewide Motus Wildlife Tracking System network into southwestern Minnesota and the North Shore to guide the conservation of imperiled grassland and boreal migratory birds and other wildlife. This appropriation may also be used to develop outreach and interpretive materials for Motus sites. new text end new text begin (k) Updating and Sharing Information on Minnesota's Tick Biodiversity new text end new text begin $186,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to collaborate with wildlife organizations and community scientists to survey the biodiversity and distribution of ticks in Minnesota and create a publicly accessible GIS dashboard to share results and potential disease implications with the public and wildlife managers. new text end new text begin (l) Small Mammals and Hunter Participation: Expanded Offal Wildlife Watching new text end new text begin $563,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to expand and assess hunter participation in monitoring scavenger use of deer gut piles, assess small mammal occurrence and contaminant and disease exposure risk at offal sites, and study how messaging impacts hunters' use of lead ammunition. new text end new text begin (m) Green Heron as an Indicator of Wetland-Dependent Species new text end new text begin $424,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to collect data on the year-round habitat use and migratory movements of green herons, assess potential factors leading to population decline, and identify conservation strategies to benefit the green heron and other wetland-dependent bird species. new text end new text begin (n) Visualizing Minnesota's Natural Resources with CT Scanning new text end new text begin $955,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, Bell Museum of Natural History, to acquire a CT scanner, scan Bell Museum organismal specimens, create 3D prints from the scans, and share the data and prints through environmental education and research programs. The CT scanner purchased with this appropriation must prioritize use by and be made available cost-free to other Minnesota-focused researchers for the duration of this appropriation. This appropriation may also be used for equipment, tools, and supplies needed to acquire, install, and use the scanner and print 3D models of scanned organisms. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. new text end new text begin (o) Mapping Human-Carnivore Conflicts in Human-Dominated Landscapes new text end new text begin $563,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute in Duluth to evaluate bear, bobcat, and coyote habitat use, activity, and diet in Duluth and surrounding areas to map hotspots for human-carnivore conflicts and fill knowledge gaps to reduce conflicts. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (p) Geologic Atlases for Water Resource Management new text end new text begin $1,260,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, Minnesota Geological Survey, to continue to produce geologic atlas maps and databases to inform management of groundwater and surface water. This appropriation is to complete Part A, which focuses on the properties and distribution of earth materials to define aquifer boundaries and the connection of aquifers to the land surface and surface water resources. new text end new text begin (q) Leveraging Statewide Datasets for Native Rough Fish new text end new text begin $250,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to construct species distribution models that predict presence and abundance of native rough fish species and identify potential areas for protection, additional monitoring, or restoration across the state. This appropriation may also be used to build an interactive mapping tool and share results. new text end new text begin (r) The Impacts of Climate Change on Northeastern Minnesota new text end new text begin $772,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Friends of the Boundary Waters Wilderness to work with collaborators to aggregate research, data, and other information about the impacts of climate change on the habitat and wildlife of northeastern Minnesota into a publicly available, web-based database. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (s) Health and Disease Monitoring in Minnesota Wildlife new text end new text begin $750,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, Minnesota Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory, to collaborate with wildlife rehabilitation organizations and other wildlife health professionals throughout Minnesota to enhance the state's health and disease surveillance, preparedness, and response efforts. new text end new text begin (t) Affordable Statewide Tracking of Forestry Fragmentation and Degradation new text end new text begin $331,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to merge aircraft and satellite LiDAR data to build a model and an interactive real-time web dashboard of forest boundaries that provides business-ready information about statewide forest fragmentation and degradation due to human activities and natural disasters. new text end new text begin (u) Safeguarding Bees While Monitoring Pollinators and Nesting Habitats new text end new text begin $590,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to pioneer low-mortality methods for monitoring bee populations and to investigate nest habitat materials and antimicrobial properties in cooperation with community scientists and management agencies. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (v) Expanding the Application of Minnesota's Wetland Monitoring Data new text end new text begin $312,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to use existing LiDAR and recurring aerial photographs to determine state grassland acreage and change over the last twenty years, evaluate key drivers of wetland change, and use technology to improve Minnesota's wetland monitoring. new text end new text begin (w) Enhancing the Value of Minnesota Public Grasslands new text end new text begin $390,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to evaluate a combination of prescribed fire, brush mowing, and targeted conservation grazing to develop ready-to-use management strategies for public land managers to mitigate woody species encroachment and increase biodiversity and carbon sequestration in public grasslands. new text end new text begin (x) Foundational Precision Agriculture Data to Reduce Environmental Impacts new text end new text begin $1,255,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the West Central Research and Outreach Center at Morris to establish data collection systems and methods at sentinel farm sites, develop and evaluate best management practices, and provide outreach and training to farmers to encourage adoption of precision agriculture technologies that reduce fertilizer and chemical use and improve water and air quality. new text end new text begin (y) Continued Aggregate Resource Mapping new text end new text begin $621,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to map the aggregate resource potential in the state of Minnesota and to make the information available in print and electronic format to local units of government to support informed land-use decisions and resource conservation. new text end new text begin (z) Advancing Collaborative Wild Rice Monitoring Program Technologies new text end new text begin $900,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to continue efforts to create a framework for long-term wild rice monitoring for conservation and collaborate with Tribal and nongovernmental organizations to collect additional data, improve collection and analysis methods, and develop a statewide estimate of wild rice abundance and coverage. new text end new text begin (aa) Conserving Natural Resources by Advancing Forever Green Agriculture new text end new text begin $2,146,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Forever Green Initiative to fund research projects to develop new perennial and winter-annual crops to protect water, wildlife, soil, other natural resources, and the climate. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2030, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (bb) Minnesota's Priority Native Rough Fish: Gars and Bowfin new text end new text begin $568,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop population dynamics, habitat use, and food web models for Minnesota gars and bowfins and conduct outreach to inform conservation and management and serve as a template for study of Minnesota's other native rough fish species. new text end new text begin (cc) Understanding to Improve Minnesota's Future Lake Water Quality new text end new text begin $595,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to use decade-long comprehensive lake, watershed, and weather data and high-resolution climate models to understand lake-specific drivers of water quality and predict the effects of future warming on harmful algal blooms across Minnesota. new text end new text begin (dd) Operationalizing State Zooplankton Data to Support Lake Health new text end new text begin $423,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to use long-term monitoring data to determine the relationship between zooplankton communities and ecosystem services, like fisheries health and water quality, and develop biotic indices for lake health. new text end new text begin (ee) Trialing Climate-Ready Woodland Trees in Urban Areas new text end new text begin $255,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to demonstrate performance of climate-adaptive tree species and study land manager and public perceptions of these species to identify the best species and risk tolerance for future plantings in metropolitan areas of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (ff) Superior Shores: Protecting Our Great Lakes Coastal Habitats new text end new text begin $675,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Science Museum of Minnesota for the St. Croix Watershed Research Station to map the locations and survey the biological diversity and water quality of Lake Superior coastal rock pools. This appropriation may also be used to develop outreach materials and host programs on rock pool understanding and conservation. new text end new text begin (gg) Recruitment and Fecundity of Minnesota Moose new text end new text begin $2,007,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for state and Tribal biologists to work collaboratively to estimate survival and fecundity of yearling and 2-year-old moose in northeast Minnesota to inform future management efforts. Of this amount, $841,000 is for an agreement with the 1854 Treaty Authority. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (hh) Fighting Insect Decline: Minnesota Bumblebees to the Rescue new text end new text begin $249,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to map historical and current bumblebee distribution and develop an identification tool using molecular barcodes and an online resource hub to improve conservation of Minnesota's native bumblebees. new text end new text begin (ii) Trace Metals in Municipal Yard Waste and Compost new text end new text begin $120,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to assess trace metal contamination from collected residential yard waste, finished compost, and compost leachate in municipal yard waste recycling programs. new text end new text begin (jj) Chronic Wasting Disease Prions in Minnesota Waters new text end new text begin $322,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to evaluate the movement of chronic wasting disease in Minnesota waters, assess the risk of spread, and share results with wildlife and watershed managers. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Water Resources new text end new text begin 11,812,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Enhancing Our Resources - Rural Health and Drinking Water new text end new text begin $994,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Freshwater Society to partner with the Mayo Clinic to educate well owners and family health providers about the geologic occurrence and risk of arsenic in drinking water. This appropriation is also to provide free arsenic testing to well owners in southeast Minnesota. new text end new text begin (b) Restoration and Outreach for Minnesota's Native Mussels new text end new text begin $1,258,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to propagate, rear, and restore native freshwater mussel populations and the ecosystem services they provide to Minnesota waters; to evaluate reintroduction success; and to inform the public on mussels and mussel conservation. new text end new text begin (c) Pristine to Green: Toxic Blooms Threaten Northern Lakes new text end new text begin $1,362,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Science Museum of Minnesota for the St. Croix Watershed Research Station to evaluate drivers that contribute to the formation of nuisance and toxic algal blooms in relatively pristine and protected lakes across Minnesota. new text end new text begin (d) Training Lake Communities to Track Chloride and Algae new text end new text begin $274,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Minnesota Sea Grant college program in Duluth to develop and train a network of community-based volunteers to track chloride and harmful algal blooms in rural Minnesota lakes. new text end new text begin (e) Clean Sweep Solution to Nonpoint Source Pollution new text end new text begin $386,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Water Resources Center to enhance Clean Sweep programs, identify the pollutants present in street-sweeping materials, explore material reuse options, and quantify benefits of enhanced street sweeping. This appropriation may also be used to coordinate county and regional collaborations, develop resources, and provide training to increase targeted street-sweeping practices to reduce nonpoint source pollution to Minnesota's water resources. new text end new text begin (f) Cyanotoxins in Minnesota Lakes: The Role of Sunlight new text end new text begin $220,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to quantify degradation of cyanobacterial toxins by sunlight to understand how increasing frequency of harmful algal blooms and changing environmental conditions influence toxin persistence in natural waters. new text end new text begin (g) Enhancing Degradation of Emerging Contaminants via Microbial Starvation new text end new text begin $390,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to study how wastewater treatment systems can be improved to more effectively biodegrade mixtures of pharmaceuticals, pesticides, and other contaminants of emerging concern and protect Minnesota's water resources. new text end new text begin (h) Soil Health Management for Water Storage new text end new text begin $454,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Water Resources Center to conduct on-farm and model-based research and develop guidance for watershed planners and land managers to effectively use soil health management to achieve water storage and water quality goals. new text end new text begin (i) Predicting Contaminant Movement in Minnesota's Fractured Aquifers new text end new text begin $650,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, St. Anthony Falls Laboratory, to develop a software program that predicts the fate and movement of contaminants, such as PFAS, chloride, nitrate, and pathogens, in Minnesota's fractured aquifers. new text end new text begin (j) Documentation and Toxicity of Microplastics in Urban Ecosystems new text end new text begin $300,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to research how land use and toxicity affect the accumulation of microplastics and associated contaminants of concern in stormwater ponds and the wildlife that use stormwater ponds. new text end new text begin (k) Terminating PFAS-Type Pesticides via Enzyme Cocktails new text end new text begin $297,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to evaluate the ability of selected enzymes and combinations of enzymes to biodegrade per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) found in pesticides and to design a pilot-scale biofilter for effective elimination of PFAS from water. new text end new text begin (l) Addressing 21st Century Challenges for the St. Croix new text end new text begin $243,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Science Museum of Minnesota for the St. Croix Watershed Research Station to develop a watershed model to identify potential hydrologic and water quality impacts to the lower St. Croix River over the next 75 years and inform future planning and management in the watershed. new text end new text begin (m) Impact of Statewide Conservation Practices on Stream Biodiversity new text end new text begin $300,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to use existing monitoring data to evaluate the effects of wetlands and riparian buffers on stream and river biodiversity and biological condition and develop tools and materials to inform the public and natural resource managers. new text end new text begin (n) Modeling the Future Mississippi River Gorge new text end new text begin $427,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, St. Anthony Falls Laboratory, to construct a reduced-scale physical model of Mississippi River Pool 1, Lock & Dam 1, and adjacent upstream and downstream reaches; analyze water flow and sediment movement under various pool management strategies; and share results with the public to inform decisions on the future management of the lock and dam. new text end new text begin (o) Highly Efficient Nutrient Removal Technology for Agricultural Drainage new text end new text begin $453,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to conduct lab- and field-scale tests of a novel bioreactor technology for removing nutrients from agricultural drainage and disseminate results to farmers and the public. new text end new text begin (p) Citizen Scientists Capture Microplastic Pollution Around State new text end new text begin $419,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop adaptable microplastic sampling and detection methods, develop a public-access database, and leverage citizen scientists to survey microplastic pollution throughout the state to allow for data-driven risk management decisions and solutions. new text end new text begin (q) Healthy Native Prairie Microbiomes for Cleaner Water new text end new text begin $468,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to identify and characterize prairie plant microbiomes and study the potential of native prairie microbes to provide nitrogen for agricultural crops and reduce industrial fertilizer use and nitrate contamination of water. new text end new text begin (r) Wastewater Chloride Reduction through Industrial Source Reduction Assistance new text end new text begin $247,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Minnesota Technical Assistance Program to provide technical assistance to businesses to cost-effectively reduce industrial and commercial chloride use in communities with high chloride effluent concentrations. new text end new text begin (s) Pilot Water Budget Framework for Managing Water Withdrawals new text end new text begin $198,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop a pilot water budget framework to identify sensitive areas in Minnesota where net water withdrawals have a significant impact on surface water and groundwater. new text end new text begin (t) Biofilm Mediated Destruction of PFAS in Groundwater new text end new text begin $1,336,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Freshwater Society to develop biofilm treatment technology and demonstrate field-scale removal of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) from contaminated groundwater. A fiscal management plan must be approved in the work plan before any trust fund money is spent. new text end new text begin (u) Impact of Microplastics on Wastewater Treatment in Minnesota new text end new text begin $506,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to quantify the abundance of microplastics in wastewater treatment plants in Minnesota, determine how microplastics affect wastewater treatment plant performance, and evaluate how different wastewater treatment processes alter microplastics. new text end new text begin (v) Portable Arsenic and Nitrate Detector for Well Water new text end new text begin $358,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop a small, cheap, and easy-to-use system to detect arsenic and nitrate in well water and determine whether well water is safe to drink. new text end new text begin (w) Recovering Salts from Highly Saline Wastewater new text end new text begin $272,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop a method to recover useful salts from concentrated saline wastewater to increase the economic sustainability of high water-recovery softening, sulfate removal, and industrial wastewater treatment. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Environmental Education new text end new text begin 11,965,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Eagle's Nest: Where the World Becomes Your Classroom new text end new text begin $130,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Glacial Hills Elementary School to create interactive natural playground and landscaping features for children and provide environmental education programming outside of regular school hours. new text end new text begin (b) Advancing Equity in Environmental Education new text end new text begin $700,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Camp Fire Minnesota to provide needs-based scholarships for Minnesota youth to attend state-standards-aligned environmental and outdoor education programs. new text end new text begin (c) Teacher Field School - Phase 2: Increasing Impact new text end new text begin $712,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Hamline University to continue the teacher field school program that trains teachers how to connect academic content with environmental stewardship, natural resource conservation, and outdoor recreation. This appropriation is also to pilot a train-the-trainer model for nature-based education practices. new text end new text begin (d) Creating Future Leaders in Outdoor and Environmental Leadership new text end new text begin $330,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities for North Hennepin Community College to collaborate with K-12 education, higher education, and outdoor organizations to increase environmental education, leadership, internship, and career opportunities for underrepresented college and high school students. new text end new text begin (e) Engaging our Diverse Public in Environmental Stewardship - Phase 2 new text end new text begin $249,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Great River Greening to increase participation in natural resources conservation and restoration efforts and careers through volunteer, internship, and youth engagement activities, with a focus on diverse audiences that more accurately reflect local demographic and socioeconomic conditions in Minnesota. new text end new text begin (f) Outdoor School for Minnesota K-12 Students new text end new text begin $3,992,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Osprey Wilds Environmental Learning Center to partner with four other accredited residential environmental learning centers in Minnesota to provide needs-based scholarships to K-12 students statewide for immersive multiday environmental learning experiences. new text end new text begin (g) Statewide Environmental Education via PBS Outdoor Series new text end new text begin $415,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Pioneer Public Broadcasting Service to produce, distribute, and promote new episodes of a statewide public television series that inspires Minnesotans to connect with the outdoors and to restore and protect the state's natural resources. new text end new text begin (h) Maajii-akii-gikenjigewin Conservation Crew Program new text end new text begin $678,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Conservation Corps Minnesota & Iowa to expand a conservation corps program developed to provide natural resources career development opportunities for indigenous young adults and cultivate an enduring action-based conservation ethic through the integration of traditional knowledge, nature immersion, and the implementation of conservation and restoration practices in the field. new text end new text begin (i) Reuse for the Future: Youth Education and Engagement new text end new text begin $225,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Reuse Minnesota to provide curriculum-based opportunities for students to learn about the reuse economy, reuse skills, and other opportunities to reduce waste. This appropriation may also be used to align materials to state standards and translate materials to additional languages. new text end new text begin (j) River Bend Nature Center Outdoor Diversity Initiative new text end new text begin $247,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with River Bend Nature Center to lead a coalition of educational partners and culturally specific organizations to expand recognized environmental education curriculum and provide conservation-based career exploration and job placement opportunities for diverse communities in southern Minnesota. new text end new text begin (k) Camp Parsons Mississippi Summer new text end new text begin $225,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Phyllis Wheatley Community Center to provide environmental education to Minneapolis urban youth through the Camp Parsons Mississippi Summer program that fosters connections to nature and encourages responsible stewardship of our natural resources. new text end new text begin (l) Adult Outdoor Education for Minnesota's Underrepresented Communities new text end new text begin $247,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Baztec Fishing & Outdoors to create fishing and hunting education, training, and opportunities for underserved and underrepresented communities in Minnesota. All fishing tackle purchased with this appropriation must be lead-free. A fiscal management plan must be approved in the work plan before any trust fund money is spent. new text end new text begin (m) Minnesota's Road Map for Sustainability and Climate Education new text end new text begin $491,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Climate Generation to convene community gatherings and partner with institutions and organizations across the education sector to develop a road map on how to build capacity for equitable and accessible sustainability and climate education programs that align with the Minnesota Climate Action Framework. new text end new text begin (n) ESTEP 2.0: Earth Science Teacher Education Project new text end new text begin $643,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Science Teachers Association to provide professional development for Minnesota science teachers statewide in environmental and earth science content to strengthen environmental education in schools. new text end new text begin (o) Engaging Latine Communities in Conservation and Preservation new text end new text begin $400,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Comunidades Organizando el Poder y la Accion Latina to use community-based partnerships and communications platforms to host outdoor events and conduct educational outreach focused on Latine and BIPOC communities about the need to protect Minnesota's environment and natural resources. new text end new text begin (p) Inclusive Wildlife Engagement in Classrooms and Communities new text end new text begin $712,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the nongame wildlife program to provide three wildlife conservation, action-based outdoor educational opportunities to engage needs-based schools, young adults, and communities underrepresented in natural resources through the Bird by Bird, Empowering Pathways into Conservation, and Community Science programs. new text end new text begin (q) Activating Youth and Family Environmental Stewardship through Raptors new text end new text begin $228,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Raptor Center to deliver standards-based environmental education featuring live raptors through school programs and community events across Minnesota. new text end new text begin (r) Moving Minnesota toward a Lead-Free Sporting Future new text end new text begin $250,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities for Bemidji State University to conduct educational outreach directed at hunters and anglers to increase awareness of lead-free options for big-game hunting, small-game hunting, and fishing as a means of reducing wildlife exposure to lead. new text end new text begin (s) Science Centers Supporting Northern Boys and Girls Clubs new text end new text begin $1,091,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Headwaters Science Center to expand access to environmental science education in northern Minnesota and leverage partnerships between rural and urban organizations to deliver culturally relevant, hands-on learning experiences to underserved students. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Aquatic and Terrestrial Invasive Species new text end new text begin 6,713,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Aquatic Invasive Species: From Problems to Real-World Solutions new text end new text begin $5,771,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Minnesota Aquatic Invasive Species Research Center to conduct high-priority projects aimed at solving Minnesota's aquatic invasive species problems using rigorous science and a collaborative process. This appropriation may also be used to deliver research findings to end users through strategic communication and outreach. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (b) Optimizing Nonnative Cattail Treatment Effectiveness in Prairie Wetlands new text end new text begin $942,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to compare the effectiveness of invasive cattail treatment methods and provide recommendations for managers to maximize benefits of conservation money for native wetland plants and wildlife. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Air Quality, Climate Change, and Renewable Energy new text end new text begin 11,744,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Protecting Coldwater Fish Habitat in Minnesota Lakes new text end new text begin $561,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to identify lake-specific watershed protection targets and management practices needed to maintain coldwater fish habitat threatened by warming temperatures and increasing extreme rain events and to integrate this information into conservation planning tools. new text end new text begin (b) Agrivoltaics 2.0 Building a Resilient E-Farm new text end new text begin $535,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the West Central Research and Outreach Center at Morris to evaluate emerging solar system designs and solar technology integration with vegetable and livestock production systems to maximize energy production and benefits to farmers. new text end new text begin (c) Pine Needles Reveal Past and Present Airborne PFAS new text end new text begin $550,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to use current and historic pine needles as a low-cost method to assess statewide per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) levels in ambient air. new text end new text begin (d) Facilitated Transport Hybrid Membranes for CO2 Separation new text end new text begin $1,050,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop and test advanced polymeric membranes for capture and reuse of carbon dioxide at industrial sources. new text end new text begin (e) Renewable Energy Conversion for Farm Diesel and Ammonia new text end new text begin $726,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to develop a novel charge-swing catalytic condenser that will enable the low-cost production of hydrogen from water using rural electricity for on-the-farm energy storage or renewable diesel and ammonia fertilizer. new text end new text begin (f) Innovative Solution to Renewable Energy from Food Waste new text end new text begin $5,167,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Ramsey/Washington Recycling and Energy Board to provide reimbursements to offset the processing fees for the public to divert organic materials from landfills and produce renewable natural gas through anaerobic digestion and sequestration of carbon into biochar. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (g) Fueling the Future: Decarbonizing Regional Transportation Project new text end new text begin $3,155,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of St. Cloud to install a green hydrogen production, storage, and fueling station that provides a renewable, carbon-free, alternate fuel source to decarbonize community transportation and manufacturing sectors. This appropriation may also be used to convert city fleet and public transit vehicles to hydrogen fuel. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Methods to Protect or Restore Land, Water, and Habitat new text end new text begin 12,188,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Minnesota PlantWatch: Community Scientists Conserving Rare Plants new text end new text begin $1,086,000 the first year is from the trust fund. Of this amount, $518,000 is to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Minnesota Landscape Arboretum and $568,000 is to the commissioner of natural resources to enhance the Minnesota PlantWatch program to improve the conservation of Minnesota's natural resources and support community scientist-driven rare plant surveys and seed banking and preservation. new text end new text begin (b) Grassland Restoration for Pollinator Conservation and Demonstration new text end new text begin $250,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Minnesota Landscape Arboretum to restore a degraded pasture to grassland as a model for climate-resilient pollinator habitat; provide interpretive signage, education, and community engagement; and conduct species monitoring. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (c) Planning for Long-Term Natural Resources Protection in Hennepin County new text end new text begin $250,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Hennepin County to develop a publicly available interactive map of natural systems, create a centralized clearinghouse of data and best practices toolkit, and provide ongoing technical assistance for local communities with limited resources to manage complex natural resources challenges. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. new text end new text begin (d) Native Forages: Growing Drought and Climate Resiliency new text end new text begin $2,254,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Ducks Unlimited to collaborate with livestock farmers to establish native grassland wildlife habitat and enhance native forages on working lands to improve ecological, economic, and climate resiliency. Notwithstanding subdivision 13, paragraph (e), restoration efforts may be undertaken on private lands but must occur on properties enrolled in long-term agreements to protect and maintain the restored areas in conformance with approved restoration and grazing plans as approved in the work plan. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2031, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (e) Accelerated Genetic Migration of Bur Oak - Ten-Year Data new text end new text begin $223,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Great River Greening to assess the growth and survival of previously restored bur oak ecotypes to inform techniques for improved climate resiliency. This appropriation may also be used to enhance the previous plantings and disseminate results of the study to practitioners, students, landowners, and others. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (f) Superior Hiking Trail Bridge, Boardwalk, and Trailhead Renewal new text end new text begin $532,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Superior Hiking Trail Association to renew Superior Hiking Trail bridges, boardwalks, and trailheads to increase user safety, improve the user experience, and protect adjacent land and water. new text end new text begin (g) Mississippi Gateway Shoreline Stabilization and Fishing Improvements new text end new text begin $735,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Three Rivers Park District to improve water quality and shoreline fishing access through shoreline stabilization and construction of accessible trails and fishing platforms within Mississippi Gateway Regional Park. new text end new text begin (h) Phytoremediation of PFAS from Soil new text end new text begin $1,066,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to use interdisciplinary research in biology, nanotechnology, chemistry, and genetic engineering to develop technology to remediate soils contaminated with per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS). This appropriation may also be used to convene stakeholders to coordinate and advance PFAS remediation research in Minnesota. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. new text end new text begin (i) Removing Mercury from Minnesota Waters new text end new text begin $247,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to test and refine a biotechnology approach to remove mercury from the food chain in Minnesota's lakes and rivers and potentially make fish consumption in Minnesota safer. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. new text end new text begin (j) Evaluating Native Seed Mixes for Grazing new text end new text begin $208,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Restoravore to assess the use of native hay and pasture mixes to benefit biodiversity, soil health, and Minnesota farmers. A fiscal management plan must be approved in the work plan before any trust fund money is spent. new text end new text begin (k) Improving Minnesota Forest Health via Post-Duff-Burning Soil Analysis new text end new text begin $646,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to thoroughly investigate the impact of forest floor duff fires on soil dynamics, nutrient cycles, invasive shrubs, earthworms, and root systems to improve fire management for Minnesota's forest preservation. This appropriation may also be used to develop an outdoor lab-scale duff-burning device. new text end new text begin (l) Minnesota Riverbank Protection and Parks Improvements new text end new text begin $1,400,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Shakopee to restore Minnesota River shoreline at Huber Park by regrading and establishing native vegetation to protect fish and wildlife habitat, reduce erosion, and provide public access to the river. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (m) Restoration at Wakan Tipi and Bruce Vento Nature Sanctuary new text end new text begin $669,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Lower Phalen Creek Project to conduct citizen-science natural resource data collection events, recruit and train volunteer site stewards, and enhance habitat at Wakan Tipi and the Bruce Vento Nature Sanctuary. new text end new text begin (n) Promoting Pollinators on Corporate Campuses new text end new text begin $547,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the University of St. Thomas to use experimental bee lawn installations on corporate campuses, combined with landscape modeling and employee surveys, to determine potential ecological, economic, and societal benefits of widespread commercial lawn habitat transformation. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (o) Riparian Area Adaptation Strategy for Southeast Minnesota new text end new text begin $243,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with The Nature Conservancy, in partnership with the University of Minnesota, to assess an alternative adaptation strategy to restore riparian areas by excavating and planting riparian shrubs to reconnect the floodplains. This appropriation may also be used for outreach materials and educational activities. new text end new text begin (p) Minnehaha Park South Plateau Oak Savanna Restoration new text end new text begin $242,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board to improve wildlife habitat, enhance recreational experiences, and restore an area of urban parkland in Minnehaha Park to an oak savanna ecosystem. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (q) Tree Protection for Minnesota's Tamarack Against Larch Beetle new text end new text begin $321,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to evaluate new insect management techniques and key factors for predicting future infestations to protect and preserve trees from native eastern larch beetle infestations. new text end new text begin (r) Shoreline Restoration and Enhancement at Minneapolis Lakes new text end new text begin $819,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board to restore and enhance areas of turf-dominated, eroding, and low habitat value lakeshore that impacts the water quality of the Minneapolis Chain of Lakes. new text end new text begin (s) Developing Markets for CLC Crops new text end new text begin $450,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of agriculture to provide grants to organizations in Minnesota to develop enterprises, supply chains, and markets for continuous living cover crops and cropping systems in the early stage of commercial development. This appropriation is exempt from the income repayment requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Land Acquisition, Habitat, and Recreation new text end new text begin 19,553,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Cannon River Preservation and Access new text end new text begin $2,717,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Dakota County to rehabilitate the historic Waterford Bridge for the Mill Towns State Trail; restore and enhance upland shoreline, forest, and prairie habitats; and develop a trailhead and recreational access to the Cannon River. new text end new text begin (b) Mesabi Trail: Aurora to Hoyt Lakes new text end new text begin $1,325,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with St. Louis and Lake Counties Regional Railroad Authority for environmental review and permitting and to engineer, design, and construct a segment of the Mesabi Trail beginning at the intersection of Main Street and Forestry Road in Aurora toward Hoyt Lakes. new text end new text begin (c) RTA Maintenance Trail Stabilization Project new text end new text begin $500,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Eden Prairie to construct a retaining wall and restore adjacent remnant prairie along the maintenance trail at Richard T. Anderson (RTA) Conservation Area to mitigate ongoing erosion and protect native habitat and plant communities. new text end new text begin (d) Local Parks, Trails, and Natural Areas Grant Programs new text end new text begin $4,769,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to solicit, rank, and fund competitive matching grants for local parks, trail connections, and natural and scenic areas under Minnesota Statutes, section 85.019. This appropriation is for local nature-based recreation, connections to regional and state natural areas, and recreation facilities and may not be used for athletic facilities such as sport fields, courts, and playgrounds. This appropriation is exempt from subdivision 13, paragraph (k). new text end new text begin (e) Boardwalk Over Boggy Land for Recreational Purposes new text end new text begin $148,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Battle Lake to design and construct a boardwalk over city land to protect wetlands and to increase community access to natural areas and wildlife habitat. new text end new text begin (f) Lake Zumbro Park Water Access and Site Improvements new text end new text begin $1,978,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Olmsted County to enhance the Lake Zumbro Park water access and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) accessibility for boating, fishing, and viewing, while creating new user-friendly and accessible amenities for individuals and families. This may include new fishing docks or piers, restored shoreline, improved parking, and ADA accessible access to an existing kayak and canoe launch. new text end new text begin (g) Scientific and Natural Area (SNA) Biodiversity Protection new text end new text begin $1,104,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for the scientific and natural area program to conserve Minnesota's most unique places and rare species and strategically acquire lands that meet criteria for SNAs under Minnesota Statutes, section 86A.05. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (h) Scandia Gateway Trail Connection: Recreation, Wetlands, and Environmental Education new text end new text begin $907,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Scandia to engineer, design, and construct a bike and pedestrian trail to connect recreational, cultural, and environmental resources in Scandia to the state Gateway Trail. This appropriation is also to create and install educational interpretive signage about wetlands and rain gardens near the trail. new text end new text begin (i) Lake Byllesby Regional Park Restoration and Recreation new text end new text begin $1,120,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Dakota County to restore prairie, woodland, and shoreline habitat and design and install trails, birding and picnic areas, and other recreational amenities to enhance the visitor experience and stewardship at Lake Byllesby Regional Park. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (j) Thompson County Park Restoration and Accessibility Improvements new text end new text begin $867,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Dakota County to develop a pollinator promenade with accessible natural surface paths, native plantings, and interpretive signage at Thompson County Park. This appropriation may also be used to conduct stream restoration to enhance visitor experience and provide stormwater storage, sediment and nutrient reduction, and increased habitat and species diversity within the park. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. new text end new text begin (k) Thom Storm Chalet and Outdoor Recreation Center new text end new text begin $2,312,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Duluth to construct a new building and accessible parking for the Thom Storm Chalet and Outdoor Recreation Center at Chester Park to expand high-quality outdoor recreation and environmental education opportunities that enhance youth and family understanding of the importance of natural resource protection, conservation, and preservation. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. new text end new text begin (l) Enhancing Preservation and Accessibility at Hawk Ridge Nature Reserve new text end new text begin $155,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Duluth to develop accessible trails and remove invasive species to enhance outdoor recreation and education opportunities that promote conservation of raptors and preservation of natural resources at Hawk Ridge Nature Reserve. new text end new text begin (m) Echo Bay County Park - Phase 1 Construction new text end new text begin $1,122,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Otter Tail County to construct, in accordance with the Echo Bay County Park Master Plan, access roads, trails, parking, and bathroom facilities that create designated public access and use corridors for outdoor recreation and limit natural resource impacts in Echo Bay County Park. new text end new text begin (n) Chaska Big Woods Property Acquisition new text end new text begin $529,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Chaska to acquire property that contains remnant Big Woods to protect Minnesota forests and wetlands and to increase community access to natural areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Administration, Emerging Issues, and Contract Agreement Reimbursement new text end new text begin 7,267,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin (a) Emerging Issues Account new text end new text begin $2,984,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources to an emerging issues account authorized in Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.08, subdivision 4, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (b) 2025 Contract Agreement Reimbursement new text end new text begin $280,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources, at the direction of the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources, for expenses incurred in preparing and administering contracts, including for the agreements specified in this section. new text end new text begin (c) LCCMR Administrative Budget new text end new text begin $4,000,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources for administration in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.09, subdivision 5. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.11, paragraph (b), Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.281, applies to this appropriation. new text end new text begin (d) Legislative Coordinating Commission Legacy Website new text end new text begin $3,000 the first year is from the trust fund to the Legislative Coordinating Commission for the website required in Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Availability of appropriations new text end new text begin Money appropriated in this section may not be spent on activities unless they are directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation and are specified in the work plan approved by the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources. Money appropriated in this section must not be spent on indirect costs or other institutional overhead charges that are not directly related to and necessary for a specific appropriation. Costs that are directly related to and necessary for an appropriation, including financial services, human resources, information services, rent, and utilities, are eligible only if the costs can be clearly justified and individually documented specific to the appropriation's purpose and would not be generated by the recipient but for receipt of the appropriation. No broad allocations for costs in either dollars or percentages are allowed. Unless otherwise provided, the amounts in this section are available for three years beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2028, when projects must be completed and final products delivered. For acquisition of real property, the appropriations in this section are available for an additional fiscal year if a binding contract for acquisition of the real property is entered into before the expiration date of the appropriation. If a project receives a federal award, the period of the appropriation is extended to equal the federal award period to a maximum trust fund appropriation length of six years. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Data availability requirements new text end new text begin Data collected by the projects funded under this section must conform to guidelines and standards adopted by Minnesota IT Services. Spatial data must also conform to additional guidelines and standards designed to support data coordination and distribution that have been published by the Minnesota Geospatial Information Office. Descriptions of spatial data must be prepared as specified in the state's geographic metadata guidelines and final data must be uploaded to the Minnesota Geospatial Commons upon project completion. All data must be accessible and free to the public unless made private under the Data Practices Act, Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13. To the extent practicable, summary data and results of projects funded under this section should be readily accessible on the Internet and identified as having received funding from the environment and natural resources trust fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Project requirements new text end new text begin (a) As a condition of accepting an appropriation under this section, an agency or entity receiving an appropriation or a party to an agreement from an appropriation must comply with paragraphs (b) to (m) and Minnesota Statutes, chapter 116P, and must submit a work plan and annual or semiannual progress reports in the form determined by the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources for any project funded in whole or in part with money from the appropriation. Modifications to the approved work plan and budget expenditures must be made through the amendment process established by the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources. new text end new text begin (b) A recipient of money appropriated in this section that conducts a restoration using money appropriated in this section must use native plant species according to the Board of Water and Soil Resources' native vegetation establishment and enhancement guidelines and include an appropriate diversity of native species selected to provide habitat for pollinators throughout the growing season as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.973. new text end new text begin (c) For all restorations conducted with money appropriated under this section, a recipient must prepare an ecological restoration and management plan that, to the degree practicable, is consistent with the highest-quality conservation and ecological goals for the restoration site. Consideration should be given to soil, geology, topography, and other relevant factors that would provide the best chance for long-term success and durability of the restoration project. The plan must include the proposed timetable for implementing the restoration, including site preparation, establishment of diverse plant species, maintenance, and additional enhancement to establish the restoration; identify long-term maintenance and management needs of the restoration and how the maintenance, management, and enhancement will be financed; and take advantage of the best-available science and include innovative techniques to achieve the best restoration. new text end new text begin (d) An entity receiving an appropriation in this section for restoration activities must provide an initial restoration evaluation at the completion of the appropriation and an evaluation three years after the completion of the expenditure. Restorations must be evaluated relative to the stated goals and standards in the restoration plan, current science, and, when applicable, the Board of Water and Soil Resources' native vegetation establishment and enhancement guidelines. The evaluation must determine whether the restorations are meeting planned goals, identify any problems with implementing the restorations, and, if necessary, give recommendations on improving restorations. The evaluation must be focused on improving future restorations. new text end new text begin (e) All restoration and enhancement projects funded with money appropriated in this section must be on land permanently protected by a conservation easement or public ownership. new text end new text begin (f) A recipient of money from an appropriation under this section must give consideration to contracting with Conservation Corps Minnesota for contract restoration and enhancement services. new text end new text begin (g) All conservation easements acquired with money appropriated under this section must: new text end new text begin (1) be permanent; new text end new text begin (2) specify the parties to the easement in the easement document; new text end new text begin (3) specify all provisions of an agreement that are permanent; new text end new text begin (4) be sent to the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources in an electronic format at least 20 business days before closing; new text end new text begin (5) include a long-term monitoring and enforcement plan and funding for monitoring and enforcing the easement agreement; and new text end new text begin (6) include requirements in the easement document to protect the quantity and quality of groundwater and surface water through specific activities, such as keeping water on the landscape, reducing nutrient and contaminant loading, and not permitting artificial hydrological modifications. new text end new text begin (h) For any acquisition of lands or interest in lands, a recipient of money appropriated under this section must not agree to pay more than 100 percent of the appraised value for a parcel of land using this money to complete the purchase, in part or in whole, except that up to ten percent above the appraised value may be allowed to complete the purchase, in part or in whole, using this money if permission is received in advance of the purchase from the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources. new text end new text begin (i) For any acquisition of land or interest in land, a recipient of money appropriated under this section must give priority to high-quality natural resources or conservation lands that provide natural buffers to water resources. new text end new text begin (j) For new lands acquired with money appropriated under this section, a recipient must prepare an ecological restoration and management plan in compliance with paragraph (c), including sufficient funding for implementation unless the work plan addresses why a portion of the money is not necessary to achieve a high-quality restoration. new text end new text begin (k) To ensure public accountability for using public money, a recipient of money appropriated under this section must, within 60 days of a land acquisition, provide to the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources documentation of the selection process used to identify parcels acquired and provide documentation of all related transaction costs, including but not limited to appraisals, legal fees, recording fees, commissions, other similar costs, and donations. This information must be provided for all parties involved in the transaction. The recipient must also report to the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources any difference between the acquisition amount paid to the seller and the state-certified or state-reviewed appraisal, if a state-certified or state-reviewed appraisal was conducted. new text end new text begin (l) A recipient of an appropriation from the trust fund under this section must acknowledge financial support from the environment and natural resources trust fund in project publications, signage, and other public communications and outreach related to work completed using the appropriation. Acknowledgment may occur, as appropriate, through use of the trust fund logo or inclusion of language attributing support from the trust fund. Each direct recipient of money appropriated in this section, as well as each recipient of a grant awarded pursuant to this section, must satisfy all reporting and other requirements incumbent upon constitutionally dedicated funding recipients as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 3.303, subdivision 10, and chapter 116P. new text end new text begin (m) A recipient of an appropriation from the trust fund under this section that is receiving funding to conduct children's services, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299C.61, subdivision 7, must certify to the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources, as part of the required work plan, that criminal background checks for background check crimes, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 299C.61, subdivision 2, are performed on all employees, contractors, and volunteers that have or may have access to a child to whom the recipient provides children's services using the appropriation. new text end new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Payment conditions and capital equipment expenditures new text end new text begin (a) All agreements, grants, or contracts referred to in this section must be administered on a reimbursement basis unless otherwise provided in this section. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.41, expenditures made on or after July 1, 2025, or the date the work plan is approved, whichever is later, are eligible for reimbursement unless otherwise provided in this section. Periodic payments must be made upon receiving documentation that the deliverable items articulated in the approved work plan have been achieved, including partial achievements as evidenced by approved progress reports. Reasonable amounts may be advanced to projects to accommodate cash-flow needs or match federal money. The advances must be approved as part of the work plan. No expenditures for capital equipment are allowed unless expressly authorized in the project work plan. new text end new text begin (b) Single-source contracts as specified in the approved work plan are allowed. new text end new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Purchasing recycled and recyclable materials new text end new text begin A political subdivision, public or private corporation, or other entity that receives an appropriation under this section must use the appropriation in compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 16C.0725, regarding purchasing recycled, repairable, and durable materials, and Minnesota Statutes, section 16C.073, regarding purchasing and using paper stock and printing. new text end new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Accessibility new text end new text begin Structural and nonstructural facilities must meet the design standards in the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) accessibility guidelines. new text end new text begin Subd. 17. new text end new text begin Carryforward; extensions new text end new text begin (a) The availability of the appropriations for the following projects is extended to June 30, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 6, article 5, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (d), Foundational Hydrology Data for Wetland Protection and Restoration; new text end new text begin (2) Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 6, article 5, section 2, subdivision 6, paragraph (b), Protect Community Forests by Managing Ash for Emerald Ash Borer; new text end new text begin (3) Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 6, article 5, section 2, subdivision 9, paragraph (t), Chippewa County Acquisition, Recreation, and Education; new text end new text begin (4) Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 6, article 6, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (g), Geologic Atlases for Water Resource Management; new text end new text begin (5) Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 6, article 6, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (n), Bioacoustics for Broad-Scale Species Monitoring and Conservation; new text end new text begin (6) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 4, paragraph (f), Water and Climate Information to Enhance Community Resilience; new text end new text begin (7) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 4, paragraph (i), Is the Tire Chemical 6PPDq Killing Minnesota's Fish?; new text end new text begin (8) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 7, paragraph (a), Green Solar Cells from a Minnesota Natural Resource; new text end new text begin (9) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 8, paragraph (d), Hastings Lake Rebecca Park Area; new text end new text begin (10) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 9, paragraph (a), as amended by Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 2, section 15, Mesabi Trail: Wahlsten Road (CR 26) to Tower; and new text end new text begin (11) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 9, paragraph (j), as amended by Laws 2024, chapter 83, section 5, Silver Bay Multimodal Trailhead Project. new text end new text begin (b) The availability of the appropriations for the following projects is extended to June 30, 2027: new text end new text begin (1) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 4, paragraph (g), Catch and Reveal: Discovering Unknown Fish Contamination Threats; new text end new text begin (2) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 9, paragraph (e), Native Prairie Stewardship and Prairie Bank Easement Acquisition; new text end new text begin (3) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 9, paragraph (h), SNA Habitat Restoration and Public Engagement; and new text end new text begin (4) Laws 2022, chapter 94, section 2, subdivision 9, paragraph (n), Ranier Safe Harbor/Transient Dock - Phase 2. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 17 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2024, chapter 83, section 2, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Foundational Natural Resource Data and Information -0- 14,993,000 (a) Native Plant Community Data in the City of Duluth $198,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Land Trust to develop field-verified native plant community data and maps for the city of Duluth and the St. Louis River estuary to support conservation and restoration activities. (b) Reconstructing Historical Wild Rice to Understand Its Future $200,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Science Museum of Minnesota for the St. Croix Watershed Research Station to characterize environmental drivers contributing to the decline of wild rice using lake sediment cores to reconstruct historical wild rice abundance in relation to lake and watershed stressors. (c) Characterizing Tree Cavities and Use by Minnesota's Wildlife $349,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute in Duluth to assess the effects of forest management on Minnesota's primary cavity engineer, the pileated woodpecker, and on the wildlife that rely on the cavities that pileated woodpeckers create. This appropriation is also to develop management guidelines. (d) Fate of Minnesota's Lakes in the Next Century $453,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to use new modeling techniques to quantify how water quality of Minnesota's lakes will change in the next century under future land use and climate change scenarios and to create an online web tool to display the results. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10.This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (e) Turtle Island Skywatchers - Minnesota Research and Data Visualization $200,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Native Skywatchers Inc. to engage youth in environmental stewardship by collecting images and acoustic data from turtles and other culturally significant animals and their habitats, evaluating the differences in these soundscapes across landscapes, and sharing the results through scientific storytelling and online platforms. (f) Monitoring Minnesota's Insects: Connecting Habitat to Insect Prey $199,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to investigate the ecological roles of and energy transfer by certain Minnesota insects throughout their life cycles and to train future insect researchers on field techniques. (g) Determining Ambient Background PFAS Concentrations in Minnesota Soils $621,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to determine ambient background per- and polyfluoroalkyl substance (PFAS) levels in urban and nonurban soils to help Minnesota develop management strategies for PFAS-contaminated soils. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (h) Investigating Life History Characteristics of Minnesota Elk $933,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to assess Minnesota elk herd health and genetic diversity, movements, survival, and causes of mortality and to develop a noninvasive, safer, and more accurate method to estimate population size. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (i) Foundational Data for Moth and Butterfly Conservation $195,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to perform field surveys and consolidate existing data to create the first comprehensive list of Minnesota moths and butterflies. This appropriation is also to conduct outreach to inform land managers and to facilitate public appreciation of these species. (j) DNR County Groundwater Atlas $3,200,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to continue producing county groundwater atlases to inform management of surface water and groundwater resources for drinking and other purposes. This appropriation is for Part B, to characterize the potential water yields of aquifers and aquifers' sensitivity to contamination. (k) Voyageurs Wolf Project - Phase III $996,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to continue to study summertime wolf predation on deer, moose, and other species in the greater Voyageurs ecosystem to inform wildlife management and to share natural history of this species with the public. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (l) Distribution and Population Status of Weasels in Minnesota $400,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute in Duluth to determine the distribution, relative abundance, and spatial occupancy patterns of small weasel species in Minnesota to fill key knowledge gaps in weasel distribution and status in Minnesota. (m) Improving Aquatic Plant Knowledge for Healthy Waters $198,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to collect foundational data on Minnesota's native aquatic plant biodiversity through new and enhanced lake surveys and to disseminate results to state resource managers, scientists, and the public. (n) New Small Mammal Monitoring Methods for Minnesota $199,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute in Duluth to develop camera trapping methods as a new tool to collect foundational data and fill key knowledge gaps in the status of small mammal species in Minnesota. (o) Status of Bats and Roost Trees after White-Nose Syndrome $195,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Natural Resources Research Institute in Duluth to study changes in maternity roost trees and bat populations in the forested areas of Minnesota and to evaluate the effects of years of white-nose syndrome on Minnesota bats. (p) Sublethal Effects of Pesticides on the Invertebrate Community $387,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to provide data on pesticide contamination in soil and the insect community across the state and the effect of insecticide exposure on insect reproduction. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (q) Modernizing Minnesota's Plant Community Classification and Field Guides $1,800,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to collect additional vegetation and environmental data and update the state's 20-year-old native plant community classification guides to incorporate new data, streamline user application and access to products, and include analysis of climate and vegetation trends. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. (r) Assessing Prairie Health to Inform Pollinator Conservation $297,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Minnesota Zoological Society to assess habitat quality and pesticide occurrence in Minnesota prairies to help inform management actions, endangered species recovery plans, and pollinator reintroduction efforts for endangered and threatened butterflies and other wildlife. (s) Understanding Native Fishes in the Bowfishing Era $588,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, Duluth, to collect foundational biological information on a selection of native Minnesota fish to aid in sustainable management, improve recreational opportunities, and educate the public about these shared aquatic resources. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (t) Preserving Minnesota Wildflower Information $199,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, Bell Museum of Natural History, to preserve and enhance Minnesota Wildflowers Information, an online tool for plant identification, by integrating the content and functionality of the website with the Minnesota Biodiversity Atlas for public use as required by Laws 2017, chapter 96, section 2, subdivision 3, paragraph (e). (u) White-Tailed Deer Movement and Disease in Suburban Areas $699,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to better understand white-tailed deer movement, habitat use, and disease dynamics at the suburban-agricultural interface to inform more efficient deer management and disease control. (v) Highly Pathogenic Avian Influenza and Minnesota Raptors $187,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Raptor Center to evaluate Minnesota raptors for current or past infections with highly pathogenic avian influenza virus to better understand disease transmission and outbreak impacts on raptor populations. (w) Geologic Atlases for Water Resource Management $1,236,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota, Minnesota Geological Survey, to continue producing county geologic atlases to inform management of surface water and groundwater resources. This appropriation is to complete Part A, which focuses on the properties and distribution of earth materials to define aquifer boundaries and the connection of aquifers to the land surface and surface water resources. (x) Remote Sensing for Pollinator Habitat $180,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Monarch Joint Venture to use remote sensing technology to evaluate pollinator habitat on energy and transportation corridors across Minnesota and to host field-day training workshops.new text begin Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10.new text end (y) Harnessing Cover Crops and Roots for Sustainable Cropping $375,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to determine carbon sequestration, nitrogen credit potential, water use, and performance of cover crops in corn-soybean and corn-soybean-wheat rotations in southern Minnesota. (z) Effects of Conservation Grazing on Solar Sites Managed for Pollinator Habitat $88,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Minnesota Native Landscapes, in partnership with Temple University, to analyze the effects of sheep grazing and mowing on the vegetation and soils of solar sites managed for pollinator habitat and to improve understanding of the environmental outcomes from the colocation of solar panels; grazing; and native, pollinator-friendly vegetation. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (aa) Genetic Detection of Endangered Mussels in the Mississippi $241,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the United States Geological Survey, Ohio Water Microbiology Lab, to create, optimize, and use eDNA assays to detect the presence of endangered or threatened mussel species around Buffalo Slough near the Prairie Island Indian Community. (bb) Integrated Population Modeling for Trumpeter Swans $180,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to compile and use all available data to model historical population abundance and estimate future population dynamics of Minnesota trumpeter swans. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2024. new text end Sec. 4. Laws 2024, chapter 83, section 2, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Methods to Protect or Restore Land, Water, and Habitat -0- 10,910,000 (a) Long-Term Preservation of Minnesota's Ball Cactus Population $100,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for the Minnesota Landscape Arboretum to protect Minnesota's only population of ball cactus by supporting population expansion and establishment, monitoring transferred plants, and training long-term volunteer monitors. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (b) Morrison County Historical Society Streambank Stabilization and Restoration $519,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Morrison Soil and Water Conservation District to stabilize and restore land along the Mississippi River owned by the Morrison County Historical Society within the statutory boundaries of Charles A. Lindbergh State Park to improve water quality and improve aquatic and terrestrial habit. For purposes of this appropriation, subdivision 13, paragraph (e), does not apply. The commissioner of natural resources may make reasonable amounts of this appropriation available on an advance basis to accommodate the Morrison Soil and Water Conservation District's cash-flow needs if a plan for the advances is approved as part of the work plan. (c) Can Increased Tree Diversity Increase Community Diversity? $415,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to evaluate impacts of increasing tree diversity on wildlife, plant and fungal communities, and carbon storage within aspen forests in northern Minnesota to develop best management practices for mixed woodland systems. (d) Restoration of Riverside Park $141,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the city of Long Prairie to improve water retention, increase native habitat, and enhance footpaths for recreation at Riverside Park in Todd County, Minnesota. The project must create a net increase in habitat, and this appropriation may not be used to meet the conditions of any permits received for the project. (e) Pollinator Central IV: Habitat Improvement with Public Engagement $698,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Great River Greening to partner with municipalities, educational organizations, and volunteers to create and enhance pollinator habitat along public corridors from Lakeville to St. Cloud and to engage youth and the public through education and monitoring the impact of habitat improvements. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (f) Conservation Grazing for Birds, Beef, and Better Soil $342,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the National Audubon Society, Minnesota office, to assess Audubon Conservation Ranching as a strategic approach to improve grassland biodiversity, soils, and ecosystem resilience. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (g) Minnesota Microbes for Enhanced Biodegradation of Microplastics $524,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to investigate the potential of natural and indigenous microbes to biodegrade conventional plastics in contaminated soils and waters across the state. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. (h) Completing the Mississippi River Greenway: Dakota County $657,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with Dakota County to restore and enhance habitat on public lands, establish linear native plantings, and install electric-vehicle charging stations within and along the 27-mile Mississippi River Greenway in Dakota County. Net income generated as part of this appropriation may be reinvested in the project if a plan for reinvestment is approved in the work plan. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10, and is available until June 30, 2028, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (i) Enabling Nature to Destroy Environmental PFAS Contaminants $378,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to identify enzymes and microbes that can break down soil-based per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) into nontoxic elements. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. (j) Bioacoustics for Species Monitoring and Conservation - Phase 2 $568,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to assess avian diversity at the statewide scale by developing a citizen science bioacoustics monitoring program with an initial focus on private lands. (k) Preventing PFAS and Microplastics Contaminants Across Minnesota $656,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to help stop the flow of per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and microplastics contaminants into Minnesota's environment by developing strategies and technologies to manage solid waste streams on site. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. (l) Shingle Creek Aquatic and Shoreline Habitat Enhancement $1,100,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Minneapolis Park and Recreation Board to plan and restore a section of Shingle Creek in north Minneapolis with native aquatic and shoreline vegetation, channel and bank modification, and natural stream features. This appropriation is also to monitor plant and animal health following construction to ensure that the ecological functioning of the creek corridor is restored. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2030, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (m) LiDAR Technology to Help Prevent Wildlife Fatalities from Wind Turbines $525,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to create a low-cost and advanced LiDAR system to detect bats and birds approaching wind turbines that may be used in concert with deterrence or impact avoidance methods to prevent collisions. This appropriation is subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.10. (n) Road Salt Pollution of Surface Waters from Groundwater $622,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to inform source-reduction efforts by developing a model to identify hot spots where road-salt-contaminated groundwater leads to chloride pollution of surface waters. (o) Growing the Minnesota Bison Conservation Herd $1,775,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to reintroduce bison to Camden State Park as part of a statewide effort to preserve the American Plains bison genome. Reintroduction includes the design, construction, and installation of fencing, a handling facility, signage, exhibits, and other site improvements. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2030, by which time the project must be completed and final products delivered. (p) Priority Lakes: Meeting Protection Goals and Multiplying Benefits $1,890,000 the second year is from the trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources for an agreement with the Hubbard County Soil and Water Conservation District, in cooperation with Minnesota Land Trust, to protect habitat, forest health, and water quality in the best fishing lakes by creating lake implementation action plans, conducting community-based habitat restorations and improvements, and protecting forest lands with conservation easements and Sustainable Forest Incentive Act (SFIA) enrollments within prioritized areas of the upper Mississippi River basin deleted text begin in Hubbard Countydeleted text end . Of this amount, up to $168,000 is for deposit in a monitoring fund to be used by Minnesota Land Trust as approved in the work plan and subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 116P.20. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2024. new text end ARTICLE 3 ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES TRUST FUND COMMUNITY GRANTS APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ENRTF COMMUNITY GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $28,180,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $28,180,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the environment and natural resources trust fund to the commissioner of natural resources to make grants under the environment and natural resources trust fund community grant program established in Minnesota Statutes, section 116X.03. These are onetime appropriations and are available until June 30, 2029. new text end ARTICLE 4 ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL RESOURCES POLICY Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.027, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 21. new text end new text begin Outreach to culturally diverse communities. new text end new text begin The commissioner must ensure that, to the maximum extent practicable, the commissioner's work and the work of the department are carried out in a manner that facilitates outreach to and communication with Minnesotans of diverse backgrounds, cultures, and languages. To the maximum extent practicable, public hearings, solicitations for grant proposals, and other interactions with the public must include audiovisual communication components and must not rely exclusively on written forms of communication. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.03, is amended to read: 84.03 ADDITIONAL DUTIES AND POWERS. (a) So far as practicable the commissioner shall collect and arrange statistics and other information in reference to the lands and general and special resources of the state. (b) The commissioner is hereby authorized and empowered to take such measures as the commissioner may deem advisable to advertise, both within and without the state, sales of all state lands, and to secure, compile, and issue such valuable statistics of the resources of the state. (c) The commissioner may adopt and promulgate reasonable rules, not inconsistent with law, governing the use and enjoyment of state land reserved from sale, state parks, state water-access sites, state trails, state monuments, state scientific and natural areas, state wilderness areas, and recreational areas owned by other state, local and federal agencies and operated under agreement by the Department of Natural Resources, which shall have the force and effect of law. A reasonable fee may be fixed, charged, and collected by the commissioner for the privilege of the use of any or all of the foregoing privileges and facilities. deleted text begin (d) The commissioner, on or before November 15 of each even-numbered year, shall report to the legislature the commissioner's acts and doings, with recommendation for the improvement or conservation of state parks, state water-access sites, state trails, and state monuments, state scientific and natural areas, state forests, state wildlife management areas, public hunting grounds, public shooting grounds, food and cover planting areas, wildlife lands, recreational or public hunting areas, state wild and scenic rivers, state wilderness areas, and all other recreational lands under the jurisdiction of the Department of Natural Resources, and for desirable accessions thereto, such report to include an inventory of the tracts and parcels of land, and rights, interests, and easements therein, held by the state or withdrawn from sale for any of these purposes, with the value thereof, and a list of the name, location, size, and description of each state trail, state scientific and natural area, state wildlife management area, state water-access site, and state wild, scenic, or recreational river designated by the commissioner, and each public hunting grounds, public shooting grounds, food and cover planting area, wildlife lands, and recreational or public hunting area acquired by the commissioner since the last report. The commissioner shall maintain a long range plan governing the use of the public domain under the commissioner's jurisdiction. deleted text end Sec. 3. new text begin [84.1515] WILD RICE POLICY. new text end new text begin It is the policy of the state to recognize the innate significance of uncultivated wild rice's ability to exist and thrive in Minnesota. The legislature finds that wild rice: new text end new text begin (1) is a nutrient-rich, natural food source that has been sustainably harvested in this state for centuries; new text end new text begin (2) is sacred to Indian Tribes and is a core component of their cultural identity; new text end new text begin (3) thrives in clean, shallow water, without requiring pesticides, fertilizers, or harmful chemicals; new text end new text begin (4) supports rural economies by providing jobs, fostering local businesses, and supporting ecotourism; new text end new text begin (5) plays a crucial role in preventing toxic algae blooms, absorbing carbon dioxide, fostering vital habitat for fish, and stabilizing lake beds; and new text end new text begin (6) is essential for safeguarding Tribal food security and upholding Tribal treaty rights. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.8035, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Pass required; fee. (a) Except as provided under paragraph (c), a person may not operate an off-road vehicle on a state or grant-in-aid off-road vehicle trail or use area unless the deleted text begin vehicle displays andeleted text end new text begin operator carries a validnew text end off-road vehicle state trail pass issued according to this section. The pass must be available deleted text begin to be vieweddeleted text end new text begin for inspectionnew text end by a peace officer, a conservation officer, or an employee designated under section 84.0835. (b) The commissioner of natural resources shall issue a pass upon application and payment of the fee. Fees collected under this section, except for the issuing fee for licensing agents, shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the off-road vehicle account in the natural resources fund and, except for the electronic licensing system commission established by the commissioner under section 84.027, subdivision 15, must be used for grants-in-aid to counties and municipalities for off-road vehicle organizations to construct and maintain off-road vehicle trails and use areas. (c) An off-road vehicle state trail pass is not required for: (1) an off-road vehicle that is owned and used by the United States, another state, or a political subdivision thereof that is exempt from registration under section 84.798, subdivision 2; (2) a person operating an off-road vehicle only on the portion of a trail that is owned by the person or the person's spouse, child, or parent; or (3) a person operating an off-road vehicle that is registered according to section 84.798. (d) The fee for an annual nonresident off-road vehicle state trail pass is $20. The nonresident pass is valid from January 1 through December 31. The fee for a nonresident three-year pass is $30. (e) The fee for a resident off-road vehicle state trail pass is $20. The resident pass is valid for 30 consecutive days after the date of issuance. Sec. 5. new text begin [84.9766] OUTDOOR SCHOOL FOR ALL; GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must establish and administer a program to provide grants to learning centers eligible under subdivision 2 for outdoor education programs serving students in grades 4 through 12. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may award grants under this section to overnight outdoor school experience providers accredited by a state-recognized school accrediting agency and to other outdoor school experience accredited providers offering similar programming. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for a grant under this section, the outdoor education program must: new text end new text begin (1) provide a multiday, overnight educational experience that is comprised mainly of outdoor-based learning activities; new text end new text begin (2) provide students with opportunities to directly experience and understand nature and the natural world, including field study opportunities for student learning; new text end new text begin (3) use a research-based environmental, ecological, agricultural, or other natural-resource-based educational curriculum; new text end new text begin (4) be integrated with local school curricula to help students meet academic standards; new text end new text begin (5) provide students with opportunities to develop: new text end new text begin (i) leadership; new text end new text begin (ii) critical thinking; new text end new text begin (iii) self-sufficiency; new text end new text begin (iv) decision-making skills; and new text end new text begin (v) social and emotional skills; and new text end new text begin (6) address accessibility of outdoor educational opportunities for underserved students, including students with disabilities. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84D.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Eviscerated. new text end new text begin "Eviscerated" means to have the internal organs removed from the body cavity or to have the gills severed to ensure that an organism is dead. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84D.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prohibited activities. A person may not possess, import, purchase, sell, propagate, transport, or introduce a prohibited invasive species, except: (1) under a permit issued by the commissioner under section 84D.11; (2) in the case of purple loosestrife, as provided by sections 18.75 to 18.88; (3) under a restricted species permit issued under section 17.457; new text begin (4) a person may possess, import, purchase, sell, and transport bighead carp, grass carp, and silver carp if they are dead and eviscerated; new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end when being transported to the department, or another destination as the commissioner may direct, in a sealed container for purposes of identifying the species or reporting the presence of the species; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end when being transported for disposal as part of a harvest or control activity when specifically authorized under a permit issued by the commissioner according to section 103G.615, when being transported for disposal as specified under a commercial fishing license issued by the commissioner according to section 97A.418, 97C.801, 97C.811, 97C.825, 97C.831, or 97C.835, or when being transported as specified by the commissioner; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end when being removed from watercraft and equipment, or caught while angling, and immediately returned to the water from which they came; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end when being transported from riparian property to a legal disposal site that is at least 100 feet from any surface water, ditch, or seasonally flooded land, provided the prohibited invasive species are in a covered commercial vehicle specifically designed and used for hauling trash; or deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end as the commissioner may otherwise prescribe by rule. Sec. 8. new text begin [86B.109] ABANDONED WATERCRAFT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Tagging authority; notice to owner. new text end new text begin (a) A peace officer or an employee designated by the commissioner under section 84.0835 may place a tag on a watercraft unlawfully located on public accesses, public lands, and waters of this state or unlawfully located on property adjacent to waters of this state. A watercraft is unlawfully located if the watercraft appears to be: new text end new text begin (1) inoperative and neglected, wrecked, stranded, or substantially dismantled; new text end new text begin (2) in immediate danger of sinking; or new text end new text begin (3) unmoored and unattended. new text end new text begin (b) A peace officer or employee who places a tag on a watercraft under this subdivision must notify the commissioner of placing the tag within 48 hours. The notification must include a statement of the basis for the decision to place a tag on the watercraft. new text end new text begin (c) Upon receiving notification under paragraph (b), the commissioner must send a notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the registered owner of the watercraft. The notice must state that: new text end new text begin (1) the watercraft has been tagged and the condition that resulted in the watercraft being tagged must be remedied immediately; and new text end new text begin (2) failure to remedy within 14 days of the notice being sent is a criminal violation that may result in civil and criminal penalties and the forfeiture of the watercraft. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Failure to remedy. new text end new text begin The registered owner of a watercraft who knowingly fails to remedy the condition that resulted in the watercraft being tagged within 14 days of the commissioner sending the notice required by subdivision 1, paragraph (c), is guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition, the owner is liable to the Department of Natural Resources for all costs incurred by the commissioner in enforcing this section against the owner and is subject to a civil penalty of not less than two times nor more than five times the costs incurred by the commissioner to remove, process, and dispose of the watercraft. Civil penalties imposed under this subdivision may be enforced and distributed as provided in section 115A.99. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Seizure of abandoned watercraft. new text end new text begin Fourteen days after the commissioner sends the notice required by subdivision 1, paragraph (c), to the registered owner, or concludes that there is no registered owner, the commissioner must investigate the watercraft. If, upon inspection, the watercraft has not been removed and the condition that prompted the peace officer or employee to tag it has not been substantially remedied, the watercraft is considered abandoned and the commissioner must seize and forfeit the watercraft according to section 97A.223. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Relation to other law. new text end new text begin An abandoned watercraft that becomes submerged and subject to section 86B.107 must be removed and disposed of in accordance with that section. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to previously sunk watercraft of historical significance or that are currently a destination for scuba divers or commercial tourism that do not pose an ongoing environmental or public safety risk. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.415, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Watercraft surcharge. A deleted text begin $10.60deleted text end surcharge is placed on each watercraft licensed under subdivisions 1 to 5 for control, public awareness, law enforcement, monitoring, and research of aquatic invasive species such as zebra mussel, purple loosestrife, and Eurasian watermilfoil in public waters and public wetlands.new text begin The surcharge is:new text end new text begin (1) for a watercraft 19 feet or less in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (2) to (8), $29; new text end new text begin (2) for a watercraft, other than personal watercraft, 19 feet in length or less that is offered for rent or lease, $25; new text end new text begin (3) for a sailboat 19 feet in length or less, $20; new text end new text begin (4) for a watercraft used by a nonprofit corporation for teaching boat and water safety, $14; new text end new text begin (5) for a watercraft owned by a dealer under a dealer's license, $50; new text end new text begin (6) for a personal watercraft, including one offered for rent or lease, $25; new text end new text begin (7) for a watercraft less than 17 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (2) to (6), $25; new text end new text begin (8) for a canoe, kayak, sailboard, paddleboard, paddleboat, or rowing shell over ten feet in length, $20; new text end new text begin (9) for a watercraft more than 19 feet but less than 26 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (4), (5), (8), and (12), $38; new text end new text begin (10) for a watercraft 26 feet but less than 40 feet in length, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (4), (5), (8), and (12), $50; new text end new text begin (11) for a watercraft 40 feet in length or longer, other than a watercraft listed in clauses (4), (5), (8), and (12), $62; and new text end new text begin (12) for a watercraft used primarily for charter fishing, commercial fishing, commercial passenger carrying, or other commercial operation, $50. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.223, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Property subject to seizure and forfeiture. (a) An enforcement officer must seize: (1) firearms possessed in violation of state or federal law or court order; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) property described in section 97A.221, subdivision 1, where no owner can be determineddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) a watercraft that is abandoned according to section 86B.109, subdivision 3. new text end (b) Property seized under this section is subject to administrative forfeiture. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.421, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3c. new text end new text begin Restrictions after conviction; abandoned watercraft. new text end new text begin (a) After a conviction under section 86B.109, subdivision 2, the following license and registration restrictions remain in effect until the person reimburses the Department of Natural Resources for all the department's costs under section 86B.109, subdivision 2: new text end new text begin (1) all the person's annual game and fish licenses are void; new text end new text begin (2) the person may not act under any lifetime game and fish license; new text end new text begin (3) all the person's watercraft licenses and registrations that are required to operate watercraft in the state are void; new text end new text begin (4) all the person's off-highway vehicle and snowmobile licenses and registrations that are required to operate those vehicles in the state are void; and new text end new text begin (5) the person may not obtain any of the licenses or registrations described in clauses (1) to (4). new text end new text begin (b) If a conviction under section 86B.109, subdivision 2, was for abandoning a watercraft in a boundary water of the state, the commissioner must coordinate with neighboring jurisdictions to ensure that, to the maximum extent practicable, the person is subject to similar consequences in the neighboring jurisdiction as those imposed under paragraph (a). new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.465, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Resident disabled veterans; reduced fee licenses. new text end new text begin A person authorized to issue licenses must issue the following licenses for the reduced fee specified under section 97A.475 to a resident who is a veteran, as defined in section 197.447, and who has a 50 to 99 percent service-connected disability as defined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs upon being furnished satisfactory evidence: new text end new text begin (1) a license to take deer by firearms, archery, or muzzleloader; new text end new text begin (2) a license to take small game; and new text end new text begin (3) a license to take fish by angling. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Resident hunting. Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to residents only, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over and under age 65 to take small game, $15.50; (2) for persons age 65 or over, $7 to take small game; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take turkey, $26; (4) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take turkey, $5; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $34; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by archery, $34; (7) for persons age 18 or over to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $34; (8) to take moose, for a party of not more than six persons, $356; (9) for persons age 18 or over to take bear, $44; (10) to take elk, for a party of not more than two persons, $287; (11) to take light geese during the light goose conservation order, $2.50; (12) to take sandhill crane during the sandhill crane season, $3; (13) to take prairie chickens, $23; (14) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer with firearms during the regular firearms season, $5; (15) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by archery, $5; (16) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, $5; (17) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take bear, no fee; (18) for persons age 13 or over and under age 18 to take bear, $5; (19) for persons age 18 or over to take small game for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $19, of which an amount equal to one-half of the fee for the migratory-waterfowl stamp under subdivision 5, clause (1), shall be deposited in the waterfowl habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 2; one-half of the fee for the pheasant stamp under subdivision 5, clause (2), shall be deposited in the pheasant habitat improvement account under section 97A.075, subdivision 4; and one-half of the small-game surcharge under subdivision 4, shall be deposited in the wildlife acquisition account; (20) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take small game, $5; (21) to take wolf, $30; (22) for persons age 12 and under to take turkey, no fee; (23) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by firearm, no fee; (24) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by archery, no fee; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (25) for persons age 10, 11, or 12 to take deer by muzzleloader during the muzzleloader season, no feedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (26) for disabled veterans to take deer or small game under section 97A.465, subdivision 9, $5. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.475, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Resident fishing. Fees for the following licenses, to be issued to residents only, are: (1) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling, $25; (2) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling, for a combined license for a married couple, $40; (3) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by spearing from a dark house, $6, and the person must possess an angling license; (4) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a 24-hour period selected by the licensee, $12; (5) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for a consecutive 72-hour period selected by the licensee, $14; (6) for persons age 18 or over to take fish by angling for three consecutive years, $71; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (7) for persons age 16 or over and under age 18 to take fish by angling, $5deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (8) for disabled veterans to take fish by angling under section 97A.465, subdivision 9, $5. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.001, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Entering posted land prohibited; signs. (a) Except as provided in subdivision 6, a person may not: (1) enter, for outdoor recreation purposes, any land that is posted under this subdivision without first obtaining permission of the owner, occupant, or lessee; or (2) knowingly enter, for outdoor recreation purposes, any land that is posted under this subdivision without first obtaining permission of the owner, occupant, or lessee. A person who violates this clause is subject to the penalty provided in section 97A.315, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). (b) The owner, occupant, or lessee of private land, or an authorized manager of public land may prohibit outdoor recreation on the land by posting signs once each year that: (1) state "no trespassing" or similar terms; (2) display letters at least two inches high; (3) either: (i) are signed by the owner, occupant, lessee, or authorized manager; or (ii) include the legible name and telephone number of the owner, occupant, lessee, or authorized manager; and (4) either: (i) are at intervals of 1,000 feet or less along the boundary of the area, or in a wooded area where boundary lines are not clear, at intervals of 500 feet or less; or (ii) mark the primary corners of each parcel of land and access roads and trails at the point of entrance to each parcel of land except that corners only accessible through agricultural land need not be posted. (c) A person may not deleted text begin erect a sign that prohibits outdoor recreation or trespassingdeleted text end new text begin act under paragraph (b) or (d)new text end where the person does not have a property right, title, or interest to use the land. new text begin (d) As an alternative to posting signage under paragraph (b), the owner, occupant, or lessee of private land or an authorized manager of public land may prohibit outdoor recreation on the land by: new text end new text begin (1) applying purple paint to trees along the perimeter of the area to which the person wants to prohibit entrance. Paint applied under this paragraph must be applied: new text end new text begin (i) at least three feet off the ground; new text end new text begin (ii) to trees that are at least one inch wide; and new text end new text begin (iii) in a strip that is at least eight inches tall; and new text end new text begin (2) posting signs once each year that mark the primary corners of the area to which the person wants to prohibit entrance. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.037, is amended to read: 97B.037 CROSSBOW HUNTING AND FISHING. (a) Notwithstanding section 97B.035, subdivisions 1 and 2, a person may take deer, bear, turkey, common carp, or native rough fish by crossbow during the respective regular archery seasons. The transportation requirements of section 97B.051 apply to crossbows during the regular archery deer, bear, turkey, common carp, or native rough fish season. Crossbows must meet the requirements of section 97B.106, subdivision 2. A person taking deer, bear, turkey, common carp, or native rough fish by crossbow under this section must have a valid license to take the respective game. (b) This section expires June 30, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.318, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Shotgun use area. new text begin (a) new text end During the regular firearms season in the shotgun use area, only legal shotguns loaded with single-slug shotgun shells, legal muzzle-loading long guns, and legal handguns may be used for taking deer. Legal shotguns include those with rifled barrels. The shotgun use area deleted text begin is that portion of the state lying within the following described boundary: Beginning on the west boundary of the state at the northern boundary of Clay County; thence along the northern boundary of Clay County to State Trunk Highway (STH) 32; thence along STH 32 to STH 34; thence along STH 34 to Interstate Highway 94 (I-94); thence along I-94 to County State-Aid Highway (CSAH) 40, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 40 to CSAH 82, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 82 to CSAH 22, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 22 to CSAH 6, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 6 to CSAH 14, Douglas County; thence along CSAH 14 to STH 29; thence along STH 29 to CSAH 46, Otter Tail County; thence along CSAH 46, Otter Tail County, to CSAH 22, Todd County; thence along CSAH 22 to U.S. Highway 71; thence along U.S. Highway 71 to STH 27; thence along STH 27 to the Mississippi River; thence along the east bank of the Mississippi River to STH 23; thence along STH 23 to STH 95; thence along STH 95 to U.S. Highway 8; thence along U.S. Highway 8 to the eastern boundary of the state; thence along the east, south, and west boundaries of the state to the point of beginningdeleted text end new text begin consists of the counties that have passed a resolution as provided under paragraph (b)new text end . new text begin (b) A county board may adopt an ordinance after notice and public hearing to limit the type of firearms that may be used to hunt deer within the county. To be included in the shotgun use area beginning January 1, the county board must submit the resolution to the commissioner of natural resources on or before October 1 of the prior year. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.405, is amended to read: 97B.405 COMMISSIONER MAY LIMIT NUMBER OF BEAR HUNTERS. (a) The commissioner may limit the number of persons that may hunt bear in an area, if it is necessary to prevent an overharvest or improve the distribution of hunters. The commissioner may establish, by rule, a method, including a drawing, to impartially select the hunters for an area. The commissioner shall give preference to hunters that have previously applied and have not been selected.new text begin Additionally, the commissioner may award points toward a preference under this section to a person who is at least six years of age, so that by the time the person is old enough to be a bear hunter the person has accumulated a number of preference points.new text end (b) If the commissioner limits the number of persons that may hunt bear in an area under paragraph (a), the commissioner must reserve one permit and give first preference for that permit to a resident of a Minnesota veterans home. (c) A person selected through a drawing must purchase a license by August 1. Any remaining available licenses not purchased shall be issued to any eligible person as prescribed by the commissioner on a first-come, first-served basis beginning three business days after August 1. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.667, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Permits and notice; requirements. (a) Before killing or arranging to kill a beaver under this section, the road authority or government unit must contact a conservation officer for a special beaver permit if the beaver will be killed within two weeks before or after the trapping season for beaver, and the conservation officer must issue the permit for any beaver subject to this section. A permit is not required: (1) for a licensed trapper during the open trapping season for beaver; or (2) when the trapping season for beaver is closed and it is not within two weeks before or after the trapping season for beaver. (b) A road authority or government unit that kills or arranges to have killed a beaver under this section must notify a conservation officer or employee of the Fish and Wildlife Division within ten days after the animal is killed. (c) Unless otherwise directed by a conservation officer, the road authority, local government unit, the landowner, or their agent may dispose of or retain beaver killed under this section. deleted text begin Human consumption of a retained beaver is prohibited.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 20. new text begin [97B.902] OPENING HOUR FOR TRAPPING SEASONS. new text end new text begin A season for taking fur-bearing animals by trapping begins at sunrise on the opening day prescribed by rule adopted by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.945, is amended to read: 97B.945 SETTING TRAPS NEAR WATER RESTRICTED. new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end a person may not set a trap within 50 feet of any water other than temporary surface water within 30 days before the open season for mink and muskrat without a special permit by the commissioner. new text begin (b) A person may set a foot-encapsulating trap within 50 feet of any water other than temporary surface water within 30 days before the open season for mink and muskrat without a special permit by the commissioner. For purposes of this paragraph, "foot-encapsulating trap" means a trap for which: new text end new text begin (1) the triggering and restraining mechanisms are enclosed within a housing and are only accessible through a single opening when set; and new text end new text begin (2) the opening does not exceed two inches in diameter. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.395, is amended to read: 97C.395 OPEN SEASONS FOR ANGLING. Subdivision 1. Dates for certain species. (a) The open seasons to take fish by angling are as follows: (1) for walleye, sauger, northern pike,new text begin andnew text end muskellunge, deleted text begin largemouth bass, and smallmouth bass,deleted text end the Saturday two weeks prior to the Saturday of Memorial Day weekend through the last Sunday in February; (2) for brown trout, brook trout, lake trout, rainbow trout, and splake, between January 1 through October 31 as prescribed by the commissioner by rule except as provided in section 97C.415, subdivision 2; and (3) for salmon, as prescribed by the commissioner by rule. (b) The commissioner shall close the season in areas of the state where fish are spawning and closing the season will protect the resource. Subd. 2. Continuous season for certain species. Fornew text begin largemouth bass, smallmouth bass,new text end sunfish, white crappie, black crappie, yellow perch, channel catfish, rock bass, white bass, yellow bass, burbot, cisco (tullibee), lake whitefish, common carp, and native rough fish, the open season is continuous. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.835, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Types of fish permitted. Lake trout, ciscoes, chubs, alewives, lake whitefish, round whitefish, pygmy whitefish, rainbow smelt, common carp, new text begin burbot, new text end and native rough fish may be taken by licensed commercial fishing operators from Lake Superior, in accordance with this section. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.005, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Public waters. (a) "Public waters" means: (1) water basins assigned a shoreland management classification by the commissioner under sections 103F.201 to 103F.221; (2) waters of the state that have been finally determined to be public waters or navigable waters by a court of competent jurisdiction; (3) meandered lakes, excluding lakes that have been legally drained; (4) water basins previously designated by the commissioner for management for a specific purpose such as trout lakes and game lakes pursuant to applicable laws; (5) water basins designated as scientific and natural areas under section 84.033; (6) water basins located within and totally surrounded by publicly owned lands; (7) water basins where the state of Minnesota or the federal government holds title to any of the beds or shores, unless the owner declares that the water is not necessary for the purposes of the public ownership; (8) water basins where there is a publicly owned and controlled access that is intended to provide for public access to the water basin; (9) natural and altered watercourses with a total drainage area greater than two square miles; (10) natural and altered watercourses designated by the commissioner as trout streams; and (11) public waters wetlands, unless the statute expressly states otherwise. (b) Public waters are not determined exclusively by: (1) the proprietorship of the underlying, overlying, or surrounding land;new text begin ornew text end (2) whether it is a body or stream of water that was navigable in fact or susceptible of being used as a highway for commerce at the time this state was admitted to the uniondeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) their inclusion in or exclusion from the public waters inventory required under section 103G.201. This clause is effective July 1, 2027. deleted text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.201, is amended to read: 103G.201 PUBLIC WATERS INVENTORY. (a) The commissioner shall maintain a public waters inventory map of each county that shows the waters of this state that are designated as public waters under the public waters inventory and classification procedures prescribed under Laws 1979, chapter 199, and shall provide access to a copy of the maps. As county public waters inventory maps are revised according to this section, the commissioner shall send a notification or a copy of the maps to the auditor of each affected county. (b) The commissioner deleted text begin mustdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end revise the map of public waters established under Laws 1979, chapter 199, to reclassify those types 3, 4, and 5 wetlands previously identified as public waters wetlands under Laws 1979, chapter 199, as public waters or as wetlands under section 103G.005, subdivision 19. The commissioner may only reclassify public waters wetlands as public waters if: (1) they are assigned a shoreland management classification by the commissioner under sections 103F.201 to 103F.221; (2) they are classified as lacustrine wetlands or deepwater habitats according to Classification of Wetlands and Deepwater Habitats of the United States (Cowardin, et al., 1979 edition); or (3) the state or federal government has become titleholder to any of the beds or shores of the public waters wetlands, subsequent to the preparation of the public waters inventory map filed with the auditor of the county, pursuant to paragraph (a), and the responsible state or federal agency declares that the water is necessary for the purposes of the public ownership. (c) The commissioner must provide notice of the reclassification to the local government unit, the county board, the watershed district, if one exists for the area, and the soil and water conservation district. Within 60 days of receiving notice from the commissioner, a party required to receive the notice may provide a resolution stating objections to the reclassification. If the commissioner receives an objection from a party required to receive the notice, the reclassification is not effective. If the commissioner does not receive an objection from a party required to receive the notice, the reclassification of a wetland under paragraph (b) is effective 60 days after the notice is received by all of the parties. (d) The commissioner shall give priority to the reclassification of public waters wetlands that are or have the potential to be affected by public works projects. (e) The commissioner deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end revise the public waters inventory map of each county: (1) to reflect the changes authorized in paragraph (b); and (2) as needed, to: (i) correct errors in the original inventory; (ii) add or subtract trout stream tributaries within sections that contain a designated trout stream following written notice to the landowner; (iii) add depleted quarries, and sand and gravel pits, when the body of water exceeds 50 acres and the shoreland has been zoned for residential development; and (iv) add or subtract public waters that have been created or eliminated as a requirement of a permit authorized by the commissioner under section 103G.245. (f) $1,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund each year in fiscal years 2025 through 2032 to the commissioner to update the public water inventory as required in this section. The commissioner must develop and implement a process to update the public water inventory. This paragraph expires June 30, 2032. Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.271, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Water-use permit; processing fee. (a) Except as described in paragraphs (b) to (g), a water-use permit processing fee must be prescribed by the commissioner in accordance with the schedule of fees in this subdivision for each water-use permit in force at any time during the year. Fees collected under this paragraph are credited to the water management account in the natural resources fund. The schedule is as follows, with the stated fee in each clause applied to the total amount appropriated: (1) deleted text begin $140deleted text end new text begin $200new text end for amounts not exceeding 50,000,000 gallons per year; (2) deleted text begin $3.50deleted text end new text begin $6new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 50,000,000 gallons but less than 100,000,000 gallons per year; (3) deleted text begin $4deleted text end new text begin $7new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 100,000,000 gallons but less than 150,000,000 gallons per year; (4) deleted text begin $4.50deleted text end new text begin $8new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 150,000,000 gallons but less than 200,000,000 gallons per year; (5) deleted text begin $5deleted text end new text begin $9new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 200,000,000 gallons but less than 250,000,000 gallons per year; (6) deleted text begin $5.50deleted text end new text begin $10new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 250,000,000 gallons but less than 300,000,000 gallons per year; (7) deleted text begin $6deleted text end new text begin $11new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 300,000,000 gallons but less than 350,000,000 gallons per year; (8) deleted text begin $6.50deleted text end new text begin $12new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 350,000,000 gallons but less than 400,000,000 gallons per year; (9) deleted text begin $7deleted text end new text begin $13new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 400,000,000 gallons but less than 450,000,000 gallons per year; (10) deleted text begin $7.50deleted text end new text begin $14new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 450,000,000 gallons but less than 500,000,000 gallons per year; and (11) deleted text begin $8deleted text end new text begin $15new text end per 1,000,000 gallons for amounts greater than 500,000,000 gallons per year. (b) For once-through cooling systems, a water-use processing fee must be prescribed by the commissioner in accordance with the following schedule of fees for each water-use permit in force at any time during the year: (1) for nonprofit corporations and school districts, $200 per 1,000,000 gallons; and (2) for all other users, $420 per 1,000,000 gallons. (c) The fee is payable based on the amount of water appropriated during the year anddeleted text begin , except as provided in paragraph (f),deleted text end the minimum fee is $100. (d) For water-use processing fees other than once-through cooling systems: (1) the fee for a city of the first class may not exceed deleted text begin $250,000deleted text end new text begin $325,000new text end per year; (2) the fee for other entities for any permitted use may not exceed: (i) deleted text begin $60,000deleted text end new text begin $75,000new text end per year for an entity holding three or fewer permits; (ii) deleted text begin $90,000deleted text end new text begin $125,000new text end per year for an entity holding four or five permits; or (iii) deleted text begin $300,000deleted text end new text begin $400,000new text end per year for an entity holding more than five permits; (3) the fee for agricultural irrigation may not exceed deleted text begin $750deleted text end new text begin $1,500new text end per year; (4) the fee for a municipality that furnishes electric service and cogenerates steam for home heating may not exceed $10,000 for its permit for water use related to the cogeneration of electricity and steam; (5) the fee for a facility that temporarily diverts a water of the state from its natural channel to produce hydroelectric or hydromechanical power may not exceed $5,000 per year. A permit for such a facility does not count toward the number of permits held by an entity as described in this paragraph; and (6) no fee is required for a project involving the appropriation of surface water to prevent flood damage or to remove floodwaters during a period of flooding, as determined by the commissioner. (e) Failure to pay the fee is sufficient cause for revoking a permit. A penalty of ten percent per month calculated from the original due date must be imposed on the unpaid balance of fees remaining 30 days after the sending of a second notice of fees due. A fee may not be imposed on an agency, as defined in section 16B.01, subdivision 2, or federal governmental agency holding a water appropriation permit. (f) The minimum water-use processing fee for a permit issued for irrigation of agricultural land is deleted text begin $20deleted text end new text begin $100new text end for years in which: (1) there is no appropriation of water under the permit; or (2) the permit is suspended for more than seven consecutive days between May 1 and October 1. (g) The commissioner shall waive the water-use permit fee for installations and projects that use stormwater runoff or where public entities are diverting water to treat a water quality issue and returning the water to its source without using the water for any other purpose, unless the commissioner determines that the proposed use adversely affects surface water or groundwater. (h) A surcharge of $50 per million gallons in addition to the fee prescribed in paragraph (a) deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end applied to the volume of water used in each of the months of May, June, July, August, and September that exceeds the volume of water used in January for municipal water use, irrigation of golf courses, and landscape irrigation. The surcharge for municipalities with more than one permit deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end determined based on the total appropriations from all permits that supply a common distribution system. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.301, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Permit application and notification fees. (a) A fee to defray the costs of receiving, recording, and processing must be paid for a permit application authorized under this chapter, except for a general permit application, for each request to amend or transfer an existing permit, and for a notification to request authorization to conduct a project under a general permit. Fees established under this subdivision, unless specified in paragraph (c), must comply with section 16A.1285. (b) Proposed projects that require water in excess of 100 million gallons per year must be assessed fees to recover the costs incurred to evaluate the project and the costs incurred for environmental review. Fees collected under this paragraph must be credited to an account in the natural resources fund and are appropriated to the commissioner. (c) The fee to apply for a permit to appropriate water, in addition to any fee under paragraph (b), is deleted text begin $150deleted text end new text begin $600new text end . The application fee for a permit to construct or repair a dam that is subject to a dam safety inspection, to work in public waters, or to divert waters for mining must be at least $1,200, but not more than $12,000. The fee for a notification to request authorization to conduct a project under a general permit is $400, except that the fee for a notification to request authorization to appropriate water under a general permit is $100. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency. new text end Sec. 29. new text begin [115.033] OUTDOOR USE OF RAINWATER AND STORMWATER. new text end new text begin (a) A state agency, political subdivision of the state, joint powers organization, or special purpose unit of government with authority to establish water-quality standards may allow using untreated rainwater or stormwater for outdoor purposes when the probability of consumption or immersion by humans or animals is low or nonexistent. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "using untreated rainwater or stormwater for outdoor purposes" does not include using the water: new text end new text begin (1) as a source of drinking water; new text end new text begin (2) for swimming or immersion; or new text end new text begin (3) for agricultural activities that produce food crops for humans or livestock. new text end Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115B.421, is amended to read: 115B.421 CLOSED LANDFILL INVESTMENT FUND. Subdivision 1. Establishment. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The closed landfill investment fund is established in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund and interest and other earnings on money in the fund. Funds must be deposited as described in section 115B.445. The fund must be managed to maximize long-term gain through the State Board of Investment. deleted text begin (b) Each fiscal year, up to $4,500,000 is appropriated from the closed landfill investment fund to the commissioner for the purposes of sections 115B.39 to 115B.444. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) If the commissioner determines that a release or threatened release from a qualified facility for which the commissioner has assumed obligations for environmental response actions under section 115B.40 or 115B.406 constitutes an emergency requiring immediate action to prevent, minimize, or mitigate damage either to the public health or welfare or the environment or to a system designed to protect the public health or welfare or the environment, up to $9,000,000 in addition to the amount appropriated under paragraph (b) is appropriated to the commissioner in the first year of the biennium and may be spent by the commissioner to take reasonable and necessary emergency response actions. Money not spent in the first year of the biennium may be spent in the second year. If money is appropriated under this paragraph, the commissioner must notify the chairs of the senate and house of representatives committees having jurisdiction over environment policy and finance as soon as possible. The commissioner must maintain the fund balance to ensure long-term viability of the fund and reflect the responsibility of the landfill cleanup program in perpetuity. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) Paragraphs (b) and (c) expire June 30, 2025. deleted text end Subd. 2. Local notification. If money in the closed landfill investment fund is spent or transferred for purposes other than the purposes provided under sections 115B.39 to 115B.444, the commissionernew text begin of the Pollution Control Agencynew text end must provide written notification to each county with a qualified facility within 30 days of the transfer or expenditure that includes the amount, purpose, and authority used to spend or transfer the money. Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.07, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Outreach to culturally diverse communities. new text end new text begin The commissioner must ensure that, to the maximum extent practicable, the commissioner's work and the work of the agency are carried out in a manner that facilitates outreach to and communication with Minnesotans of diverse backgrounds, cultures, and languages. To the maximum extent practicable, public hearings, solicitations for grant proposals, and other interactions with the public must include audiovisual communication components and must not rely exclusively on written forms of communication. new text end Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.073, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authority to issue. (a) Pollution Control Agency staff designated by the commissioner and Department of Natural Resources conservation officers may issue citations to a person who: (1) disposes of solid waste as defined in section 116.06, subdivision 22, at a location not authorized by law for the disposal of solid waste without permission of the owner of the property; (2) fails to report or recover discharges as required under section 115.061; (3) fails to take discharge preventive or preparedness measures required under chapter 115E; (4) fails to install or use vapor recovery equipment during the transfer of gasoline from a transport delivery vehicle to an underground storage tank as required in section 116.49, subdivisions 3 and 4; (5) performs labor or services designing, installing, constructing, inspecting, servicing, repairing, or operating a subsurface sewage treatment system (SSTS) as defined in chapter 115 and has violated rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 in any of the following categories: (i) failure to acquire or maintain a current state-issued SSTS license; (ii) failure to acquire or maintain a current surety bond for SSTS activities; (iii) failure to acquire or maintain a required local permit for SSTS activities; or (iv) failure to submit SSTS as-built plans or compliance inspection forms to the local governmental unit; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (6) performs labor or services pumping, hauling, treating, spreading, dumping, discharging, or land applying septage as defined in Minnesota Rules, part 7080.1100, subpart 69, and has violated rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 or Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 503, in any of the following categories: (i) failure to acquire or maintain a current state-issued SSTS license; (ii) failure to acquire or maintain a current surety bond for SSTS activities; (iii) failure to provide control measures to prevent the pollution of underground waters from the discharge of septage into the saturated or unsaturated zone; (iv) failure to produce records or maintain records in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 503; or (v) failure to treat septage for pathogens and vectors in accordance with Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 503new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (7) fails to self-certify that they have received the skin-lightener notice and will comply with the law, as required by section 325F.998new text end . new text begin (b) Agency staff designated by the commissioner may issue citations to facility owners and operators who fail to produce, within 30 days or within a reasonable alternative time frame as determined and required by the commissioner, information or reports necessary for developing and reissuing permits and permit amendments under chapters 114C and 115 to 116. If the owner or operator cannot produce the information or reports within 30 days or according to an alternative time frame required by the commissioner, the owner or operator may request an extension within 30 days of the request for information or reports. The commissioner must keep records of citations issued under this paragraph that identify the facility, the owner or operator, and any person hired by or representing the owner or operator to prepare or assist in preparing the permit application or other information or report requested by the commissioner. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end In addition, Pollution Control Agency staff designated by the commissioner may issue citations to owners and operators of facilities who violate sections 116.46 to 116.50 and Minnesota Rules, chapters 7150 and 7151 and parts 7001.4200 to 7001.4300. A citation issued under this subdivision must include a requirement that the person cited remove and properly dispose of or otherwise manage the waste or discharged oil or hazardous substance, reimburse any government agency that has disposed of the waste or discharged oil or hazardous substance and contaminated debris for the reasonable costs of disposal, or correct any storage tank violations. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Citations for violations of sections 115E.045 and 116.46 to 116.50 and Minnesota Rules, chapters 7150 and 7151, may be issued only after the owners and operators have had a 60-day period to correct violations stated in writing by Pollution Control Agency staff, unless there is a discharge associated with the violation or the violation is a repeat violation from a previous inspection. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.073, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Penalty amount. The citation must impose the following penalty amounts: (1) $100 per major appliance, as defined in section 115A.03, subdivision 17a, up to a maximum of $2,000; (2) $25 per waste tire, as defined in section 115A.90, subdivision 11, up to a maximum of $2,000; (3) $25 per lead acid battery governed by section 115A.915, up to a maximum of $2,000; (4) $1 per pound of other solid waste or $20 per cubic foot up to a maximum of $2,000; (5) up to $200 for any amount of waste that escapes from a vehicle used for the transportation of solid waste if, after receiving actual notice that waste has escaped the vehicle, the person or company transporting the waste fails to immediately collect the waste; (6) $50 per violation of rules adopted under section 116.49, relating to underground storage tank system design, construction, installation, and notification requirements, up to a maximum of $2,000; (7) $500 per violation of rules adopted under section 116.49, relating to upgrading of existing underground storage tank systems, up to a maximum of $2,000 per tank system; (8) $250 per violation of rules adopted under section 116.49, relating to underground storage tank system general operating requirements, up to a maximum of $2,000; (9) $250 per violation of rules adopted under section 116.49, relating to underground storage tank system release detection requirements, up to a maximum of $2,000; (10) $50 per violation of rules adopted under section 116.49, relating to out-of-service underground storage tank systems and closure, up to a maximum of $2,000; (11) $50 per violation of sections 116.48 to 116.491 relating to underground storage tank system notification, monitoring, environmental protection, and tank installers training and certification requirements, up to a maximum of $2,000; (12) $25 per gallon of oil or hazardous substance discharged which is not reported or recovered under section 115.061, up to a maximum of $2,000; (13) $1 per gallon of oil or hazardous substance being stored, transported, or otherwise handled without the prevention or preparedness measures required under chapter 115E, up to a maximum of $2,000; (14) $250 per violation of Minnesota Rules, parts 7001.4200 to 7001.4300 or chapter 7151, related to aboveground storage tank systems, up to a maximum of $2,000; (15) $250 per delivery made in violation of section 116.49, subdivision 3 or 4, levied against: (i) the retail location if vapor recovery equipment is not installed or maintained properly; (ii) the carrier if the transport delivery vehicle is not equipped with vapor recovery equipment; or (iii) the driver for failure to use supplied vapor recovery equipment; (16) $500 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 relating to failure to comply with state subsurface sewage treatment system (SSTS) license requirements, up to a maximum of $2,000; (17) $500 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 relating to failure to comply with SSTS surety bond requirements, up to a maximum of $2,000; (18) $500 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 relating to failure to provide control measures to prevent the pollution of underground waters from the discharge of septage into the saturated or unsaturated zone, up to a maximum of $2,000; (19) $500 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 or Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 503, relating to failure to treat septage for pathogens and vectors, up to a maximum of $2,000; (20) $250 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 or Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 503, relating to failure to produce records or maintain records, up to a maximum of $2,000; (21) $250 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 or Code of Federal Regulations, title 40, section 503, relating to failure to submit as-built plans or compliance inspection forms to the local governmental unit, up to a maximum of $2,000; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (22) $500 per violation of rules adopted under chapters 115 and 116 relating to failure to obtain required local permits, up to a maximum of $2,000new text begin ;new text end new text begin (23) $100 per violation of section 325F.998, relating to certification that businesses will comply with skin-lightener requirements; and new text end new text begin (24) $50 per day under subdivision 1, paragraph (b), for each information item or report requested for the first 30 days delinquent and $500 per day thereafter, up to a maximum of $20,000 for each information item or report requested, until the commissioner determines the request for information or report is completenew text end . Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.182, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Rules. new text begin (a) new text end The agency shall adopt rules for the administration of the financial assistance program. For wastewater treatment projects, the rules must include: (1) application requirements; (2) criteria for the ranking of projects in order of priority based on factors including the type of project and the degree of environmental impact, and scenic and wild river standards; and (3) criteria for determining essential project components. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any provision in Minnesota Rules, chapter 7077, to the contrary, for purposes of Minnesota Rules, parts 7077.0117, 7077.0118, and 7077.0119, the commissioner must assign 40 points if a municipality is proposing a project to address emerging contaminants, as defined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. This paragraph expires June 30, 2030. new text end Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.943, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Adult mattress" means a mattress other than a crib mattress or toddler mattress. (c) "Air care product" means a chemically formulated consumer product labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to enhance or condition the indoor environment by eliminating odors or freshening the air. (d) "Automotive maintenance product" means a chemically formulated consumer product labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to maintain the appearance of a motor vehicle, including products for washing, waxing, polishing, cleaning, or treating the exterior or interior surfaces of motor vehicles. Automotive maintenance product does not include automotive paint or paint repair products. (e) "Carpet or rug" means a fabric marketed or intended for use as a floor covering. (f) "Cleaning product" means a finished product used primarily for domestic, commercial, or institutional cleaning purposes, including but not limited to an air care product, an automotive maintenance product, a general cleaning product, or a polish or floor maintenance product. (g) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency. (h) "Cookware" means durable houseware items used to prepare, dispense, or store food, foodstuffs, or beverages. Cookware includes but is not limited to pots, pans, skillets, grills, baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls, and cooking utensils. (i) "Cosmetic" means articles, excluding soap: (1) intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for the purpose of cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; and (2) intended for use as a component of any such article. (j) "Currently unavoidable use" means a use of PFAS that the commissioner has determined by rule under this section to be essential for health, safety, or the functioning of society and for which alternatives are not reasonably available. (k) "Fabric treatment" means a substance applied to fabric to give the fabric one or more characteristics, including but not limited to stain resistance or water resistance. (l) "Intentionally added" means PFAS deliberately added during the manufacture of a product where the continued presence of PFAS is desired in the final product or one of the product's components to perform a specific function. (m) "Juvenile product" means a product designed or marketed for use by infants and children under 12 years of age: (1) including but not limited to a baby or toddler foam pillow; bassinet; bedside sleeper; booster seat; changing pad; child restraint system for use in motor vehicles and aircraft; co-sleeper; crib mattress; highchair; highchair pad; infant bouncer; infant carrier; infant seat; infant sleep positioner; infant swing; infant travel bed; infant walker; nap cot; nursing pad; nursing pillow; play mat; playpen; play yard; polyurethane foam mat, pad, or pillow; portable foam nap mat; portable infant sleeper; portable hook-on chair; soft-sided portable crib; stroller; and toddler mattress; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) not including a children's electronic product such as a personal computer, audio and video equipment, calculator, wireless phone, game console, handheld device incorporating a video screen, or any associated peripheral such as a mouse, keyboard, power supply unit, or power cord; or an adult mattressnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) not including: new text end new text begin (i) an off-highway vehicle made for children; new text end new text begin (ii) an all-terrain vehicle made for children; new text end new text begin (iii) an off-highway motorcycle made for children; new text end new text begin (iv) a snowmobile made for children; new text end new text begin (v) an electric-assisted bicycle made for children; or new text end new text begin (vi) a replacement part for a vehicle described in items (i) through (v)new text end . (n) "Manufacturer" means the person that creates or produces a product or whose brand name is affixed to the product. In the case of a product imported into the United States, manufacturer includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the person that manufactured or assembled the product or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a presence in the United States. (o) "Medical device" has the meaning given "device" under United States Code, title 21, section 321, subsection (h). (p) "Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or "PFAS" means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom. (q) "Product" means an item manufactured, assembled, packaged, or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, including but not limited to its product components, sold or distributed for personal, residential, commercial, or industrial use, including for use in making other products. (r) "Product component" means an identifiable component of a product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the product is the manufacturer of the component. (s) "Ski wax" means a lubricant applied to the bottom of snow runners, including but not limited to skis and snowboards, to improve their grip or glide properties. Ski wax includes related tuning products. (t) "Textile" means an item made in whole or part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric. Textile includes but is not limited to leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, and polyester. (u) "Textile furnishings" means textile goods of a type customarily used in households and businesses, including but not limited to draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, bedding, towels, and tablecloths. (v) "Upholstered furniture" means an article of furniture that is designed to be used for sitting, resting, or reclining and that is wholly or partly stuffed or filled with any filling material. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.943, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Prohibitions. (a) Beginning January 1, 2025, a person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this state the following products if the product contains intentionally added PFAS: (1) carpets or rugs; (2) cleaning products; (3) cookware; (4) cosmetics; (5) dental floss; (6) fabric treatments; (7) juvenile products; (8) menstruation products; (9) textile furnishings; (10) ski wax; or (11) upholstered furniture. new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) does not prohibit the sale, offering for sale, or distribution of a product that contains intentionally added PFAS only in internal components that do not come into direct contact with a person's skin or mouth during reasonably foreseeable use or abuse of the product. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner may by rule identify additional products by category or use that may not be sold, offered for sale, or distributed for sale in this state if they contain intentionally added PFAS and designate effective dates. A prohibition adopted under this paragraph must be effective no earlier than January 1, 2025, and no later than January 1, 2032. The commissioner must prioritize the prohibition of the sale of product categories that, in the commissioner's judgment, are most likely to contaminate or harm the state's environment and natural resources if they contain intentionally added PFAS. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Beginning January 1, 2032, a person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in this state any product that contains intentionally added PFAS, unless the commissioner has determined by rule that the use of PFAS in the product is a currently unavoidable use. The commissioner may specify specific products or product categories for which the commissioner has determined the use of PFAS is a currently unavoidable use. The commissioner may not determine that the use of PFAS in a product is a currently unavoidable use if the product is listed in paragraph (a). deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The commissioner may not take action under paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end or deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end with respect to a pesticide, as defined under chapter 18B, a fertilizer, an agricultural liming material, a plant amendment, or a soil amendment as defined under chapter 18C, unless the commissioner of agriculture approves the action. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.3892, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. new text begin (a) new text end For purposes of this section, new text begin the following terms have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b) new text end "Covered product" means any of the following products or product components: (1) jewelry; (2) toys; (3) cosmetics and personal care products; (4) puzzles, board games, card games, and similar games; (5) play sets and play structures; (6) outdoor games; (7) school suppliesnew text begin , except ink pens and mechanical pencilsnew text end ; (8) pots and pans; (9) cups, bowls, and other food containers; (10) craft supplies and jewelry-making supplies; (11) chalk, crayons,new text begin children'snew text end paints, and other art suppliesnew text begin except professional artist materials, including but not limited to oil-based paints, water-based paints, paints, pastels, pigments, ceramic glazes, and markersnew text end ; (12) fidget spinners; (13) costumes, costume accessories, and children's and seasonal party supplies; (14) deleted text begin keys,deleted text end key chainsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end and key rings; and (15) clothing, footwear, headwear, and accessories. new text begin (c) "Pastels" means a crayon composed of powdered pigments bonded with gum or resin. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.3892, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Prohibition. (a) A person must not import, manufacture, sell, hold for sale, or distribute or offer for use in this state any covered product containing: (1) lead at more than 0.009 percent by total weight (90 parts per million); or (2) cadmium at more than 0.0075 percent by total weight (75 parts per million). (b) This section does not apply tonew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end covered products containing lead or cadmium, or both, when regulation is preempted by federal lawnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) covered products that contain lead only in solder used in internal components or in pen tips so long as: new text end new text begin (i) the product is not imported, manufactured, sold, held for sale, distributed, or offered for use in this state after July 1, 2028; and new text end new text begin (ii) the manufacturer of the product submits biennial reports to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency that explain the barriers to removing lead from the product, progress toward adoption of lead-free alternatives, and a timeline for full adoption of those alternativesnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325F.072, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Prohibition. (a) No person, political subdivision, or state agency shall manufacture or knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state, and no person shall use in this state, class B firefighting foam containing PFAS chemicals. (b) This subdivision does not apply to the manufacture, sale, distribution, or use of class B firefighting foam for which the inclusion of PFAS chemicals is required by federal law, including but not limited to Code of Federal Regulations, title 14, section 139.317. If a federal requirement to include PFAS chemicals in class B firefighting foam is revoked after January 1, 2024, class B firefighting foam subject to the revoked requirements is no longer exempt under this paragraph effective one year after the day of revocation. (c) This subdivision does not apply to the manufacture, sale, distribution, or use of class B firefighting foam for purposes of use at an airport, as defined under section 360.013, subdivision 39, until the state fire marshal makes a determination that: (1) the Federal Aviation Administration has provided policy guidance on the transition to fluorine-free firefighting foam; (2) a fluorine-free firefighting foam product is included in the Federal Aviation Administration's Qualified Product Database; and (3) a firefighting foam product included in the database under clause (2) is commercially available in quantities sufficient to reliably meet the requirements under Code of Federal Regulations, title 14, part 139. (d) Until the state fire marshal makes a determination under paragraph (c), the operator of an airport using class B firefighting foam containing PFAS chemicals must, on or before December 31 each calendar year, submit a report to the state fire marshal regarding the status of the airport's conversion to class B firefighting foam products without intentionally added PFAS, the disposal of class B firefighting foam products with intentionally added PFAS, and an assessment of the factors listed in paragraph (c) as applied to the airport. new text begin (e) Until January 1, 2028, this subdivision does not apply to the manufacture, sale, distribution, or use of class B firefighting foam for use in hangar fixed firefighting systems at an airport, as defined under section 360.013, subdivision 39. The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency, in consultation with the state fire marshal, may provide the operator of an airport using class B firefighting foam containing PFAS chemicals one year extensions beyond this date upon a showing that the need for additional time is beyond the operator's control and that public safety and the environment will be protected during the period of the extension. new text end Sec. 40. new text begin [325F.998] SKIN-LIGHTENER NOTICE REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Notice required. new text end new text begin After August 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must send a notice to retailers who sell skin-lightening products that states that selling skin-lightening products that contain mercury is illegal and subject to penalties. Additionally, the commissioner must engage in outreach to retailers who sell skin-lightening products in order to convey the dangers of using skin-lightening products that contain mercury. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certification. new text end new text begin Businesses who receive notice from the commissioner must self-certify on a form prescribed by the commissioner that they have received the notice and will comply with the law. new text end Sec. 41. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 446A.07, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Other uses of revolving fund. (a) The clean water revolving fund may be used as provided in title VI of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, including the following uses: (1) to buy or refinance the debt obligation of governmental units for treatment works where debt was incurred and construction begun after March 7, 1985, at or below market rates; (2) to guarantee or purchase insurance for local obligations to improve credit market access or reduce interest rates; (3) to provide a source of revenue or security for the payment of principal and interest on revenue or general obligation bonds issued by the authority if the bond proceeds are deposited in the fund; (4) to provide loan guarantees, loans, or set-aside for similar revolving funds established by a governmental unit other than state agencies, or state agencies under sections 17.117, 103F.725, subdivision 1a, and 116J.617; (5) to earn interest on fund accounts;new text begin and new text end (6) to pay the reasonable costs incurred by the authority and the Pollution Control Agency of administering the fund and conducting activities required under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, including water quality management planning under section 205(j) of the act and water quality standards continuing planning under section 303(e) of the actdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin (b) The clean water revolving fund may be used to provide additional subsidization as permitted under the federal Water Pollution Control Act and other federal law to provide principal forgiveness or grants: new text end deleted text begin (7) to provide principal forgiveness or grants to the extent permitted under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and other federal law,deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end based on deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin affordabilitynew text end criteria and requirements established for the deleted text begin wastewaterdeleted text end new text begin water new text end infrastructure funding program under section 446A.072; deleted text begin anddeleted text end deleted text begin (8) to provide loans, principal forgiveness, or grants to the extent permitted under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and other federal lawdeleted text end new text begin (2) for 25 percent of project costs up to a maximum of $1,000,000 for projectsnew text end to address green infrastructure, water or energy efficiency improvements, or other environmentally innovative activitiesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (3) for 50 percent of project costs up to a maximum of $3,000,000 for projects that address emerging contaminants as defined by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. new text end deleted text begin (b) Amounts spent under paragraph (a), clause (6), may not exceed the amount allowed under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) Principal forgiveness or grants provided under paragraph (a), clause (8), may not exceed 25 percent of the eligible project costs as determined by the Pollution Control Agency for project components directly related to green infrastructure, water or energy efficiency improvements, or other environmentally innovative activities, up to a maximum of $1,000,000. deleted text end Sec. 42. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.355, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Grants. (a) The Metropolitan Council must establish a grant program to provide grants to cities, counties, townships, new text begin Tribal governments, new text end and implementing agencies for the following purposes: (1) removing and planting shade trees on public land to provide environmental benefits; (2) replacing trees lost to forest pests, disease, or storms; and (3) establishing a more diverse community forest better able to withstand disease and forest pests. (b) Any tree planted with money granted under this section must be a climate-adapted species to Minnesota. Sec. 43. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 473.859, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Land use plan. (a) A land use plan must include the water management plan required by section 103B.235, and shall designate the existing and proposed location, intensity and extent of use of land and water, including lakes, wetlands, rivers, streams, natural drainage courses, and adjoining land areas that affect water natural resources, for agricultural, residential, commercial, industrial and other public and private purposes, or any combination of such purposes. (b) A land use plan must contain a protection element, as appropriate, for historic sites, the matters listed in the water management plan required by section 103B.235, and an element for protection and development of access to direct sunlight for solar energy systems. (c) A land use plan must also include a housing element containing standards, plans and programs for providing adequate housing opportunities to meet existing and projected local and regional housing needs, including but not limited to the use of official controls and land use planning to promote the availability of land for the development of low and moderate income housing. (d) A land use plan must also include new text begin an assessment of the impact of all land use designations and easements on access to aggregate resources and new text end the local government's goals, intentions, and priorities concerning aggregate and other natural resources, transportation infrastructure, land use compatibility, habitat, agricultural preservation, and other planning priorities, considering information regarding supply from the Minnesota Geological Survey Information Circular No. 46. (e) A land use plan must also include an inventory and projections pertaining to greenhouse gas emissions and vehicle miles traveled that are generated from activity that occurs within the local government's jurisdiction. The inventory and projections must include the emission sources from transportation, land use, energy use, solid waste, and, where available and applicable, livestock and agriculture. The inventory and projections must include the estimated impact of strategies, including efficient land use and compact growth, that reduce or naturally sequester greenhouse gas emissions across sectors. Sec. 44. Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Environmental Analysis and Outcomes 79,311,000 72,785,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 60,103,000 53,047,000 Environmental 18,959,000 19,533,000 Remediation 249,000 205,000 (a) $122,000 the first year and $125,000 the second year are from the general fund for: (1) a municipal liaison to assist municipalities in implementing and participating in the rulemaking process for water quality standards and navigating the NPDES/SDS permitting process; (2) enhanced economic analysis in the rulemaking process for water quality standards, including more-specific analysis and identification of cost-effective permitting; (3) developing statewide economic analyses and templates to reduce the amount of information and time required for municipalities to apply for variances from water quality standards; and (4) coordinating with the Public Facilities Authority to identify and advocate for the resources needed for urban, suburban, and Greater Minnesota municipalities to achieve permit requirements. (b) $216,000 the first year and $219,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for a monitoring program under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.454. (c) $132,000 the first year and $137,000 the second year are for monitoring water quality and operating assistance programs. (d) $390,000 the first year and $399,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for monitoring ambient air for hazardous pollutants. (e) $106,000 the first year and $109,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for duties related to harmful chemicals in children's products under Minnesota Statutes, sections 116.9401 to 116.9407. Of this amount, $68,000 the first year and $70,000 the second year are transferred to the commissioner of health. (f) $128,000 the first year and $132,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for registering wastewater laboratories. (g) $1,492,000 the first year and $1,519,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to continue perfluorochemical biomonitoring in eastern metropolitan communities, as recommended by the Environmental Health Tracking and Biomonitoring Advisory Panel, and to address other environmental health risks, including air quality. The communities must include Hmong and other immigrant farming communities. Of this amount, up to $1,226,000 the first year and $1,248,000 the second year are for transfer to the commissioner of health. (h) $61,000 the first year and $62,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for the listing procedures for impaired waters required under this act. (i) $72,000 the first year and $74,000 the second year are from the remediation fund for the leaking underground storage tank program to investigate, clean up, and prevent future releases from underground petroleum storage tanks and for the petroleum remediation program for vapor assessment and remediation. These same annual amounts are transferred from the petroleum tank fund to the remediation fund. (j) $500,000 the first year is to facilitate the collaboration and modeling of greenhouse gas impacts, costs, and benefits of strategies to reduce statewide greenhouse gas emissions. This is a onetime appropriation. (k) $50,266,000 the first year and $50,270,000 the second year are to establish and implement a local government climate resiliency and water infrastructure grant program for local governmental units and Tribal governments. Of this amount, $49,100,000 each year is for grants to support communities in planning and implementing projects that will allow for adaptation for a changing climate. At least 40 percent of the money granted under this paragraph must be for projects in areas that meet environmental justice criteria. By December 30, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report on the use of grant money to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $270,000. (l) $75,000 the first year is for a grant to the city of Fergus Falls to address water-quality concerns at Lake Alice. (m) $150,000 the first year is for a grant to Rice County to address water-quality concerns at French Lake. (n) $75,000 the first year is for a grant to Ramsey County to address water-quality concerns at Round Lake. (o) Recipients of money appropriated in paragraphs (l), (m), and (n) may use the grants to contract for water-quality improvement services, testing, necessary infrastructure, training, and maintenance. (p) $2,070,000 the first year and $2,070,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to develop and implement a program related to emerging issues, including Minnesota's PFAS Blueprint. (q) $1,820,000 the first year and $1,820,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to support improved management of data collected by the agency and its partners and regulated parties to facilitate decision-making and public access. (r) $500,000 the first year is from the general fund for the report on firefighter turnout gear and biomonitoring required under this act. Of this amount, up to deleted text begin $250,000deleted text end new text begin $425,000new text end may be transferred to the commissioner of health for biomonitoring of firefighters. new text begin This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027.new text end (s) $500,000 the first year is to develop protocols to be used by agencies and departments for sampling and testing groundwater, surface water, public drinking water, and private wells for microplastics and nanoplastics and to begin implementation. The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency may transfer money appropriated under this paragraph to the commissioners of agriculture, natural resources, and health to implement the protocols developed. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2025. (t) $50,000 the first year is from the remediation fund for the work group on PFAS manufacturer fees and report required under this act. (u) $387,000 the first year and $90,000 the second year are to develop and implement the requirements for fish kills under Minnesota Statutes, sections 103G.216 and 103G.2165. Of this amount, up to $331,000 the first year and $90,000 the second year may be transferred to the commissioners of health, natural resources, agriculture, and public safety and to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota as necessary to implement those sections. The base for this appropriation for fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $7,000. (v) $63,000 the first year and $92,000 the second year are for transfer to the commissioner of health for amending the health risk limit for PFOS. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. (w) $5,000,000 the first year is for community air-monitoring grants as provided in this act. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (x) $2,333,000 the first year and $2,333,000 the second year are to adopt rules and implement air toxics emissions requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.062. The general fund appropriations are onetime and are available until June 30, 2027. The base for this appropriation is $0 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,400,000 from the environmental fund in fiscal year 2027 and beyond. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2023. new text end Sec. 45. Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 2, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Resource Management and Assistance 82,000,000 57,974,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 38,464,000 13,850,000 Environmental 43,536,000 44,124,000 (a) Up to $150,000 the first year and $150,000 the second year may be transferred from the environmental fund to the small business environmental improvement loan account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.993. (b) $1,000,000 the first year and $1,000,000 the second year are for competitive recycling grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.565. Of this amount, $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are from the general fund, and $700,000 the first year and $700,000 the second year are from the environmental fund. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (c) $694,000 the first year and $694,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for emission-reduction activities and grants to small businesses and other nonpoint-emission-reduction efforts. Of this amount, $100,000 the first year and $100,000 the second year are to continue work with Clean Air Minnesota, and the commissioner may enter into an agreement with Environmental Initiative to support this effort. (d) $18,450,000 the first year and $18,450,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for SCORE block grants to counties. (e) $119,000 the first year and $119,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for environmental assistance grants or loans under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.0716. (f) $400,000 the first year and $400,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for grants to develop and expand recycling markets for Minnesota businesses. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (g) $767,000 the first year and $770,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for reducing and diverting food waste, redirecting edible food for consumption, and removing barriers to collecting and recovering organic waste. Of this amount, $500,000 each year is for grants to increase food rescue and waste prevention. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. (h) $2,797,000 the first year and $2,811,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 473.844. (i) $318,000 the first year and $324,000 the second year are from the environmental fund to address chemicals in products, including to implement and enforce flame retardant provisions under Minnesota Statutes, section 325F.071, and perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances in food packaging provisions under Minnesota Statutes, section 325F.075. Of this amount, $78,000 the first year and $80,000 the second year are transferred to the commissioner of health. (j) $180,000 the first year and $140,000 the second year are for quantifying climate-related impacts from projects for environmental review. This is a onetime appropriation. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. (k) $1,790,000 the first year and $70,000 the second year are for accelerating pollution prevention at small businesses. Of this amount, $1,720,000 the first year isnew text begin for transfer to the environmental fundnew text end for zero-interest loansnew text begin under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.993,new text end to phase out high-polluting equipment, products, and processes and replace with new options. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. This is a onetime appropriation. (l) $190,000 the first year and $190,000 the second year are to support the Greenstep Cities program. This is a onetime appropriation. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2026. (m) $420,000 the first year is to complete a study on the viability of recycling solar energy equipment. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. (n) $650,000 the first year and $650,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for Minnesota GreenCorps investment. (o) $4,210,000 the first year and $210,000 the second year are for PFAS reduction grants. Of this amount, $4,000,000 the first year is for grants to industry and public entities to identify sources of PFAS entering facilities and to develop pollution prevention and reduction initiatives to reduce PFAS entering facilities, prevent releases, and monitor the effectiveness of these projects. Priority must be given to projects in underserved communities. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (p) $12,940,000 the first year and $12,940,000 the second year are for a waste prevention and reduction grants and loan program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. Of this amount in the first year, $7,950,000 is for waste prevention and reduction grants and loans and $3,000,000 is for a grant to the owner of a biomass energy generation plant in Shakopee that uses waste heat from the generation of electricity in the malting process to purchase a wood dehydrator to facilitate disposal of wood that is infested by the emerald ash borer. Of this amount in the second year, $10,950,000 is for waste prevention and reduction grants and loansnew text begin , including $1,000,000 for transfer to the environmental fund for the purposes of Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.0716new text end . By October 1, 2024, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources on the use of money appropriated for the wood dehydrator under this paragraph. (q) $16,562,000 the first year is for grants to a Minnesota nonprofit corporation that owns a cogeneration facility that serves a St. Paul district heating and cooling system to preserve existing biomass energy infrastructure for purposes of local and regional emerald ash borer response efforts. The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency may require the nonprofit corporation to charge a fee per ton of wood waste delivered to the facility. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2030. (r) $1,163,000 the first year and $1,115,000 the second year are from the environmental fund for rulemaking and implementation of the new PFAS requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 116.943. Of this amount, $312,000 the first year and $468,000 the second year are for transfer to the commissioner of health. (s) $680,000 the first year is for the resource management report required in this act. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. (t) $35,000 the second year is from the environmental fund for the compostable labeling requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 325E.046. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $68,000 from the environmental fund. (u) $175,000 the first year is for the rulemaking required under this act providing for the safe and lawful disposal of waste treated seed. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2025. (v) $1,000,000 the first year is for a lead tackle reduction program that provides outreach, education, and opportunities to safely dispose of and exchange lead tackle throughout the state. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (w) $17,000 the first year is for rulemaking for the capital assistance program. This is a onetime appropriation. (x) Any unencumbered grant and loan balances in the first year do not cancel but are available for grants and loans in the second year. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, the appropriations encumbered on or before June 30, 2025, as contracts or grants for environmental assistance awarded under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.0716; technical and research assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.152; technical assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 115A.52; and pollution prevention assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 115D.04, are available until June 30, 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2023. new text end Sec. 46. Laws 2023, chapter 60, article 1, section 3, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Fish and Wildlife Management 111,125,000 96,963,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General 23,643,000 9,888,000 Natural Resources 2,082,000 2,082,000 Game and Fish 85,400,000 84,993,000 (a) $11,158,000 the first year and $11,158,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund only for activities specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, paragraph (h), clause (1). Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, five percent of this appropriation may be used for expanding hunter and angler recruitment and retention. (b) $982,000 the first year and $982,000 the second year are from the general fund and $1,675,000 the first year and $1,675,000 the second year are from the game and fish fund for statewide response and management of chronic wasting disease. The commissioner and the Board of Animal Health must each submit annual reports on chronic wasting disease activities funded in this biennium to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and agriculture. The general fund base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $282,000. (c) $5,150,000 the first year and $3,250,000 the second year are for inspections, investigations, and enforcement activities taken for the white-tailed deer farm program and for statewide response and management of chronic wasting disease. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2029. (d) $8,546,000 the first year and $8,546,000 the second year are from the deer management account for the purposes identified in Minnesota Statutes, section 97A.075, subdivision 1. (e) $268,000 the first year and $268,000 the second year are for increased capacity for broadband utility licensing for state lands and public waters. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. (f) $10,000,000 the first year is for enhancing prairies and grasslands and restoring wetlands on state-owned wildlife management areas to sequester more carbon and enhance climate resiliency. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (g) $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the general fund and $500,000 the first year and $500,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for grants for natural-resource-based education and recreation programs serving youth under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.976, and for grant administration. Priority must be given to projects benefiting underserved communities. The base for this appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and beyond is $500,000 from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund. The general fund appropriation is onetime. (h) $2,300,000 the first year is for a grant to the Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa to expand Minnesota's wild elk population and range. Consideration must be given to moving elk from existing herds in northwest Minnesota to the area of the Fond du Lac State Forest and the Fond du Lac Reservation in Carlton and southern St. Louis Counties. The Fond du Lac Band of Lake Superior Chippewa's elk reintroduction efforts must undergo thorough planning with the Department of Natural Resources to develop necessary capture and handling protocols, including protocols related to cervid disease management, and to produce postrelease state and Tribal elk comanagement plans. Of this amount, $300,000 is for the department for the purposes of this paragraph. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2026. (i) $767,000 the first year is from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund to examine the effects of neonicotinoid exposure on the reproduction and survival of Minnesota's game species, including deer and prairie chicken. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (j) $134,000 the first year and $134,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for native fish conservation and classification. (k) $82,000 the first year is for the native fish reports required under this act. This is a onetime appropriation. (l) $65,000 the first year is for preparing the report on feral pigs and mink required under this act and holding at least one public meeting on the topic. (m) Up to $5,750,000 the first year and up to $2,225,000 the second year are available for transfer from the critical habitat private sector matching account to the reinvest in Minnesota fund for wildlife management areas acquisition, restoration, and enhancement according to Minnesota Statutes, section 84.943, subdivision 5b. (n) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.94, $300,000 the first year and $300,000 the second year are from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for shooting sports facility grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 87A.10, including grants for archery facilities. Grants must be matched with a nonstate match, which may include in-kind contributions. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . deleted text begin This appropriation must be allocated as follows:deleted text end deleted text begin (1) $200,000 each fiscal year is for grants of $25,000 or less; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $100,000 each fiscal year is for grants in excess of $25,000. deleted text end (o) $75,000 the first year is from the heritage enhancement account in the game and fish fund for enhanced fish stocking of white bass and crappies in lakes in the metropolitan area that have pier and shore fishing opportunities where communities are currently underserved. (p) $1,633,000 the first year is for a grant to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for chronic wasting disease contingency plans developed by the Center for Infectious Disease Research and Policy. This is a onetime appropriation. (q) $900,000 the first year is to create new or expand existing outreach and education programs for non-native English-speaking communities. Of this amount, $250,000 is for the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency and $250,000 is for the Board of Water and Soil Resources for this purpose. Up to $400,000 may be used to expand the Fishing in the Neighborhood program for outreach to new and underserved audiences. This appropriation may be used for community outreach consultants for reaching new audiences. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 47. new text begin MINNESOTA SUSTAINABLE FORAGING TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force shall consist of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) two members of the senate, one appointed by the majority leader of the senate and one appointed by the minority leader of the senate; new text end new text begin (2) two members of the house of representatives, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; new text end new text begin (3) two members appointed by the Minnesota Mycological Society, of which one member must be an owner of a small business; new text end new text begin (4) two members appointed by the Minnesota Foraging Alliance, of which one member must be from an underrepresented cultural group; new text end new text begin (5) two scientists with expertise in botany, ecology, and environmental science appointed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota; new text end new text begin (6) three representatives of the Department of Natural Resources involved with managing state parks, forestry, fish and wildlife, and public lands appointed by the commissioner of natural resources; new text end new text begin (7) one member of the Minnesota Ojibwe Tribe appointed by the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council; new text end new text begin (8) one member of the Minnesota Dakota Tribe appointed by the Minnesota Indian Affairs Council; and new text end new text begin (9) two representatives with expertise on local ecosystems, species recovery, and sustainable harvesting appointed by the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota Extension. new text end new text begin (b) A member appointed under paragraph (a) may not be a registered lobbyist. new text end new text begin (c) The appointing authorities must make the appointments by August 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) gather and review data and information, including traditional ecological knowledge, on the impact of foraging on species resilience, ecosystem health, and other aspects of Minnesota's diverse biomes; new text end new text begin (2) review existing regulations governing foraging activities on state lands; new text end new text begin (3) develop recommendations for science-based, including traditional ecological knowledge, foraging guidelines for state lands that balance public access with conservation needs, setting limits on foraging activities only where supported by data. The recommendations must be in the form of draft statutory or rule language and must be consistent with Indigenous and other cultural practices and traditions; new text end new text begin (4) develop recommendations for increasing public understanding of sustainable foraging practices that include safety and ecological considerations; new text end new text begin (5) solicit public input, when appropriate; and new text end new text begin (6) develop recommendations for reduced-priced foraging permits. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Administrative support; meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The Legislative Coordinating Commission must provide administrative support and convene the first meeting by September 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of natural resources must provide subject matter resources and expertise, including information on the management of, and flora and fauna on, state lands, as requested by the task force. new text end new text begin (c) The task force must meet at regular intervals as often as necessary to accomplish the goals enumerated under subdivision 2. Meetings of the task force are subject to the Minnesota Open Meeting Law under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Chair. new text end new text begin The task force must elect a chair at its first meeting from among the legislative members. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Legislative recommendations; expiration. new text end new text begin By February 28, 2026, the task force must submit a written report containing its findings and recommendations to the commissioner of natural resources and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over natural resources policy. The recommendations in the report must be specific and actionable. The report must detail the proposals for changes or additions to statute or rules to effectuate the task force's recommendations. The task force expires March 15, 2026, or upon submission of the report required by this subdivision, whichever occurs later. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Compensation; expense reimbursement. new text end new text begin Members of the task force appointed under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (2), may receive per diem and reimbursement for expenses as provided in the rules of their respective bodies. Other members of the task force may be compensated and have expenses reimbursed as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 3. new text end Sec. 48. new text begin MORATORIUM ON FORAGING RULES.new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources shall not commence or complete any rulemaking on foraging before July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 49. new text begin EXTENSION OF CERTAIN TIMBER PERMITS.new text end new text begin If the holder of a timber permit that expires in 2025 has been unable to cut and remove some or all of the timber described in the permit, then, notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 90, the commissioner of natural resources must grant an extension of the permit for two years without penalty or interest upon written request to the commissioner by the holder of the permit. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 50. new text begin AUDIT OF AGGREGATE TAX AND THE USE OF THE REVENUES COLLECTED BY COUNTIES.new text end new text begin The Office of the Legislative Auditor is directed to conduct a program audit of the aggregate production tax established by Minnesota Statutes, section 298.75, to include the following by individual participating county and covering all fiscal years since the county established the tax: new text end new text begin (1) a report on total revenues collected by fiscal year; new text end new text begin (2) a report on how revenues are distributed between maintenance, construction, and reconstruction of roads, highways, and bridges; new text end new text begin (3) a report as to the funding priority given to roads, highways, and bridges that service or are impacted by aggregate operations; new text end new text begin (4) a report as to whether the county distributes aggregate tax revenues on a project or formula basis; new text end new text begin (5) a report as to distribution and expenditure of funds for aggregate mine reclamation activities; and new text end new text begin (6) a report on how tax revenue deposited in the special reserve fund established in Minnesota Statutes, section 298.75, subdivision 7, paragraph (c), clause (3), has been expended since each county began collecting the tax. new text end Sec. 51. new text begin RECOMMENDATIONS FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT PERMITTING CHANGES TO PROTECT AGGREGATE RESOURCES.new text end new text begin By February 1, 2027, the commissioner of natural resources, in consultation with the Minnesota Asphalt Paving Association, the Aggregate and Ready Mix Association of Minnesota, the Association of Minnesota Counties, and other interested stakeholders, must make recommendations to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with primary jurisdiction over environment and local government for statutory changes that would facilitate local government permitting processes that adequately protect the state's aggregate resources and foster environmentally responsible reclamation of former aggregate mining sites. new text end Sec. 52. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 103E.067; 116C.04, subdivision 11; 116C.991; and 116D.04, subdivision 5b, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 5 STATE LANDS Section 1. new text begin ADDITION TO STATE PARK.new text end new text begin [85.012] [Subd. 11] Carley State Park, Wabasha County. The following area is added to Carley State Park: That part of Section 32, Township 108 North, Range 11 West, Wabasha County, Minnesota, described as follows: Beginning at the South Quarter corner stake of said Section 32; thence North 15-1/2 degrees East along road 425 feet; thence North 17 degrees East 290 feet; thence North 53 degrees East 280 feet; thence North 17 degrees East 115 feet; thence North 6-1/2 degrees West 643 feet; thence North 72-1/2 degrees West 720 feet; thence North across river 690 feet; thence South 62 degrees East 263 feet along northerly bank of river; thence North 250 feet to center of said Section 32; thence East 1,320 feet; thence North 440 feet to river; thence North 54-1/2 degrees East 224 feet along center of river; thence North 75 degrees East 192 feet; thence South 49 degrees East 115 feet; thence North 79 degrees East 155 feet; thence North 62 degrees East 232 feet; thence North 86 degrees East 293 feet; thence North 64 degrees East 255 feet; thence South 3,368 feet, more or less to the southeast corner of Section 32; thence West 2,643.13 feet to the place of beginning. new text end new text begin EXCEPTING therefrom that portion lying West of the centerline of Wabasha County Road No. 4 owned by the State of Minnesota and A. M. Christenson. new text end new text begin ALSO EXCEPTING that part of the East Half of Section 32, Township 108 North, Range 11 West, Wabasha County, Minnesota, described as follows: Beginning at the South Quarter corner stake of said Section 32; thence North 15-1/2 degrees East along road 425 feet; thence North 17 degrees East 290 feet; thence North 53 degrees East 280 feet; thence South 80 degrees 02 minutes 23 seconds East 304.46 feet; thence North 6 degrees 12 minutes 49 seconds West 483.31 feet; thence South 89 degrees 54 minutes 25 seconds East 386.31 feet; thence North 1 degree 39 minutes 32 seconds East 358.66 feet; thence North 36 degrees 14 minutes 35 seconds East 693.46 feet; thence North 81 degrees 03 minutes 15 seconds East 349.81 feet; thence North 1 degree 49 minutes 43 seconds West 298.16 feet; thence North 79 degrees 04 minutes 47 seconds East 529.39 feet; thence South 35 degrees 46 minutes 01 seconds East to the east line of the Southeast Quarter of Section 32; thence southerly along the east line of said Southeast Quarter to the southeast corner of said Southeast Quarter of Section 32; thence on a bearing of West along the south line of said Southeast Quarter 2,643.13 feet to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; AITKIN COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, Aitkin County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited land described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in Aitkin County and is described as: the West 20 feet of the East 932 feet of the South 208 feet of the Southeast Quarter of the Southeast Quarter, as in DOC 203542, Section 32, Township 46 North, Range 25 West (0.1 acres) (parcel number 09-0-054803). new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the lands were returned to private ownership. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; AITKIN COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, Aitkin County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited lands described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in Aitkin County and is described as: the East 32 feet of the West 250 feet of Lot 5 and the East 32 feet of the West 250 feet of the North 10 feet of Lot 3, Hill City Realty Cos Fourth Addition, Section 14, Township 52 North, Range 26 West, Aitkin County, Minnesota (0.1 acres) (parcel number 57-1-073003). new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the lands were returned to private ownership. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; ITASCA COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, Itasca County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited lands described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The lands to be sold are located in Itasca County and are described as: That part of the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter, Section 15, Township 59 North, Range 24 west of the Fourth Principal Meridian, Itasca County, Minnesota, further described as follows: Commencing at the northwest corner of said Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence North 89 degrees 01 minutes 34 seconds East, assigned bearing, along the north line of said Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter a distance of 255.80 feet to the point of beginning; thence South 10 degrees 50 minutes 31 seconds East a distance of 604.37 feet; thence North 55 degrees 26 minutes 17 seconds East a distance of 672.63 feet, more or less to the centerline of County Road 52; thence North 51 degrees 32 minutes 12 seconds West along said centerline a distance of 351.56 feet to said north line of the Southwest Quarter of the Southeast Quarter; thence South 89 degrees 01 minutes 34 seconds West along said north line a distance of 392.39 feet to the point of beginning. new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the lands were returned to private ownership. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin PRIVATE SALE OF TAX-FORFEITED LAND; ST. LOUIS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding the public sale provisions of Minnesota Statutes, chapter 282, or other law to the contrary, St. Louis County may sell by private sale the tax-forfeited land described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The conveyance must be in a form approved by the attorney general. The attorney general may make changes to the land description to correct errors and ensure accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The land to be sold is located in St. Louis County and is described as: new text end new text begin (1) the easterly 15 feet of Lot 5, Block 47, West Duluth 6th Division, Section 7, Township 49, Range 14 (parcel number 010-4520-06505); and new text end new text begin (2) that part of the Northwest Quarter of the Northwest Quarter described as follows: beginning at the northwest corner continue due East parallel with the north boundary line a distance of 330 feet to a point of beginning; thence due South parallel with the west boundary line a distance of 400 feet to a point; thence due East parallel with the north boundary line a distance of 190 feet to a point; thence due North parallel with the west boundary a distance of 60 feet to a point; thence due East parallel with the north boundary line a distance of 140 feet to a point; thence due North parallel with the west boundary line a distance of 340 feet to a point; thence due West parallel with the north boundary line a distance of 330 feet to the point of beginning, Section 14, Township 54, Range 20 (parcel number 550-0020-02294). new text end new text begin (d) The county has determined that the county's land management interests would best be served if the lands were returned to private ownership. new text end ARTICLE 6 ELECTRONIC WASTE AND BATTERY STEWARDSHIP Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115.071, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Remedies available. The provisions of sections 103F.701 to 103F.755, this chapter and chapters 114C, 115A, and 116, and sections 325E.10 to deleted text begin 325E.1251deleted text end new text begin 325E.12new text end and 325E.32 and all rules, standards, orders, stipulation agreements, schedules of compliance, and permits adopted or issued by the agency thereunder or under any other law now in force or hereafter enacted for the prevention, control, or abatement of pollution may be enforced by any one or any combination of the following: criminal prosecution; action to recover civil penalties; injunction; action to compel or cease performance; or other appropriate action, in accordance with the provisions of said chapters and this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115A.121, is amended to read: 115A.121 TOXICS AND POLLUTION PREVENTION EVALUATION; CONSOLIDATED REPORT. The commissioner shall prepare and adopt a report on pollution prevention activities required in chapters 115A, 115D, and 325E. deleted text begin The report must include activities required under section 115A.1320.deleted text end The commissioner must submit the report to the senate and house of representatives committees having jurisdiction over environment and natural resources by December 31, 2013, and every four years thereafter. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [115A.1331] STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM FOR CIRCUIT BOARDS, BATTERIES, AND ELECTRICAL PRODUCTS; DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin (a) The terms used in sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 have the meanings given in this section. new text end new text begin (b) "Battery" means one or more galvanic cells, including any structural members, insulative casing, and terminals. new text end new text begin (c) "Board" means the Covered Products Reimbursement Board established under section 115A.1333. new text end new text begin (d) "Brand" means a trademark, including both a registered and an unregistered trademark; a logo; a name; a symbol; a word; an identifier; or a traceable mark that identifies a covered product or other electrical product and identifies the owner or licensee of the brand as the producer of the product. new text end new text begin (e) "Circuit board" means a nonconductive substrate onto which one or more layers of conductive paths have been printed or wires attached for mounting and interconnecting electronic components, such as resistors, capacitors, diodes, transistors, integrated circuit chips, and connecting wires. Circuit boards include printed circuit boards, printed wiring boards, and any other style or type of circuit board. new text end new text begin (f) "Collection site" means a physical location where a collector collects covered products and other electrical products from members of the public and businesses. Collection site includes a location regardless of whether it is operated permanently, temporarily, or for purposes of a collection event. new text end new text begin (g) "Collector" means a person that collects covered products and other electrical products on behalf of the stewardship organization and receives reimbursement from the stewardship organization for the collector's costs to collect and manage the products. new text end new text begin (h) "Covered battery" means a battery of any type, physical size, or energy capacity including but not limited to batteries designed and marketed for sale or resale for use in lawn care equipment as defined in section 181A.116, off-highway vehicles, snowmobiles, watercraft, tools, household items, lights, or devices powered by an internal combustion engine. A covered battery does not include: new text end new text begin (1) a lead acid battery subject to sections 325E.115 and 325E.1151; new text end new text begin (2) a battery designed, manufactured, and intended solely for use in manufacturing, industrial, or other commercial settings; or new text end new text begin (3) a battery designed, manufactured, and intended solely for use in a medical device, as defined in the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, United States Code, title 21, section 301 et seq. new text end new text begin (i) "Covered circuit board" means any circuit board except a circuit board from: new text end new text begin (1) a major appliance; new text end new text begin (2) an appliance or tool powered by electrical power of equal to or greater than 240 volts alternating current; or new text end new text begin (3) an appliance or tool designed, manufactured, and intended solely for use in manufacturing, industrial, or other commercial settings. new text end new text begin (j) "Covered product" means: new text end new text begin (1) a covered circuit board; new text end new text begin (2) a covered battery; new text end new text begin (3) a cathode-ray tube; or new text end new text begin (4) a product that has a covered circuit board, a covered battery, or a cathode-ray tube contained within it or otherwise attached or connected to it, except: new text end new text begin (i) a medical device, as defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, United States Code, title 21, section 301 et seq.; new text end new text begin (ii) any device powered by an internal combustion engine; new text end new text begin (iii) an off-highway vehicle, watercraft, or snowmobile; and new text end new text begin (iv) a motor vehicle, as defined in section 168.002. new text end new text begin (k) "Covered services" means collection, sorting, storage, transport, processing, repair, refurbishment, reuse, recycling, reclamation of useful materials from, or disposal of covered products, other electrical products, and residual materials. new text end new text begin (l) "De minimis producer" means a producer that, in the most recent calendar year, had fewer than 100 covered products that were sold in or into the state and for which the producer was responsible. new text end new text begin (m) "Facilitate a sale" means to assist a person in transferring title or possession of a covered product or other electrical product, regardless of whether title or possession is ever acquired by the person facilitating a sale, such as by operating an online marketplace, publishing an offer for sale on a website, physically storing inventory of products, entering into a contract to allow another person to list a product for sale, processing payment on behalf of another person, entering into a contract with a buyer or a seller related to a sale, or otherwise providing a sales process. Facilitate a sale does not include acting solely as: new text end new text begin (1) an advertiser; new text end new text begin (2) a payment processor; or new text end new text begin (3) a common carrier. new text end new text begin (n) "Full collection site" means a collection site that meets the requirements of section 115A.1341, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (o) "Household hazardous waste collection program" means a program established under section 115A.96 to collect and manage household hazardous waste as defined in that section. new text end new text begin (p) "Independent auditor" means an independent and actively licensed certified public accountant that is: new text end new text begin (1) retained by the stewardship organization; new text end new text begin (2) not otherwise employed by or affiliated with the stewardship organization; and new text end new text begin (3) qualified to conduct an audit under section 115A.1337, subdivision 5, paragraph (b), clause (8). new text end new text begin (q) "Off-highway vehicle" has the meaning given in section 84.771. new text end new text begin (r) "Organohalogenated chemical" has the meaning given in section 325F.071. new text end new text begin (s) "Other electrical product" means an appliance or tool that is powered by electricity provided through a flexible cord with an attached standardized plug intended for temporary, manual connection to the electrical distribution system in a residential or commercial structure. Other electrical product does not include: new text end new text begin (1) a covered product; new text end new text begin (2) a major appliance; new text end new text begin (3) an appliance or tool powered by electrical power of greater than 240 volts alternating current; or new text end new text begin (4) an appliance or tool designed, manufactured, and intended solely for use in manufacturing, industrial, or other commercial settings. new text end new text begin (t) "Partial collection site" means a collection site that meets the requirements of section 115A.1341, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), and does not meet the requirements of paragraph (b) of that subdivision. new text end new text begin (u) "Participant" means a producer that is named by the stewardship organization as meeting the producer's obligations under sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 to contract with a stewardship organization and to pay for a stewardship program that meets the producer's obligations on the producer's behalf. new text end new text begin (v) "Producer" means, with respect to a covered product or other electrical product that is sold, including online sales; offered for sale or promotional purposes; or distributed in or into the state: new text end new text begin (1) a person that manufactured: new text end new text begin (i) the covered product; new text end new text begin (ii) any component of the covered product if the component is also a covered product; or new text end new text begin (iii) the other electrical product; new text end new text begin (2) a person that imported into the United States: new text end new text begin (i) the covered product; new text end new text begin (ii) any component of the covered product if the component is also a covered product; or new text end new text begin (iii) the other electrical product; and new text end new text begin (3) a person that owns or controls or is licensed to use a brand under which the covered product or other electrical product is sold, including online sales; offered for sale or promotional purposes; or distributed in or into the state. new text end new text begin (w) "Responsible market" means a market for covered products and other electrical products, for reusable or repairable components of covered products and other electrical products, for reclaimed materials from covered products and other electrical products, or for any other recyclable residues from covered products and other electrical products that: new text end new text begin (1) reuses, recycles, or otherwise recovers materials and disposes of contaminants in a manner that protects the environment and minimizes risks to public health and worker health and safety; new text end new text begin (2) complies with all applicable federal, state, and local statutes, rules, ordinances, and other laws governing environmental, health, safety, and financial responsibility; new text end new text begin (3) possesses all licenses and permits required by a federal or state agency or political subdivision; new text end new text begin (4) if operating in the state, recycles covered products and other electrical products to the maximum extent practicable in accordance with section 115A.02, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (5) minimizes adverse impacts to environmental justice areas. new text end new text begin (x) "Snowmobile" has the meaning given in section 84.81, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin (y) "Specialized battery or circuit board recycler" means a person that, if and as applicable, is properly authorized by the commissioner or, if operating in another state, an equivalent state or federal governmental body, to process, repair, refurbish, facilitate reuse of, recycle, or reclaim useful materials from covered products. new text end new text begin (z) "Stewardship organization" means a nonprofit organization as described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that enters into a contract with producers to draft and submit a plan for a stewardship program under sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347, and to be responsible for administering and implementing that plan on the producers' behalf. new text end new text begin (aa) "Stewardship plan" means a plan that is prepared according to section 115A.1335 and submitted to the commissioner by a stewardship organization. new text end new text begin (bb) "Stewardship program" means a system implemented by a stewardship organization that provides and pays for covered services and all other activities described in a stewardship plan approved by the commissioner under section 115A.1335, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (cc) "Watercraft" has the meaning given in section 86B.005, subdivision 18, notwithstanding the exceptions contained therein. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [115A.1333] COVERED PRODUCTS REIMBURSEMENT BOARD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Covered Products Reimbursement Board is established to recommend reimbursement rates to the commissioner. Except as provided in this section, chapter 15 does not apply to the board. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2027, the commissioner must appoint the initial membership of the Covered Products Reimbursement Board. Membership must consist of: new text end new text begin (1) two members representing household hazardous waste collection programs; new text end new text begin (2) two members representing collectors, according to paragraph (c); and new text end new text begin (3) four members representing and nominated by the stewardship organization. new text end new text begin (b) In making appointments under paragraph (a), the commissioner may not appoint persons who are: new text end new text begin (1) current or elected Minnesota state representatives or senators; new text end new text begin (2) required to register as lobbyists under section 10A.03; or new text end new text begin (3) employees of the agency. new text end new text begin (c) Initial appointments under paragraph (a), clause (2), must represent potential collectors. After January 1, 2028, whenever the terms of these members expire according to subdivision 3, the new appointments must represent collectors. Members appointed under paragraph (a), clause (2), must not represent household hazardous waste collection programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Terms; removal. new text end new text begin Members serve for a term of four years, except that one member appointed under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1); one member appointed under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2); and two members appointed under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), must be appointed to serve an initial term of two years, so that membership terms are staggered. Members may be reappointed to another term following the end of a term. The removal of members is governed by section 15.059, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Quorum; voting. new text end new text begin Meetings of the board must have at least a quorum of members, consisting of six members. Recommendations of the board require the affirmative vote of at least five members. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Administrative support; facilitator. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must provide administrative support to the board. The commissioner must ensure that all activities of the board that require public notice, such as notice of meetings, agendas and materials related to agenda items, and minutes, are published on the agency's publicly accessible website. The commissioner must provide meeting space and public access for meetings conducted by telephone or interactive technology. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must contract for a professional facilitator for the board. The facilitator must schedule and chair the meetings of the board but is not a member for purposes of quorum or voting. The facilitator must ensure that all activities of the board that require public notice are timely provided to the commissioner for publication. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The board must meet at least biannually and as necessary to meet the requirements of subdivisions 7 to 9. Meetings may be scheduled at the request of the facilitator or a majority of the members. new text end new text begin (b) The board must comply with the Open Meeting Law under chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Recommendations for reimbursement rates. new text end new text begin (a) By July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the board must submit to the commissioner a recommendation for reimbursement rates to collectors for the following calendar year. new text end new text begin (b) Recommended rates must be differentiated by methods recommended by the board under subdivision 4, such as local property lease or purchase costs, prevailing local wages, or other factors to ensure convenient collection statewide according to section 115A.1335, subdivision 3, and that all costs of collection are covered according to paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) Recommended rates must cover all costs of collecting covered products and other electrical products incurred by collectors, including at least: new text end new text begin (1) labor and overhead; new text end new text begin (2) covered services performed by a collector in accordance with section 115A.1337, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (3) necessary collection and storage structures and containers as provided in section 115A.1347, subdivision 1, paragraph (d); new text end new text begin (4) employee training; new text end new text begin (5) necessary safety equipment, including appropriate fire protection and suppression equipment and supplies; and new text end new text begin (6) any other costs determined necessary by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) In making determinations under paragraph (c), clause (6), the commissioner may consider data submitted according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 5; the volume of covered products collected; the estimated volume of covered products sold in or into the state; the estimated volume of covered products disposed of in the state; and other information related to the effectiveness of the stewardship program. new text end new text begin (e) The board must also consider any additional financial incentives necessary to induce collectors to join the stewardship program in locations that would otherwise not be served, so that the stewardship organization can meet or exceed the required convenience standards under section 115A.1335, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Review and approval of reimbursement rates. new text end new text begin (a) Within 90 days after receiving a recommendation on reimbursement rates submitted under subdivision 7, the commissioner must review the recommendation and approve or reject the recommendation. new text end new text begin (b) In conducting a review of a recommendation, the commissioner may consult with interested parties. new text end new text begin (c) For at least 30 days and before approving a recommendation under this subdivision, the commissioner must post the recommendation on the agency's publicly accessible website for public review and comment. new text end new text begin (d) If the commissioner determines that a recommendation does not meet the requirements of this section, the commissioner must reject the recommendation. The commissioner must provide a written notice of determination describing the reasons for the rejection to the board. The board must meet as necessary to submit a revised recommendation to the commissioner. new text end new text begin (e) After consultation under paragraph (b) and review of public comments under paragraph (c), if the commissioner determines that a recommendation meets the requirements of this section, the commissioner may approve the recommendation. The commissioner must provide a written notice of approval to the board and to the stewardship organization. In the notice, the commissioner must specify the effective date of the approved reimbursement rates. new text end new text begin (f) The stewardship organization must publish approved reimbursement rates on its publicly accessible website within 30 days after receiving the commissioner's written notice of approval. The commissioner may also publish the approved reimbursement rates on the agency's publicly accessible website. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin More-frequent rate changes. new text end new text begin The board may, for good cause, submit a recommendation for reimbursement rates to the commissioner at less than an annual interval. The commissioner must review the recommendation according to subdivision 8. If the commissioner rejects the recommendation, then the previously approved reimbursement rates for that calendar year continue to be in effect. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [115A.1335] STEWARDSHIP PLAN AND BUDGET. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Due date. new text end new text begin By October 1, 2027, all producers must contract with a single stewardship organization to act on the producers' behalf. By that date, the stewardship organization must submit a single stewardship plan meeting the requirements of subdivision 2 to the commissioner to review for approval or rejection. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Plan content; budget requirement. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship plan must include: new text end new text begin (1) identification of and contact information for the stewardship organization; new text end new text begin (2) identification of and contact information for all other persons that the stewardship organization has contracted, subcontracted, or partnered with to administer and implement the stewardship program that are not participants identified in clause (3) or collectors or persons providing covered services identified in clause (4), unless such participants, collectors, or persons providing covered services are also in any way administering or implementing the stewardship program beyond participation, collection, or provision of covered services. The relationship of the other organizations and role in administration and implementation of the stewardship program must be described; new text end new text begin (3) identification of and contact information for all participants in the stewardship program; new text end new text begin (4) identification of and contact information for each collector; each person providing covered services for covered products or other electrical products, including any collector that will perform covered services other than collection; and each facility at which covered products and other electrical products will be managed under the stewardship plan; new text end new text begin (5) the address; county of location; and, in a form prescribed by the commissioner, geolocation data for each collection site to be served by the stewardship organization under the stewardship program and identification of the site as a full collection site, as a partial collection site, or as operated by a household hazardous waste collection program; new text end new text begin (6) a list of the brands covered under the stewardship program; new text end new text begin (7) eligibility criteria for prospective collectors of covered products and other electrical products under the stewardship program according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 3, paragraph (c); new text end new text begin (8) a description of how the stewardship program will accept and provide covered services and reimbursement under this section to any household hazardous waste collection program in a manner that is equal to the services and reimbursement provided to all other collectors, if the operator of the household hazardous waste collection program requests covered services and reimbursement; new text end new text begin (9) a description of how the stewardship program will provide convenient, statewide collection according to subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (10) a description of how the stewardship organization will annually monitor and ensure continuing compliance with the convenience standards under subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (11) a description of how the stewardship organization will provide each collector served by the stewardship program with the materials specified in section 115A.1337, subdivision 1, including specifications for appropriate containers, signage templates, and a copy of all training and educational materials to be provided; new text end new text begin (12) a description of how collection sites will be accessible according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (13) the performance standards for persons providing covered services for covered products and other electrical products on behalf of the stewardship organization and the oversight methods by which the stewardship organization will ensure continuing compliance with the performance standards. The performance standards must: new text end new text begin (i) meet the requirements of section 115A.1337, subdivision 3; new text end new text begin (ii) ensure that covered products and materials resulting from recycling covered products are managed only by specialized battery or electronics recyclers and through responsible markets; and new text end new text begin (iii) ensure that other electrical products and materials resulting from recycling of other electrical products are managed through responsible markets; new text end new text begin (14) a description of methods by which the stewardship organization will ensure that covered products and any other electrical products that are waste for which the stewardship organization is responsible are managed while in the state in compliance with rules adopted under section 116.07 for managing solid waste and hazardous waste and, when outside the state, with all federal, state, and local requirements applicable to managing solid waste and hazardous waste, as applicable; new text end new text begin (15) a description of methods by which the stewardship organization will ensure that covered products and any other electrical products for which the stewardship organization is responsible are managed in compliance with safety and health requirements for employees administered by the Department of Labor and Industry and with fire protection requirements administered by the Department of Public Safety while in the state and, when outside the state, with all federal, state, and local requirements applicable to safety and health requirements for employees and fire protection requirements; new text end new text begin (16) a description of methods by which the stewardship organization will ensure that covered products and other electrical products for which the stewardship organization is responsible are transported in compliance with applicable regulations incorporated by reference under section 221.033 for transporting hazardous materials while in the state and, when outside the state, with all federal, state, and local requirements applicable to transportation of hazardous materials; new text end new text begin (17) a statement of indemnification by the stewardship organization to collectors for potential liability for improper downstream management of covered products and other electrical products or residual materials by providers of covered services contracted for by the stewardship organization and identified in the stewardship plan under clause (3); new text end new text begin (18) a description of how the stewardship organization will determine the mass of covered products and other electrical products for which it has provided covered services under the stewardship program by county of collection and, for covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them, by battery chemistry; new text end new text begin (19) a description of the outreach and education methods and activities that the stewardship organization will provide according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (20) a description of how the stewardship organization will employ at least one full-time employee who is solely dedicated to implementing the stewardship program in this state and serving as the primary contact between the stewardship organization and the agency; new text end new text begin (21) a description of the system by which the stewardship organization will provide advance funding of or reimbursement to collectors in a manner that provides: new text end new text begin (i) a clear process for submitting and paying invoices; new text end new text begin (ii) reasonable timelines for reimbursement, at intervals no longer than monthly unless otherwise agreed to by the person providing covered services to be reimbursed; and new text end new text begin (iii) a third-party mediator to resolve disputes that arise between the stewardship organization and a person providing covered services regarding determining or paying reimbursements; new text end new text begin (22) identification of groups of producers, such as by industry, covered product and other electrical product type, or other method proposed by the stewardship organization, and the proposed allocation of stewardship program costs among the groups of producers, such that the costs of managing covered products or other electrical products produced by a group of producers are not borne by other groups of producers; new text end new text begin (23) a description of how the stewardship organization will comply with subdivision 6, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (24) a description of how the stewardship organization will assist producers in complying with the labeling requirements of section 115A.1347, subdivision 2, paragraph (a); new text end new text begin (25) a description of how the stewardship organization will ensure that covered products and other electrical products managed under the stewardship program are recycled to the maximum extent practicable in accordance with section 115A.02, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (26) a description of how the stewardship organization will incentivize investment in processes, product design and material use, technology, and personnel training that could raise the future maximum extent practicable for recycling described in clause (25), including consideration of covered product reuse, repair, and product life cycle; new text end new text begin (27) a description of how the stewardship organization will annually report to the commissioner the number, type, and volume of covered products and other electrical products collected during each calendar year, specifying the categories of the covered products and other electrical products and the chemistries of the covered batteries collected; new text end new text begin (28) a description of how the stewardship organization will annually report to the commissioner the end management, through reuse, repair, reclamation, recycling, or disposal, of the covered products and other electrical products shipped from collection sites under the stewardship program during each calendar year; new text end new text begin (29) a description of how the stewardship organization will take action to decrease the incidence of covered products in solid waste in the state according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 4, paragraph (c), including providing collection opportunities under section 115A.1337, subdivision 2, paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (30) a description of how the stewardship organization will assist persons providing covered services after collection to identify, segregate, and properly manage organohalogenated chemicals contained in or separated from covered products and reduce the prevalence of organohalogenated chemicals in products derived from recycled covered products; and new text end new text begin (31) a description of how the stewardship organization will, where feasible, assist producers in reducing the occurrence of organohalogenated chemicals in covered products. new text end new text begin (b) By January 1, 2028, and by April 1 each year thereafter, the stewardship organization must submit an anticipated annual budget for the stewardship program, broken down into the stewardship program's estimated costs for administration, collection, sorting, storage, transportation, processing, refurbishment, repair, reuse, recycling, disposal, and communication costs, including the cost of fees under section 115A.1339 but not including costs for lobbying, costs associated with litigation against the state, or penalties imposed by the state. The budget is not subject to review and approval under subdivisions 4 and 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Convenience standards. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship plan must provide convenient, statewide collection for all covered products that are offered to collectors by a person in the state, regardless of: new text end new text begin (1) a covered product's brand; new text end new text begin (2) a covered battery's energy capacity or chemistry; new text end new text begin (3) whether the producer of a covered product is a participant in the stewardship program; or new text end new text begin (4) whether the brand of a covered product is covered under the stewardship program. new text end new text begin (b) The stewardship plan must meet the following convenience standards: new text end new text begin (1) for each county with a population of 10,000 or less, maintain at least two full collection sites; new text end new text begin (2) for each county with a population greater than 10,000 but less than or equal to 100,000, maintain at least two full collection sites and at least one additional full collection site for each additional 10,000 in population above a population of 10,000; new text end new text begin (3) for each county with a population greater than 100,000, maintain at least 11 full collection sites and at least one additional full collection site for each additional 50,000 in population above a population of 100,000; new text end new text begin (4) maintain a full collection site located within ten miles of the household of at least 95 percent of the residents of the state; new text end new text begin (5) ensure no net loss in estimated collection convenience and capacity for covered products of any type; and new text end new text begin (6) any additional convenience standards that the commissioner determines are necessary to provide convenient, statewide collection for covered products, including operation of partial collection sites and additional full collection sites. new text end new text begin (c) In making a determination under paragraph (b), clause (6), the commissioner may consider data submitted according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 5; the volume of covered products collected; the estimated volume of covered products sold in or into the state; the estimated volume of covered products disposed of in the state; the stewardship organization's plans under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (28); and other information related to the effectiveness of the stewardship program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Review of stewardship plan; implementation. new text end new text begin (a) Within 120 days after receiving a complete stewardship plan submitted under this section, the commissioner must determine whether the stewardship plan complies with the requirements of this section and will ensure that elements required by subdivision 2, paragraph (a), will be met to the maximum extent practicable. The commissioner must provide a written notice of determination according to this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) In conducting a review of a stewardship plan, the commissioner may consult with interested parties. new text end new text begin (c) For at least 30 days and before approving a stewardship plan, the commissioner must place the stewardship plan on the agency's publicly accessible website for public review and comment. new text end new text begin (d) If the commissioner determines that a stewardship plan fails to meet the requirements of this section or will not ensure that elements required by subdivision 2, paragraph (a), will be met to the maximum extent practicable, the commissioner must reject the stewardship plan. The commissioner must provide a written notice of determination to the stewardship organization describing the reasons for the rejection. new text end new text begin (e) After any consultation under paragraph (b) and review of public comments received under paragraph (c), if the commissioner determines that a stewardship plan meets the requirements of subdivision 2, the commissioner must approve the stewardship plan. The commissioner must provide a written notice of determination to the stewardship organization. new text end new text begin (f) The stewardship organization must publish its approved stewardship plan on its publicly accessible website within 30 days after receiving written notice of approval but is not required to publish nonpublic data as defined under chapter 13. The commissioner may publish the approved stewardship plan on the agency's publicly accessible website but must not publish nonpublic data. new text end new text begin (g) The stewardship organization must implement the stewardship plan approved by the commissioner, including any amendments to the stewardship plan that are approved by the commissioner according to subdivision 5, within 60 days after receiving written notice of approval. new text end new text begin (h) For each stewardship plan or amendment submitted to the commissioner for review, the commissioner may consider the data submitted according to section 115A.1337, subdivision 5, and other relevant information to establish requirements to improve the effectiveness, performance, and awareness of the stewardship program. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Amending or terminating stewardship plan. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization may amend a stewardship plan approved under subdivision 4 without review or approval by the commissioner to make the changes specified in clauses (1) to (3). Within 30 days after adopting an amendment under this paragraph, the stewardship organization must report the amendment to the commissioner and must publish the amended stewardship plan on the stewardship organization's publicly accessible website. The stewardship organization must implement amendments made to a stewardship plan under this paragraph within 60 days after adopting the amendment. The stewardship organization may: new text end new text begin (1) add, terminate, or replace a collector, collection site, person providing covered services, or facility at which covered services will be performed; new text end new text begin (2) add or remove participants or brands covered under the stewardship plan; or new text end new text begin (3) change contact staff or contact staff information for the stewardship organization, participants, collectors, persons transporting covered products or other electrical products, or facilities to be used for storage, processing, recycling, or disposal. new text end new text begin (b) Except for an amendment under paragraph (a), a proposed amendment to a stewardship plan approved under subdivision 4 must be submitted to and reviewed and approved by the commissioner before it may be implemented by the stewardship organization. The commissioner must review and approve or reject the proposed amendment according to subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (c) The stewardship organization with an approved stewardship plan must submit an amended stewardship plan for review at least every five years according to this subdivision and subdivision 4 if the commissioner has not during that time approved amendments submitted for review under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (d) The stewardship organization may terminate a stewardship plan by providing at least 90 days' written notice to the commissioner and to all participants in the stewardship program. Before the stewardship plan is terminated, each participant must meet the requirements of section 115A.1335, subdivision 1, by contracting with a new stewardship organization, which must submit and obtain the commissioner's approval for a stewardship plan. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner may terminate a stewardship plan for good cause, such as significant noncompliance with this section; failure to ensure that covered products and other electrical products collected in the state are being managed in responsible markets and according to subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (13) to (15); failure to timely submit a stewardship plan for review according to paragraph (c); or failure to pay fees assessed under section 115A.1339. If the commissioner terminates a stewardship plan, the commissioner must provide the stewardship organization with written notice of termination describing the good cause for termination. The commissioner must also notify all participants in the stewardship program in writing using the contact information for the participants provided in the stewardship plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Compliance. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization must comply with its stewardship plan approved by the commissioner, including any amendments to the stewardship plan that are made according to subdivision 5, paragraph (a) or (b). new text end new text begin (b) The stewardship organization must comply with the reimbursement rates approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) The stewardship organization must ensure that all costs of the stewardship program are fully paid for by producers as a whole, except for de minimis producers. All costs of the stewardship program must be allocated fairly between groups of producers without any fee, charge, surcharge, or any other cost to: new text end new text begin (1) any member of the public; new text end new text begin (2) any business other than a producer; new text end new text begin (3) any collector; new text end new text begin (4) any person providing covered services; new text end new text begin (5) the state or any political subdivision; new text end new text begin (6) de minimis producers; or new text end new text begin (7) any other person who is not a producer. new text end new text begin (d) In implementing paragraph (c), the stewardship organization must ensure that costs of managing covered products and other electrical products produced by a group of producers are not shifted to nor borne by any other group of producers. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [115A.1337] STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION DUTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Duties to collectors. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization must provide the following to each collector: new text end new text begin (1) reimbursement at the rates approved by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (2) all covered services after the initial collection of covered products and other electrical products by the collector; new text end new text begin (3) containers as described in section 115A.1347, subdivision 1, paragraph (d); new text end new text begin (4) consistent signage identifying a collection site; new text end new text begin (5) training for collection site employees on identifying and safely handling and storing covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them, including damaged, defective, or recalled batteries, also known as DDR batteries; new text end new text begin (6) educational materials that address the information described in subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (3), for distribution to members of the public and businesses in Minnesota. The educational materials must be made available in English and at least the three most frequent languages spoken at home in the state other than English, according to the state demographer; and new text end new text begin (7) direction to an alternate collector whenever a collector determines and reports to the stewardship organization, according to section 115A.1341, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), that the collector cannot safely collect a covered product. The stewardship organization must ensure that the covered product is collected by another collector. new text end new text begin (b) The stewardship organization must allow a collector to perform covered services other than collection if the collector meets the performance standards in the stewardship plan under section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (13), and the collector is identified in the stewardship plan as providing covered services other than collection according to section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (4). new text end new text begin (c) For covered services provided under paragraph (b), the stewardship organization must reimburse the collector for the cost of the performed covered services according to section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (21). new text end new text begin (d) A collector may request the stewardship organization to add a person to provide covered services to the stewardship plan as an amendment under section 115A.1335, subdivision 5, paragraph (a), and the stewardship organization must consider the request if the person meets the performance standards in the stewardship plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Accessibility. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization must provide convenient, equitable, and accessible service to all Minnesotans, including but not limited to people of color; Minnesota Tribal governments as defined in section 10.65, subdivision 2; those that are non-English speaking; immigrant and refugee communities; those with limited access to transportation; and those in environmental justice areas. new text end new text begin (b) The stewardship program must include collection opportunities beyond those required under section 115A.1335, subdivision 3, to better serve populations under paragraph (a), such as additional partial collection sites, individual pickup from households, and temporary events to provide enhanced collection availability. new text end new text begin (c) Where feasible, the stewardship organization must encourage establishing collection sites in proximity to local public transit. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Oversight; eligibility of persons providing covered services. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization must ensure that: new text end new text begin (1) covered products and other electrical products managed under the stewardship program are recycled to the maximum extent practicable in accordance with section 115A.02, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (2) residual materials are managed in compliance with applicable hazardous waste or solid waste requirements by: new text end new text begin (i) each person transporting covered products or other electrical products; and new text end new text begin (ii) each facility listed in the stewardship plan at which storage, processing, recycling, or disposal of covered products and other electrical products is performed. new text end new text begin (b) To ensure that covered products and other electrical products are managed to the maximum extent practicable in accordance with section 115A.02, paragraph (b), the commissioner may require performance standards and oversight methods in lieu of or in addition to the performance standards and oversight methods used by a stewardship organization under paragraph (a) and section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (13), for persons providing covered services for covered products and other electrical products. The commissioner may consider data submitted under subdivision 5; the availability and feasibility of technology, processes, and methods for managing covered products and other electrical products; and other information related to the effectiveness of the stewardship program. new text end new text begin (c) The stewardship organization must allow any person that agrees to operate or continues to operate a full collection site in compliance with section 115A.1341 and any household hazardous waste collection program to serve as a collector. The stewardship organization must consider allowing any person that agrees to operate or continues to operate a partial collection site in compliance with section 115A.1341 to serve as a collector. Except for a household hazardous waste collection program, a stewardship organization may terminate a collector and cease payment to the collector for good cause. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Stewardship program effectiveness. new text end new text begin (a) To support the effectiveness of the stewardship program, the stewardship organization must provide outreach and education to: new text end new text begin (1) persons that might sell, offer for sale or promotional purposes, or distribute covered products or other electrical products in or into the state, to inform the persons of the requirements of section 115A.1347, subdivision 2; new text end new text begin (2) potential collectors and persons who are collecting covered products before the effective date of this section to inform the collectors how to request coverage by the stewardship program; and new text end new text begin (3) members of the public to raise awareness of: new text end new text begin (i) public health and safety and environmental risks caused by improperly charging, storing, and disposing of covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them; new text end new text begin (ii) public health and environmental risks caused by improperly disposing of covered products; new text end new text begin (iii) methods to safely charge and store covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them; new text end new text begin (iv) the benefits of repairing, reusing, and recycling covered products and other electrical products in contrast to disposal; and new text end new text begin (v) the existence of the stewardship program and the ability to recycle covered products and other electrical products at no cost, including the location and convenience of collection sites in the state. new text end new text begin (b) The stewardship organization must maintain a publicly accessible website to locate collection sites through map-based and text-based searches. new text end new text begin (c) The stewardship organization must, in addition to the requirements of paragraphs (a) and (b), take action to decrease the incidence of covered products in solid waste generated in the state as soon as practicable and to the maximum extent achievable. The commissioner may determine the effectiveness of the stewardship program using information from waste composition studies conducted under section 115A.412 and other information available to the commissioner and may require the stewardship organization to submit information and implement actions to decrease the incidence of covered products in solid waste in accordance with section 115A.1335, subdivisions 2, paragraph (a), clause (29); and 3, paragraph (b), clause (6). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization must report an amendment to the stewardship plan made under section 115A.1335, subdivision 5, paragraph (a), to the commissioner within 30 days after making the amendment. new text end new text begin (b) By April 1 each year, the stewardship organization must report to the commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, on the stewardship organization's activities during the preceding calendar year. The stewardship organization must also submit a copy of the report to the board. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the address, county of location, and geolocation data for each collection site used by the stewardship organization under the stewardship program during the preceding calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) the number, type, and volume of covered products and other electrical products collected during each calendar year, specifying the categories of the covered products and other electrical products and the chemistries of the covered batteries collected, in accordance with section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (27); new text end new text begin (3) the end management, through reuse, repair, reclamation, recycling, or disposal, of the covered products and other electrical products shipped from collection sites under the stewardship program, in accordance with section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (28); new text end new text begin (4) the effectiveness of the stewardship organization's actions to decrease the incidence of covered products in solid waste in the state, in accordance with section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (29), including the support of partial collection sites; new text end new text begin (5) a description of the actions taken by the stewardship organization regarding identification, management, and reduction in prevalence of organohalogenated chemicals in covered products under section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clauses (30) and (31); new text end new text begin (6) the results of the oversight according to section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (13), verifying that the performance standards were met by each of the persons providing covered services; new text end new text begin (7) a description of outreach and education activities performed by the stewardship organization during the preceding calendar year according to subdivision 4; new text end new text begin (8) a financial report on the stewardship program, including actual costs and funding compared to the budget for the year submitted under section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). The financial report must include an audit report of the stewardship program by an independent auditor. The independent auditor must be selected by the stewardship organization and approved or rejected by the commissioner. If the commissioner rejects an independent auditor, the stewardship organization must select a different independent auditor for approval or rejection by the commissioner. The independent audit must meet the requirements of Accounting Standards Update 2018-08, Not-for-Profit Entities (Topic 958), Financial Accounting Standards Board, as amended; new text end new text begin (9) the proposed and actual budget for the year in which the report is submitted; and new text end new text begin (10) starting on the second April after the stewardship organization's first stewardship plan is approved by the commissioner, and then every third year thereafter, a performance audit of the stewardship program. The performance audit must conform to audit standards established by the United States Government Accountability Office; the National Association of State Auditors, Comptrollers and Treasurers; or another nationally recognized organization approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Organization of the stewardship organization. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization may function as a coordinating board and contract, subcontract, or partner with any other person to administer and implement the stewardship program. new text end new text begin (b) A contract, subcontract, or partnership established according to paragraph (a) must be described under section 115A.1335, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2). new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any contract, subcontract, or partnership established according to paragraph (a), the stewardship organization must: new text end new text begin (1) remain responsible for compliance with sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347; new text end new text begin (2) submit a single stewardship plan meeting the requirements of sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347; new text end new text begin (3) submit a single report according to subdivision 5 meeting the requirements of sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347; new text end new text begin (4) serve as the single point of contact for reporting and reimbursement for: new text end new text begin (i) each collector; new text end new text begin (ii) each person providing covered services for covered products or other electrical products, including any collector that will perform covered services other than collection; and new text end new text begin (iii) each facility at which covered products and other electrical products will be managed under the stewardship plan; and new text end new text begin (5) serve as the single point of contact for the agency. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [115A.1339] FEES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Administrative fees. new text end new text begin (a) By January 1, 2028, and by July 1 each year thereafter, the commissioner must calculate the sum of all costs that the agency incurs under sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347, exclusive of recovery and management of covered products under subdivision 2. The sum calculated for the period preceding January 1, 2028, must include the agency's costs of implementing sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347. For the purposes of this paragraph, costs of the board are considered costs incurred by the agency. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding section 16A.1283, the commissioner must assess administrative fees at an amount that is adequate to reimburse the agency's sum costs of administering sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347. The stewardship organization must pay the assessed administrative fees by the due dates set by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Recovery and proper management fees. new text end new text begin (a) When the commissioner intends to spend money for the recovery and proper management of covered products under section 115A.1343, subdivision 1, notwithstanding section 16A.1283, the commissioner must assess the estimated cost of recovery and proper management of covered products to the stewardship organization. new text end new text begin (b) The cost under paragraph (a) must not include any subsequent remediation of the real properties where the covered products are located nor the cost of any environmental assessment of the properties to determine appropriate subsequent remediation under other law. Such costs must not be paid from any funds assessed, collected, or appropriated under this section. The stewardship organization must pay the assessed recovery and management fee by the due date set by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) If, after the covered products have been recovered and properly managed, the actual cost of recovery and proper management of the recovered products is less than the fee paid by the stewardship organization, the commissioner must refund the excess payment. If the cost of recovery and proper management exceeds the fee paid by the stewardship organization, the commissioner must assess the stewardship organization for the deficit. The stewardship organization must pay the assessed recovery and management fee deficit by the due date set by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disposition of fees. new text end new text begin The total amount of net fees collected under this section must not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse agency costs as calculated under subdivisions 1 and 2. All fees received under subdivisions 1 and 2 must be deposited in the state treasury and credited to a product stewardship account in the special revenue fund. The amount collected under this section is annually appropriated to the commissioner to implement and enforce sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [115A.1341] COLLECTOR DUTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Accepting covered products. new text end new text begin (a) All collectors must accept covered products without imposing a fee, charge, surcharge, or other cost to any person other than the stewardship organization. new text end new text begin (b) At a full collection site, a collector must accept from any person at least ten covered products daily of any brand, any type, any physical size, and, in the case of covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them, any energy capacity or chemistry, unless the collector determines a specific covered product cannot be safely collected by the collector at a specific collection site at a specific time under paragraph (e). A full collection site must be open to receiving covered products at least 12 operating hours per week, 50 weeks each calendar year. new text end new text begin (c) At a partial collection site, a collector must accept from any person covered products of any brand, but may limit the number, type, physical size, and, in the case of covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them, the energy capacity or chemistry of the covered battery of the covered products accepted. new text end new text begin (d) A household hazardous waste collection program may accept covered products at any collection site it operates. The household hazardous waste collection program may limit the persons from which it will accept covered products and may limit the number, type, physical size, and, in the case of covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them, the energy capacity or chemistry of the covered battery of the covered products accepted. The stewardship organization may count a collection site operated by the household hazardous waste collection program as a full collection site when demonstrating compliance with the convenience standards of section 115A.1335, subdivision 3, if the household hazardous waste collection program voluntarily agrees in writing with the stewardship organization to comply with paragraph (b) at the site. new text end new text begin (e) A collector that determines that it cannot safely accept a specific covered product must document the reason for not accepting the covered product and immediately notify the stewardship organization of the nonacceptance in order to allow the stewardship organization to arrange for alternate collection of the covered product under section 115A.1337, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (7). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Accepting other electrical products. new text end new text begin A collector may accept other electrical products from a person. If a collector accepts other electrical products, the collector may not impose a fee, charge, surcharge, or other cost to any person other than the stewardship organization. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Storing accepted products. new text end new text begin A collector must manage and store all accepted covered products and other electrical products safely and in compliance with section 115A.1347, subdivision 1, paragraphs (c) and (d). new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Training. new text end new text begin A collector must ensure and document that training is provided for collection site employees on identifying and safely handling and storing covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them, including damaged, defective, or recalled batteries, also known as DDR batteries. The collector may provide the training or may receive training from the stewardship organization or the stewardship organization's representative. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Recordkeeping. new text end new text begin A collector must maintain the following records for at least three years and make them available to the commissioner for inspection: new text end new text begin (1) records of covered products and other electrical products accepted at a collection site; new text end new text begin (2) records of covered products and other electrical products shipped from a collection site; and new text end new text begin (3) documentation of employee training. The three-year record retention period for employee documentation begins on the day following the last day the employee worked for the collector. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [115A.1343] COVERED PRODUCTS RECOVERY AND PROPER MANAGEMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Recovery and proper management. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to any authority granted by other law and without limiting that authority, whenever the commissioner determines that covered products have been abandoned, improperly disposed of, or stored on real property within the state in a manner not in compliance with sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 or with applicable rules adopted under section 116.07, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), or 4, paragraph (g), the commissioner may issue an order under section 115.071, subdivision 5; 116.07, subdivision 9; or 116.072, subdivision 1, requiring a person responsible for the abandonment, improper disposal, or noncompliant storage of the covered products to recover and properly manage the covered products according to sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 and applicable rules. An order under this paragraph must notify the person of the provisions of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) If a person that receives an order under paragraph (a) fails to complete the ordered actions to recover and properly manage the covered products within the time specified in the order, then after that time or upon expiration of the appeal period for the order, whichever is later, the commissioner must notify the stewardship organization in writing of: new text end new text begin (1) the commissioner's determination that the covered products have been abandoned, improperly disposed of, or stored in a noncompliant manner; new text end new text begin (2) the name of the person that was issued the order under paragraph (a) and the location of the covered products; new text end new text begin (3) the actions required to recover and properly manage the covered products; and new text end new text begin (4) the amount of time that the stewardship organization may, with the consent of the person, attempt to complete the actions to recover and properly manage the covered products on behalf of the person. new text end new text begin (c) If the stewardship organization intends to recover and properly manage the covered products, the stewardship organization must notify the commissioner of its intent and submit a plan to recover and properly manage the covered products to the commissioner. The stewardship organization must comply with its submitted recovery and management plan. new text end new text begin (d) If, after the period specified in paragraph (b), the ordered actions to recover and properly manage the covered products have not been completed, or upon earlier notice from the stewardship organization that it does not intend to take the actions, the commissioner may recover and properly manage the covered products. The commissioner must estimate the cost for a person contracted to the agency to perform the recovery and management. The commissioner must assess the estimated cost to the stewardship organization according to section 115A.1339, subdivision 2. After the stewardship organization pays the assessed fee, the commissioner may recover and properly manage the covered products. Money appropriated to the commissioner from the product stewardship account may be spent by the commissioner to recover and properly manage the covered products. new text end new text begin (e) In addition to the authority to enter upon any public or private property for the purpose of obtaining information or conducting surveys or investigations under section 115A.06, the commissioner or any designee or agent may enter upon the property to recover covered products when acting under this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Limited private right of action for recovery and proper management. new text end new text begin (a) The stewardship organization that recovers and properly manages covered products under subdivision 1, paragraph (c), may maintain a civil action against a person issued an order to recover and properly manage those covered products under subdivision 1, paragraph (a). The stewardship organization is entitled to damages under this paragraph of twice its actual cost of recovery and proper management of the covered products. Additional amounts recoverable under this paragraph include an award of reasonable attorney fees and costs. new text end new text begin (b) When the stewardship organization is assessed and pays the cost to recover and properly manage covered products under subdivision 1, paragraph (d), and section 115A.1339, subdivision 2, the stewardship organization may maintain a civil action against a person issued an order to recover and properly manage those covered products under subdivision 1, paragraph (a). The stewardship organization is entitled to damages under this paragraph equal to the cost of recovery and proper management of covered products assessed by the commissioner to the stewardship organization. Additional amounts recoverable under this paragraph include an award of reasonable attorney fees and costs. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may not be a party to or be required to provide assistance or otherwise participate in a civil action authorized under this subdivision unless subject to a subpoena before a court of jurisdiction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [115A.1345] OTHER AUTHORITIES AND DUTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Limited private right of action against producers. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (d), the stewardship organization may maintain a civil action against one or more producers, except a de minimis producer, to recover a portion of the stewardship organization's costs and additional amounts according to this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) Damages recoverable under this subdivision may not exceed a fair share of the actual costs incurred by the plaintiff stewardship organization in managing covered products or other electrical products of a defendant producer subject to section 115A.1347, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), and covered products or other electrical products of other producers that were not participants. Additional amounts recoverable under this subdivision include an award of reasonable attorney fees and costs. If a defendant producer did not participate in the stewardship program established under sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 during the period in which covered products or other electrical products of the defendant producer were managed by the plaintiff stewardship organization, a punitive sum of up to three times the damages awarded may be assessed. new text end new text begin (c) A plaintiff stewardship organization may establish a defendant producer's fair share of the plaintiff's actual costs by providing the court with information establishing the process by which the defendant producer's share of stewardship program costs would have been allocated had the defendant producer been a participant in the program or paid its allocated share if it was a participant. The plaintiff stewardship organization may use data from producers similar in covered product, financial status, or market share to the defendant producer to provide the information. new text end new text begin (d) An action may not be commenced under this subdivision against a potential defendant producer until 60 days after the plaintiff stewardship organization provides to all potential defendants a written notice of the claim setting forth the amount of the claim and the basis for the calculation of the amount. new text end new text begin (e) No action may be brought under this subdivision against a person other than a producer. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner may not be a party to or be required to provide assistance or otherwise participate in a civil action authorized under this subdivision unless subject to a subpoena before a court of jurisdiction. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Conduct authorized. new text end new text begin A producer or stewardship organization that organizes covered services for covered products or other electrical products under sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 is immune from liability for the conduct under state laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade or commerce only to the extent that the conduct is necessary to plan and implement the producer's or stewardship organization's chosen system. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duty to provide information. new text end new text begin Upon request of the commissioner for purposes of implementing sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347, a person must furnish to the commissioner any information that the person has or may reasonably obtain. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Contracts. new text end new text begin (a) Any person awarded a contract under chapter 16C for purchase or lease of covered products or other electrical products that is found to be in violation of sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347 is subject to the following sanctions: new text end new text begin (1) the contract must be voided if the commissioner of administration determines that the potential adverse impact to the state is exceeded by the benefit obtained from voiding the contract; and new text end new text begin (2) the contractor is subject to suspension and disbarment under Minnesota Rules, part 1230.1150. new text end new text begin (b) If the attorney general establishes that any money, property, or benefit was obtained by a contractor as a result of violating sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347, the court may, in addition to any other remedy, order the disgorgement of the unlawfully obtained money, property, or benefit. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Multistate implementation. new text end new text begin The commissioner may participate in establishing a regional multistate organization or compact to assist in carrying out the requirements of sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Rules. new text end new text begin The commissioner may adopt rules to implement sections 115A.1331 to 115A.1347. The 18-month time limit under section 14.125 does not apply to rulemaking under this subdivision. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [115A.1347] DISPOSAL PROHIBITIONS; BATTERY LABELING; COVERED PRODUCT SALES RESTRICTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Disposal prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) A person may not place a covered product into: new text end new text begin (1) solid waste; or new text end new text begin (2) a recycling container that a collector has not clearly marked for use for collecting covered products. new text end new text begin (b) A person must manage a covered product that is discarded by delivering the covered product to a collection site or to a recycling facility for covered products. new text end new text begin (c) Until recycled, covered products are not exempt from any applicable rules adopted under section 116.07 for managing hazardous waste. new text end new text begin (d) Covered batteries and covered products that have covered batteries contained within them or otherwise attached or connected to them must be stored in containers that are: new text end new text begin (1) designed, constructed, and used in a manner to suppress battery fires in the container or to prevent ignition of materials outside the container; and new text end new text begin (2) held in structures compliant with the local fire code. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Labeling and sale; requirements. new text end new text begin (a) A person may not sell, including online sales; offer for sale or promotional purposes; distribute in or into the state; or facilitate a sale of a covered battery or covered product that has a covered battery contained within it or otherwise attached or connected to it unless the covered battery and covered product is labeled to identify the chemistry employed to store energy in the battery. Labeling under this paragraph must be permanently marked on or affixed to the covered battery and covered product and must use either language or graphics that identifies the battery chemistry employed or a QR code compliant with International Organization of Standardization 18004:2015, that accesses equivalent data via the Internet that is available without fee or requirement to create an account. new text end new text begin (b) A person may not sell, including online sales; offer for sale or promotional purposes; distribute in or into the state; or facilitate a sale of a covered product or other electrical product unless the producer of the covered product or other electrical product is named as a participant in a stewardship plan published under section 115A.1335, subdivision 4, paragraph (f), or the brand is named as covered in a stewardship plan published under section 115A.1335, subdivision 4, paragraph (f), and the stewardship plan has not been terminated under section 115A.1335, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision does not apply to isolated and occasional sales of a covered product or other electrical product that are not made in the normal course of business, as exempted from sales tax under section 297A.67, subdivision 23. new text end new text begin (d) This subdivision does not apply to sales, including online sales; offers for sale or promotional purposes; distribution; or facilitation of a sale of a used covered product or used other electrical product. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115A.554, is amended to read: 115A.554 AUTHORITY OF SANITARY DISTRICTS. A sanitary district has the authorities and duties of counties within the district's boundary for purposes of sections 115A.0716; 115A.46, subdivisions 4 and 5; 115A.48; 115A.551; 115A.552; 115A.553; 115A.919; 115A.929; 115A.93; 115A.96, subdivision 6; deleted text begin 115A.961;deleted text end 116.072; 375.18, subdivision 14; 400.04; 400.06; 400.07; 400.08; 400.16; and 400.161. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.92, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Mercury thermometers prohibited. (a) A manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer may not sell or distribute at no cost a thermometer containing mercury that was manufactured after June 1, 2001. (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to an electronic thermometer with a battery containing mercury if the battery is in compliance with deleted text begin section 325E.125deleted text end new text begin subdivision 8lnew text end . (c) A manufacturer is in compliance with this subdivision if the manufacturer: (1) has received an exclusion or exemption from a state that is a member of the Interstate Mercury Education and Reduction Clearinghouse (IMERC) for replacement parts when no alternative is available or for an application when no feasible alternative is available; (2) submits a copy of the approved exclusion or exemption to the commissioner; and (3) meets all of the requirements in the approved exclusion or exemption for the manufacturer's activities within the state. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.92, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8l. new text end new text begin Ban; mercury in batteries. new text end new text begin A person may not sell, offer for sale, or distribute in or into the state: new text end new text begin (1) an alkaline manganese battery that contains mercury that is not a button cell nonrechargeable battery; new text end new text begin (2) a nonrechargeable button cell battery that contains more than 25 milligrams of mercury; or new text end new text begin (3) a dry cell battery containing a mercuric oxide electrode. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 115A.1310, subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 12a, 12b, 12c, 13, 14, 15, 17, 18, 19, and 20; 115A.1312; 115A.1314; 115A.1316; 115A.1318; 115A.1320; 115A.1322; 115A.1323; 115A.1324; 115A.1326; 115A.1328; 115A.1330; 115A.9155; 115A.9157, subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9; 115A.961, subdivisions 1, 2, and 3; 325E.125; and 325E.1251, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2028. new text end ARTICLE 7 ENVIRONMENTAL PERMITTING REFORM Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 115.542, is amended to read: 115.542 NOTICE REQUIREMENTS FOR PUBLICLY OWNED WASTEWATER TREATMENT FACILITIES. Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purpose of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: (1) "permit" means a national pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES) permit or state disposal system (SDS) permit; and (2) "permit applicant" means a person or entity submitting an application for a new permit or renewal, modification, or revocation of an existing permit for a publicly owned wastewater treatment facility. Subd. 2. Applicability. This section applies to all draft permits and permits for publicly owned wastewater treatment facilities for which the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency makes a preliminary determination whether to issue or deny. Subd. 3. new text begin Prepublic new text end noticenew text begin reviewnew text end requirements. new text begin Unless waived by the permit applicant, new text end the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must provide a permit applicant with a copy of the draft permit and any fact sheets required by agency rules at least 30 days before the distribution and public notice of the permit application and preliminary determination. Subd. 4. deleted text begin Permitting efficiencydeleted text end new text begin Public notice requirementsnew text end . The commissioner must prepare and issue a public notice of a completed application and the commissioner's preliminary determination as to whether the permit should be issued or denied. The public comment period must be at least 60 days for permit applications under this sectionnew text begin but may be reduced to 30 days if: new text end new text begin (1) a request for the reduction is made by the permit applicant; and new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner approves the request based on consideration of public or Tribal interest in the permit actionnew text end . new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Permitting efficiency. new text end Notwithstanding section 116.03, it is the goal of the state that tier 2 permits for publicly owned wastewater treatment facilities be issued or denied within 210 days following submission of a permit application. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.03, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Permitting efficiency. (a) It is the goal of the state that environmental and resource management permits be issued or denied within 90 days for tier 1 permits or 150 days for tier 2 permits following submission of a permit application. The commissioner deleted text begin of the Pollution Control Agency shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end establish management systems designed to achieve the goal. For the purposes of this section, "tier 1 permits" are permits that do not require individualized actions or public comment periods, and "tier 2 permits" are permits that require individualized actions or public comment periods. new text begin Goals established in this paragraph do not apply to permit applications required due to agency enforcement actions.new text end (b) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end prepare an annual permitting efficiency report that includes statistics on meeting thenew text begin tier 2new text end goal in paragraph (a) and the criteria for tier 2 by permit categories. new text begin The report must also provide information on consultants regarding achievement of the performance standards under paragraph (e), clauses (1) to (4). new text end The report deleted text begin is duedeleted text end new text begin must be submitted to the governor and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over environment policy and finance by October 1new text end deleted text begin August 1deleted text end each yearnew text begin and must be posted on the agency's websitenew text end .new text begin Each report must include:new text end new text begin (1) new text end for new text begin each new text end permit deleted text begin applicationsdeleted text end new text begin applicationnew text end that deleted text begin havedeleted text end new text begin hasnew text end not met the goal, deleted text begin the report must state the reasons for not meeting the goal. In stating the reasons for not meeting the goal, the commissioner shall separately identify delaysdeleted text end new text begin an explanation of whether the delay wasnew text end caused by the responsiveness of the proposer, lack of staff, scientific or technical disagreements, or the level of public engagementdeleted text begin . The report must specifydeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) for each permit that has not met the goal, new text end the number of days from initial submission of the application to the day of determination that the application is completedeleted text begin . The report must aggregatedeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) a summary ofnew text end the data for the deleted text begin yeardeleted text end new text begin reporting periodnew text end and deleted text begin assessdeleted text end new text begin an assessment ofnew text end whether program or system changes are necessary to achieve the new text begin tier 2 new text end goaldeleted text begin . The report must be posted on the agency's website and submitted to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over environment policy and finance.deleted text end new text begin in paragraph (a);new text end new text begin (4) a statement of the number of tier 2 permits completed within the reporting period and, immediately following in parentheses, a statement of the percentage of total applications received for that tier 2 permit category that the number represents, stated separately for industrial and municipal permits; and new text end new text begin (5) for permits that did not meet the goal due to lack of staff, a combined estimate of the aggregate staff resources that would have been necessary for all affected permits to meet the goal. new text end (c) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end allow electronic submission of environmental review and permit documents to the agency. (d) Within 30 business days of application for a permit subject to paragraph (a), the commissioner deleted text begin of the Pollution Control Agency shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end notify the permit applicant, in writing, deleted text begin whether the application is complete or incomplete. If the commissioner determines that an application is incomplete, the notice to the applicant must enumeratedeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end all deficienciesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin whilenew text end citing specific provisions of the applicable rules and statutes, and new text begin mustnew text end advise the applicant on how the deficiencies can be remedied.new text begin The applicant shall have five business days to remedy all identified deficiencies before the commissioner determines that the application is complete or incomplete.new text end If the commissioner determines that the application is complete, the deleted text begin noticedeleted text end new text begin commissionernew text end must confirm the application's tier 1 or tier 2 permit status. If the commissioner believes that a complete application for a tier 2 construction permit cannot be issued within the 150-day goal, the commissioner must provide notice to the applicant with the commissioner's notice that the application is complete and, upon request of the applicant, provide the permit applicant with a schedule estimating when the agency will begin drafting the permit and issue the public notice of the draft permit. This paragraph does not apply to an application for a permit that is subject to a grant or loan agreement under chapter 446A. new text begin (e) The commissioner must credential consultants who meet the requirements of this paragraph and must provide a logo or similar indicator with the credential that can be used by a consultant in marketing their services. For purposes of this section, "consultant" means a third-party professional representing a facility owner or operator to prepare or assist in preparing a permit application or other similar documentation required by the commissioner for authorizations under chapters 115 to 116. A consultant is credentialed on January 1 each odd-numbered year if, in the preceding two years, the consultant: new text end new text begin (1) submitted permit applications deemed complete under paragraph (d) at a rate of at least 80 percent; new text end new text begin (2) when applicable, met agreed-upon deadlines as part of a plan designed to increase the coordination and efficiency of regulatory activities, such as a plan described under section 116.035; new text end new text begin (3) did not represent an owner or operator to prepare or assist in preparing a permit application or other similar documentation when the owner or operator received a citation under section 116.073, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); and new text end new text begin (4) was not found in violation of Minnesota Rules, part 7000.0300, relating to duty of candor. new text end new text begin (f) If, after notifying the permit applicant that the application is complete, the commissioner determines that additional information is needed, the commissioner must notify the applicant. Upon notice under this paragraph, counting days toward the 90- or 150-day goal described in paragraph (a) stops until the applicant has responded with the additional information. Once the applicant has responded with all the additional information required, counting resumes from where it stopped. The applicant has 30 business days to provide the additional information to the commissioner, but the commissioner may extend the time upon the applicant's request. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end For purposes of this subdivision, "permit professional" means an individual not employed by the Pollution Control Agency who: (1) has a professional license issued by the state of Minnesota in the subject area of the permit; (2) has at least ten years of experience in the subject area of the permit; and (3) abides by the duty of candor applicable to employees of the Pollution Control Agency under agency rules and complies with all applicable requirements under chapter 326. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Upon the agency's request, an applicant relying on a permit professional must participate in a meeting with the agency before submitting an application: (1) at least two weeks prior to the preapplication meeting, the applicant must submit at least the following: (i) project description, including, but not limited to, scope of work, primary emissions points, discharge outfalls, and water intake points; (ii) location of the project, including county, municipality, and location on the site; (iii) business schedule for project completion; and (iv) other information requested by the agency at least four weeks prior to the scheduled meeting; and (2) during the preapplication meeting, the agency deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end provide for the applicant at least the following: (i) an overview of the permit review program; (ii) a determination of which specific application or applications will be necessary to complete the project; (iii) a statement notifying the applicant if the specific permit being sought requires a mandatory public hearing or comment period; (iv) a review of the timetable established in the permit review program for the specific permit being sought; and (v) a determination of what information must be included in the application, including a description of any required modeling or testing. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end The applicant may select a permit professional to undertake the preparation of the permit application and draft permit. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end If a preapplication meeting was held, the agency deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end , within seven business days of receipt of an application, notify the applicant and submitting permit professional that the application is complete or is denied, specifying the deficiencies of the application. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end Upon receipt of notice that the application is complete, the permit professional deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end submit to the agency a timetable for submitting a draft permit. The permit professional deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end submit a draft permit on or before the date provided in the timetable. Within 60 days after the close of the public comment period, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end notify the applicant whether the permit can be issued. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end Nothing in this section shall be construed to modify: (1) any requirement of law that is necessary to retain federal delegation to or assumption by the state; or (2) the authority to implement a federal law or program. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (m)new text end The permit application and draft permit deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end identify or include as an appendix all studies and other sources of information used to substantiate the analysis contained in the permit application and draft permit. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end request additional studies, if needed, and the permit applicant deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end submit all additional studies and information necessary for the commissioner to perform the commissioner's responsibility to review, modify, and determine the completeness of the application and approve the draft permit. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.07, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Permits. (a) The Pollution Control Agency may issue, continue in effect or deny permits, under such conditions as it may prescribe for the prevention of pollution, for the emission of air contaminants, or for the installation or operation of any emission facility, air contaminant treatment facility, treatment facility, potential air contaminant storage facility, or storage facility, or any part thereof, or for the sources or emissions of noise pollution.new text begin The Pollution Control Agency may issue separate permits for constructing a facility described in this paragraph and for its operation, except for a facility required to complete a mandatory environmental impact statement under Minnesota Rules, part 4410.4400. The Pollution Control Agency must prioritize these permits in a manner that minimizes the time required to construct and begin operation of the permitted facility while complying with state and federal requirements.new text end (b) The Pollution Control Agency may also issue, continue in effect or deny permits, under such conditions as it may prescribe for the prevention of pollution, for the storage, collection, transportation, processing, or disposal of waste, or for the installation or operation of any system or facility, or any part thereof, related to the storage, collection, transportation, processing, or disposal of waste. (c) The agency may not issue a permit to a facility without analyzing and considering the cumulative levels and effects of past and current environmental pollution from all sources on the environment and residents of the geographic area within which the facility's emissions are likely to be deposited, provided that the facility is located in a community in a city of the first class in Hennepin County that meets all of the following conditions: (1) is within a half mile of a site designated by the federal government as an EPA superfund site due to residential arsenic contamination; (2) a majority of the population are low-income persons of color and American Indians; (3) a disproportionate percent of the children have childhood lead poisoning, asthma, or other environmentally related health problems; (4) is located in a city that has experienced numerous air quality alert days of dangerous air quality for sensitive populations between February 2007 and February 2008; and (5) is located near the junctions of several heavily trafficked state and county highways and two one-way streets which carry both truck and auto traffic. (d) The Pollution Control Agency may revoke or modify any permit issued under this subdivision and section 116.081 whenever it is necessary, in the opinion of the agency, to prevent or abate pollution. (e) The Pollution Control Agency has the authority for approval over the siting, expansion, or operation of a solid waste facility with regard to environmental issues. However, the agency's issuance of a permit does not release the permittee from any liability, penalty, or duty imposed by any applicable county ordinances. Nothing in this chapter precludes, or shall be construed to preclude, a county from enforcing land use controls, regulations, and ordinances existing at the time of the permit application and adopted pursuant to Minnesota Statutes 2020, sections 366.10 to 366.181, or sections 394.21 to 394.37, or 462.351 to 462.365, with regard to the siting, expansion, or operation of a solid waste facility. (f) Except as prohibited by federal law, a person may commence construction, reconstruction, replacement, or modification of any facility prior to the issuance of a construction permit by the agency. new text begin (g) For the purposes of this subdivision, the Pollution Control Agency may require the owners and operators of any emission facility, air containment treatment facility, treatment facility, potential air containment storage facility, or storage facility, or any part thereof, to conduct air dispersion modeling of air contaminants. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.07, subdivision 4d, is amended to read: Subd. 4d. Permit fees. (a) The agency may collect permit fees in amounts not greater than those necessary to cover the reasonable costs of developing, reviewing, and acting upon applications for agency permits and implementing and enforcing the conditions of the permits pursuant to agency rules. Permit fees shall not include the costs of litigation. The fee schedule must reflect reasonable and routine direct and indirect costs associated with permitting, implementation, and enforcement. The agency may impose an additional enforcement fee to be collected for a period of up to two years to cover the reasonable costs of implementing and enforcing the conditions of a permit under the rules of the agency. Any money collected under this paragraph shall be deposited in the environmental fund. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the agency shall collect an annual fee from the owner or operator of all stationary sources, emission facilities, emissions units, air contaminant treatment facilities, treatment facilities, potential air contaminant storage facilities, or storage facilities subject to a notification, permit, or license requirement under this chapter, subchapters I and V of the federal Clean Air Act, United States Code, title 42, section 7401 et seq., or rules adopted thereunder. The annual fee shall be used to pay for all direct and indirect reasonable costs, including legal costs, required to develop and administer the notification, permit, or license program requirements of this chapter, subchapters I and V of the federal Clean Air Act, United States Code, title 42, section 7401 et seq., or rules adopted thereunder. Those costs include the reasonable costs of reviewing and acting upon an application for a permit; implementing and enforcing statutes, rules, and the terms and conditions of a permit; emissions, ambient, and deposition monitoring; preparing generally applicable regulations; responding to federal guidance; modeling, analyses, and demonstrations; preparing inventories and tracking emissions; and providing information to the public about these activities. (c) The agency shall set fees that: (1) will result in the collection, in the aggregate, from the sources listed in paragraph (b), of an amount not less than $25 per ton of each volatile organic compound; pollutant regulated under United States Code, title 42, section 7411 or 7412 (section 111 or 112 of the federal Clean Air Act); and each pollutant, except carbon monoxide, for which a national primary ambient air quality standard has been promulgated; (2) may result in the collection, in the aggregate, from the sources listed in paragraph (b), of an amount not less than $25 per ton of each pollutant not listed in clause (1) that is regulated under this chapter or air quality rules adopted under this chapter; and (3) shall collect, in the aggregate, from the sources listed in paragraph (b), the amount needed to match grant funds received by the state under United States Code, title 42, section 7405 (section 105 of the federal Clean Air Act). The agency must not include in the calculation of the aggregate amount to be collected under clauses (1) and (2) any amount in excess of 4,000 tons per year of each air pollutant from a source. The increase in air permit fees to match federal grant funds shall be a surcharge on existing fees. The commissioner may not collect the surcharge after the grant funds become unavailable. In addition, the commissioner shall use nonfee funds to the extent practical to match the grant funds so that the fee surcharge is minimized. (d) To cover the reasonable costs described in paragraph (b), the agency shall provide in the rules promulgated under paragraph (c) for an increase in the fee collected in each year by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the most recent calendar year ending before the beginning of the year the fee is collected exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 1989. For purposes of this paragraph the Consumer Price Index for any calendar year is the average of the Consumer Price Index for all-urban consumers published by the United States Department of Labor, as of the close of the 12-month period ending on August 31 of each calendar year. The revision of the Consumer Price Index that is most consistent with the Consumer Price Index for calendar year 1989 shall be used. (e) Any money collected under paragraphs (b) to (d) must be deposited in the environmental fund and must be used solely for the activities listed in paragraph (b). (f) Permit applicants who wish to construct, reconstruct, or modify a project may deleted text begin offerdeleted text end new text begin request expedited permitting under this paragraph. An applicant requesting expedited permitting under this paragraph must agreenew text end to reimburse the agency for the costs of staff time or consultant services needed to expedite the preapplication process and permit development process through the final decision on the permit, including the analysis of environmental review documents. The reimbursement deleted text begin shall bedeleted text end new text begin isnew text end in addition to permit application fees imposed by law. deleted text begin When the agency determines that it needs additional resources to develop the permit application in an expedited manner, and that expediting the development is consistent with permitting program priorities, the agency may accept the reimbursement.deleted text end The commissioner must give the applicant an estimate of new text begin the timeline and new text end costs to be incurred by the commissioner. The estimate must include a brief description of the tasks to be performed, a schedule for completing the tasks, and the estimated cost for each task.new text begin If the applicant agrees to the estimated timeline and costs negotiated with the commissioner,new text end the applicant and the commissioner must enter into a written agreement deleted text begin detailing the estimated costs for the expedited permit decision-making process to be incurred by the agencydeleted text end new text begin to proceed accordinglynew text end . The agreement must deleted text begin alsodeleted text end identify staff anticipated to be assigned to the project.new text begin The agreement may provide that, if permitting is completed ahead of the schedule set forth in the written agreement, the commissioner may retain any fees that would have been due if the permitting had taken the time contemplated in the written agreement. Fees retained by the commissioner under this paragraph are appropriated to the commissioner for administering the commissioner's permitting duties.new text end The commissioner must not issue a permit until the applicant has paid all fees in full. The commissioner must refund any unobligated balance of fees paid. Reimbursements accepted by the agency are appropriated to the agency for the purpose of developing the permit or analyzing environmental review documents. Reimbursement by a permit applicant shall precede and not be contingent upon issuance of a permit; shall not affect the agency's decision on whether to issue or deny a permit, what conditions are included in a permit, or the application of state and federal statutes and rules governing permit determinations; and shall not affect final decisions regarding environmental review. (g) The fees under this subdivision are exempt from section 16A.1285. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116D.04, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. When prepared. (a) Where there is potential for significant environmental effects resulting from any major governmental action, the action must be preceded by a detailed environmental impact statement prepared by the responsible governmental unit. The environmental impact statement must be an analytical rather than an encyclopedic document that describes the proposed action in detail, analyzes its significant environmental impacts, discusses appropriate alternatives to the proposed action and their impacts, and explores methods by which adverse environmental impacts of an action could be mitigated. The environmental impact statement must also analyze those economic, employment, and sociological effects that cannot be avoided should the action be implemented. To ensure its use in the decision-making process, the environmental impact statement must be prepared as early as practical in the formulation of an action. (b) The board shall by rule establish categories of actions for which environmental impact statements and for which environmental assessment worksheets must be prepared as well as categories of actions for which no environmental review is required under this section. A mandatory environmental assessment worksheet is not required for the expansion of an ethanol plant, as defined in section 41A.09, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), or the conversion of an ethanol plant to a biobutanol facility or the expansion of a biobutanol facility as defined in section 41A.15, subdivision 2d, based on the capacity of the expanded or converted facility to produce alcohol fuel, but must be required if the ethanol plant or biobutanol facility meets or exceeds thresholds of other categories of actions for which environmental assessment worksheets must be prepared. The responsible governmental unit for an ethanol plant or biobutanol facility project for which an environmental assessment worksheet is prepared is the state agency with the greatest responsibility for supervising or approving the project as a whole. (c) A mandatory environmental impact statement is not required for a facility or plant located outside the seven-county metropolitan area that produces less than 125,000,000 gallons of ethanol, biobutanol, or cellulosic biofuel annually, or produces less than 400,000 tons of chemicals annually, if the facility or plant is: an ethanol plant, as defined in section 41A.09, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b); a biobutanol facility, as defined in section 41A.15, subdivision 2d; or a cellulosic biofuel facility. A facility or plant that only uses a cellulosic feedstock to produce chemical products for use by another facility as a feedstock is not considered a fuel conversion facility as used in rules adopted under this chapter. (d) The responsible governmental unit shall promptly publish notice of the completion of an environmental assessment worksheet by publishing the notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the geographic area where the project is proposed, by posting the notice on a website that has been designated as the official publication site for publication of proceedings, public notices, and summaries of a political subdivision in which the project is proposed, or in any other manner determined by the board and shall provide copies of the environmental assessment worksheet to the board and its member agencies. Comments on the need for an environmental impact statement may be submitted to the responsible governmental unit during a 30-day period following publication of the notice that an environmental assessment worksheet has been completed. The responsible governmental unit may extend the 30-day comment period for an additional 30 days one time. Further extensions of the comment period may not be made unless approved by the project's proposer. The responsible governmental unit's decision on the need for an environmental impact statement must be based on the environmental assessment worksheet and the comments received during the comment period, and must be made within 15 days after the close of the comment period. The board's chair may extend the 15-day period by not more than 15 additional days upon the request of the responsible governmental unit. (e) An environmental assessment worksheet must also be prepared for a proposed action whenever material evidence accompanying a petition deleted text begin by not less than 100 individuals who reside or own property in the statedeleted text end , submitted before the proposed project has received final approval by the appropriate governmental units, demonstrates that, because of the nature or location of a proposed action, there may be potential for significant environmental effects.new text begin Petitions may be submitted by:new text end new text begin (1) a Minnesota Tribal government as defined under section 10.65, subdivision 2; or new text end new text begin (2) not less than 100 individuals who reside or own property in the state. new text end new text begin (f)new text end Petitions requesting the preparation of an environmental assessment worksheetnew text begin under paragraph (e)new text end must be submitted to the board. The chair of the boardnew text begin or designeenew text end shall determine the appropriate responsible governmental unit and forward the petition to it. A decision on the need for an environmental assessment worksheet must be made by the responsible governmental unit within 15 days after the petition is received by the responsible governmental unit. The board's chairnew text begin or designeenew text end may extend the 15-day period by not more than 15 additional days upon request of the responsible governmental unit. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Except in an environmentally sensitive location where Minnesota Rules, part 4410.4300, subpart 29, item B, applies, the proposed action is exempt from environmental review under this chapter and rules of the board, if: (1) the proposed action is: (i) an animal feedlot facility with a capacity of less than 1,000 animal units; or (ii) an expansion of an existing animal feedlot facility with a total cumulative capacity of less than 1,000 animal units; (2) the application for the animal feedlot facility includes a written commitment by the proposer to design, construct, and operate the facility in full compliance with Pollution Control Agency feedlot rules; and (3) the county board holds a public meeting for citizen input at least ten business days before the Pollution Control Agency or county issuing a feedlot permit for the animal feedlot facility unless another public meeting for citizen input has been held with regard to the feedlot facility to be permitted. The exemption in this paragraph is in addition to other exemptions provided under other law and rules of the board. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end The board may, before final approval of a proposed project, require preparation of an environmental assessment worksheet by a responsible governmental unit selected by the board for any action where environmental review under this section has not been specifically provided for by rule or otherwise initiated. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end An early and open process must be used to limit the scope of the environmental impact statement to a discussion of those impacts that, because of the nature or location of the project, have the potential for significant environmental effects. The same process must be used to determine the form, content, and level of detail of the statement as well as the alternatives that are appropriate for consideration in the statement. In addition, the permits that will be required for the proposed action must be identified during the scoping process. Further, the process must identify those permits for which information will be developed concurrently with the environmental impact statement. The board shall provide in its rules for the expeditious completion of the scoping process. The determinations reached in the process must be incorporated into the order requiring the preparation of an environmental impact statement. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end The responsible governmental unit shall, to the extent practicable, avoid duplication and ensure coordination between state and federal environmental review and between environmental review and environmental permitting. Whenever practical, information needed by a governmental unit for making final decisions on permits or other actions required for a proposed project must be developed in conjunction with the preparation of an environmental impact statement. When an environmental impact statement is prepared for a project requiring multiple permits for which two or more agencies' decision processes include either mandatory or discretionary hearings before a hearing officer before the agencies' decision on the permit, the agencies may, notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, conduct the hearings in a single consolidated hearing process if requested by the proposer. All agencies having jurisdiction over a permit that is included in the consolidated hearing shall participate. The responsible governmental unit shall establish appropriate procedures for the consolidated hearing process, including procedures to ensure that the consolidated hearing process is consistent with the applicable requirements for each permit regarding the rights and duties of parties to the hearing, and shall use the earliest applicable hearing procedure to initiate the hearing. All agencies having jurisdiction over a permit identified in the draft environmental assessment worksheet scoping document must begin reviewing any permit application upon publication of the notice of preparation of the environmental impact statement. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end An environmental impact statement must be prepared and its adequacy determined within 280 days after notice of its preparation unless the time is extended by consent of the parties or by the governor for good cause. The responsible governmental unit shall determine the adequacy of an environmental impact statement, unless within 60 days after notice is published that an environmental impact statement will be prepared, the board chooses to determine the adequacy of an environmental impact statement. If an environmental impact statement is found to be inadequate, the responsible governmental unit has 60 days to prepare an adequate environmental impact statement. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end The proposer of a specific action may include in the information submitted to the responsible governmental unit a preliminary draft environmental impact statement under this section on that action for review, modification, and determination of completeness and adequacy by the responsible governmental unit. A preliminary draft environmental impact statement prepared by the project proposer and submitted to the responsible governmental unit must identify or include as an appendix all studies and other sources of information used to substantiate the analysis contained in the preliminary draft environmental impact statement. The responsible governmental unit shall require additional studies, if needed, and obtain from the project proposer all additional studies and information necessary for the responsible governmental unit to perform its responsibility to review, modify, and determine the completeness and adequacy of the environmental impact statement. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116D.04, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Project prerequisites. new text begin (a) new text end If an environmental assessment worksheet or an environmental impact statement is required for a governmental action under subdivision 2a, a project may not be started and a final governmental decision may not be made to grant a permit, approve a project, or begin a project, until: (1) a petition for an environmental assessment worksheet is dismissed; (2) a negative declaration has been issued on the need for an environmental impact statement; (3) the environmental impact statement has been determined adequate; or (4) a variance has been granted from making an environmental impact statement by the environmental quality board. new text begin (b) Nothing in this subdivision precludes a local unit of government from beginning to review a feedlot permit application for a feedlot subject to environmental review under this chapter. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116D.04, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Rules. The board shall, by January 1, 1981, promulgate rules in conformity with this chapter and the provisions of chapter 15, establishing: (1) the governmental unit which shall be responsible for environmental review of a proposed action; (2) the form and content of environmental assessment worksheets; (3) a scoping process in conformance with subdivision 2a, paragraph deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end ; (4) a procedure for identifying during the scoping process the permits necessary for a proposed action and a process for coordinating review of appropriate permits with the preparation of the environmental impact statement; (5) a standard format for environmental impact statements; (6) standards for determining the alternatives to be discussed in an environmental impact statement; (7) alternative forms of environmental review which are acceptable pursuant to subdivision 4a; (8) a model ordinance which may be adopted and implemented by local governmental units in lieu of the environmental impact statement process required by this section, providing for an alternative form of environmental review where an action does not require a state agency permit and is consistent with an applicable comprehensive plan. The model ordinance shall provide for adequate consideration of appropriate alternatives, and shall ensure that decisions are made in accordance with the policies and purposes of Laws 1980, chapter 447; (9) procedures to reduce paperwork and delay through intergovernmental cooperation and the elimination of unnecessary duplication of environmental reviews; (10) procedures for expediting the selection of consultants by the governmental unit responsible for the preparation of an environmental impact statement; and (11) any additional rules which are reasonably necessary to carry out the requirements of this section. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116D.045, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Assessment. The board must by rule adopt procedures to: (1) assess the proposer of a specific action for the responsible governmental unit's reasonable costs of preparing, reviewing, and distributing the environmental impact statement. The costs must be determined by the responsible governmental unit according to the rules adopted by the board; and (2) authorize a responsible governmental unit to allow a proposer of a specific action to prepare a draft environmental impact statement according to section 116D.04, subdivision 2a, paragraph deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end . Sec. 9. new text begin SCOPING ENVIRONMENTAL ASSESSMENT WORKSHEET NOT REQUIRED FOR PROJECTS THAT REQUIRE A MANDATORY ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT STATEMENT.new text end new text begin (a) The Environmental Quality Board must amend Minnesota Rules, part 4410.2100, as follows: new text end new text begin (1) to provide that an environmental assessment worksheet does not need to be prepared for a project that falls within a mandatory environmental impact statement category under Minnesota Rules, part 4410.4400, or other applicable law; and new text end new text begin (2) to provide that a scoping process undertaken under Minnesota Rules, part 4410.2100, must be completed no later than 280 days after the process begins. new text end new text begin (b) The board may use the good-cause exemption under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388, subdivision 1, clause (3), to adopt rules under this section, and Minnesota Statutes, section 14.386, does not apply except as provided under Minnesota Statutes, section 14.388. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin STATE IMPLEMENTATION PLAN REVISIONS.new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must seek approval from the federal Environmental Protection Agency for revisions to the state's federal Clean Air Act state implementation plan if changes are needed to reflect the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 116.07, subdivision 4a, as amended by this act. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin REPORT ON USE OF AUTHORITY TO EXTEND TIMELINE FOR CERTAIN AGENCY ACTIONS.new text end new text begin By February 15, 2028, the Board of Water and Soil Resources must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources policy on the number of extensions noticed under Minnesota Statutes, section 15.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (f), that are made for any decision under Minnesota Rules, chapter 8420, between January 1, 2026, and December 31, 2027. A local government unit must supply the board with information necessary to prepare the report required by this section. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: S2077-1 103E.067 DITCH BUFFER STRIP; ANNUAL REPORTING. The drainage authority shall annually submit a report to the Board of Water and Soil Resources for the calendar year including: (1) the number and types of actions for which viewers were appointed; (2) the number of miles of buffer strips established according to section 103E.021; (3) the number of drainage system inspections conducted; and (4) the number of violations of section 103E.021 identified and enforcement actions taken. 115A.1310 DEFINITIONS. Subdivision 1. Scope. For the purposes of sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330, the following terms have the meanings given. Subd. 2. Cathode-ray tube or CRT. "Cathode-ray tube" or "CRT" means a vacuum tube or picture tube used to convert an electronic signal into a visual image. Subd. 3. Collection. "Collection" means the aggregation of covered electronic devices from households and includes all the activities up to the time the covered electronic devices are delivered to a recycler. Subd. 4. Collector. "Collector" means a public or private entity that receives covered electronic devices from households and arranges for the delivery of the devices to a recycler. Subd. 5. Computer. "Computer" means an electronic, magnetic, optical, electrochemical, or other high-speed data processing device performing logical, arithmetic, or storage functions, but does not include an automated typewriter or typesetter, a portable handheld calculator or device, or other similar device. Subd. 6. Computer monitor. "Computer monitor" means an electronic device that is a cathode-ray tube or flat panel display primarily intended to display information from a central processing unit or the Internet. Subd. 7. Covered electronic device. "Covered electronic device" means computers, including tablet computers and laptop computers, peripherals, facsimile machines, DVD players, video cassette recorders, and video display devices that are sold to a household by means of retail, wholesale, or electronic commerce. Subd. 8. Department. "Department" means the Department of Revenue. Subd. 9. Dwelling unit. "Dwelling unit" has the meaning given in section 238.02, subdivision 21a. Subd. 10. Household. "Household" means an occupant of a single detached dwelling unit or a single unit of a multiple dwelling unit located in this state who has used a video display device at a dwelling unit primarily for personal use. Subd. 11. Manufacturer. "Manufacturer" means a person who: (1) manufactures video display devices to be sold under its own brand as identified by its own brand label; or (2) sells video display devices manufactured by others under its own brand as identified by its own brand label. Subd. 12. Peripheral. "Peripheral" means a keyboard, printer, or any other device sold exclusively for external use with a computer that provides input or output into or from a computer. Subd. 12a. Phase I recycling credits. "Phase I recycling credits" means the number of pounds of covered electronic devices recycled by a manufacturer from households during program years one through nine, less the product of the number of pounds of video display devices sold to households during the same program year, multiplied by the proportion of sales a manufacturer is required to recycle. Subd. 12b. Phase II recycling credits. "Phase II recycling credits" means an amount calculated in a program year beginning July 1, 2019, and in each program year thereafter, according to the formula (1.5 x A) - (B - C), where: A = the number of pounds of covered electronic devices a manufacturer recycled or arranged to have collected and recycled during a program year from households located outside the 11-county metropolitan area, as defined in section 115A.1314, subdivision 2; B = the manufacturer's recycling obligation calculated for the same program year in section 115A.1320, subdivision 1, paragraph (g); and C = the number of pounds of covered electronic devices a manufacturer recycled or arranged to have collected and recycled, up to but not exceeding B, during the same program year from households in the 11-county metropolitan area. Subd. 12c. Portable battery. "Portable battery" means a rechargeable battery as defined in section 115A.9157. Subd. 13. Program year. "Program year" means the period from July 1 through June 30. Subd. 14. Recycler. "Recycler" means a public or private individual or entity who accepts covered electronic devices from households and collectors for the purpose of recycling. A manufacturer who takes products for refurbishment or repair is not a recycler. Subd. 15. Recycling. "Recycling" means the process of collecting and preparing video display devices or covered electronic devices for use in manufacturing processes or for recovery of usable materials followed by delivery of such materials for use. Recycling does not include the destruction by incineration or other process or land disposal of recyclable materials nor reuse, repair, or any other process through which video display devices or covered electronic devices are returned to use for households in their original form. Subd. 17. Retailer. "Retailer" means a person who sells, rents, or leases, through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet, a video display device to a household and not for resale in any form. Subd. 18. Sell or sale. "Sell" or "sale" means any transfer for consideration of title or of the right to use, by lease or sales contract, including, but not limited to, transactions conducted through sales outlets, catalogs, or the Internet, or any other similar electronic means either inside or outside of the state, by a person who conducts the transaction and controls the delivery of a video display device to a consumer in the state, but does not include a manufacturer's or distributor's wholesale transaction with a distributor or a retailer. Subd. 19. Television. "Television" means an electronic device that is a cathode-ray tube or flat panel display primarily intended to receive video programming via broadcast, cable, or satellite transmission or video from surveillance or other similar cameras. Subd. 20. Video display device. "Video display device" means a television or computer monitor that contains a cathode-ray tube or a flat panel screen that is marketed by manufacturers for use by households. Video display device does not include any of the following: (1) a video display device that is part of a motor vehicle or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled by, or for, a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts for use in a motor vehicle; (2) a video display device, including a touch-screen display, that is functionally or physically part of a larger piece of equipment or is designed and intended for use in an industrial; commercial, including retail; library checkout; traffic control; kiosk; security, other than household security; border control; or medical setting, including diagnostic, monitoring, or control equipment; (3) a video display device that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air conditioner, dehumidifier, or air purifier; or (4) a telephone of any type. 115A.1312 REGISTRATION PROGRAM. Subdivision 1. Requirements for sale. (a) On or after September 1, 2007, a manufacturer must not sell or offer for sale or deliver to retailers for subsequent sale a new video display device unless: (1) the video display device is labeled with the manufacturer's brand, which label is permanently affixed and readily visible; and (2) the manufacturer has filed a registration with the agency, as specified in subdivision 2. (b) A retailer must not sell, offer for sale, rent, or lease a video display device unless the video display device is labeled according to this subdivision and listed as registered on the agency website according to subdivision 2. (c) A retailer is not responsible for an unlawful sale under this subdivision if the manufacturer's registration expired or was revoked and the retailer took possession of the video display device prior to the expiration or revocation of the manufacturer's registration and the unlawful sale occurred within six months after the expiration or revocation. Subd. 2. Manufacturer registration. (a) By August 15 each year, a manufacturer of video display devices sold or offered for sale to households in the state must submit a registration to the agency that includes: (1) a list of the manufacturer's brands of video display devices offered for sale in this state; (2) the name, address, and contact information of a person responsible for ensuring compliance with this chapter; and (3) a certification that the manufacturer has complied and will continue to comply with the requirements of sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1318. (b) A manufacturer of video display devices sold or offered for sale to a household must include in the registration submitted under paragraph (a), a statement disclosing whether: (1) any video display devices sold to households exceed the maximum concentration values established for lead, mercury, cadmium, hexavalent chromium, polybrominated biphenyls (PBB's), and polybrominated diphenyl ethers (PBDE's) under the RoHS (restricting the use of certain hazardous substances in electrical and electronic equipment) Directive 2002/95/EC of the European Parliament and Council and any amendments thereto; or (2) the manufacturer has received an exemption from one or more of those maximum concentration values under the RoHS Directive that has been approved and published by the European Commission. (c) A manufacturer who begins to sell or offer for sale video display devices to households after August 15, 2016, and has not filed a registration under this subdivision must submit a registration to the agency within ten days of beginning to sell or offer for sale video display devices to households. (d) A registration must be updated within ten days after a change in the manufacturer's brands of video display devices sold or offered for sale to households. (e) A registration is effective upon receipt by the agency and is valid until August 15 each year. (f) The agency must review each registration and notify the manufacturer of any information required by this section that is omitted from the registration. Within 30 days of receipt of a notification from the agency, the manufacturer must submit a revised registration providing the information noted by the agency. (g) The agency must maintain on its website the names of manufacturers and the manufacturers' brands listed in registrations filed with the agency. The agency must update the website information promptly upon receipt of a new or updated registration. The website must contain prominent language stating, in effect, that sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330 are directed at household equipment and the manufacturers' brands list is, therefore, not a list of manufacturers qualified to sell to industrial, commercial, or other markets identified as exempt from the requirements of sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330. Subd. 3. Collector registration. No person may operate as a collector of covered electronic devices from households unless that person has submitted a registration with the agency by July 15 each year on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Registration information must include the name, address, telephone number, and location of the business and a certification that the collector has complied and will continue to comply with the requirements of sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1318 and any regulations adopted by a local government unit for the jurisdiction in which the collector operates. A collector must indicate any end-of-life fees that will be charged at the collection point. A registration is effective upon receipt by the agency and is valid until July 15 each year. Subd. 4. Recycler registration. No person may recycle video display devices generated by households unless that person has submitted a registration with the agency by July 15 each year on a form prescribed by the commissioner. Registration information must include the name, address, telephone number, and location of all recycling facilities under the direct control of the recycler that may receive covered electronic devices from households and a certification that the recycler has complied and will continue to comply with the requirements of sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1318. A registered recycler must conduct recycling activities that are consistent with this chapter. A registration is effective upon receipt by the agency and is valid until July 15 each year. 115A.1314 MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION FEE. Subdivision 1. Registration fee. (a) Each manufacturer who registers under section 115A.1312 must, by August 15 each year, pay to the commissioner of revenue an annual registration fee, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner of revenue. The commissioner of revenue must deposit the fee in the state treasury and credit the fee to the environmental fund. (b) The registration fee for manufacturers that sell 100 or more video display devices to households in the state during the previous calendar year is $2,500, plus a variable recycling fee. The registration fee for manufacturers that sell fewer than 100 video display devices in the state during the previous calendar year is a variable recycling fee. The variable recycling fee is calculated according to the formula: [A - (B + C)] x D, where: A = the manufacturer's recycling obligation as determined under section 115A.1320; B = the number of pounds of covered electronic devices that a manufacturer recycled or arranged to have collected and recycled from households during the immediately preceding program year, as reported under section 115A.1316, subdivision 1; C = the number of phase I or phase II recycling credits a manufacturer elects to use to calculate the variable recycling fee; and D = the estimated per-pound cost of recycling, initially set at $0.50 per pound for manufacturers who recycle less than 50 percent of the manufacturer's recycling obligation; $0.40 per pound for manufacturers who recycle at least 50 percent but less than 90 percent of the manufacturer's recycling obligation; $0.30 per pound for manufacturers who recycle at least 90 percent but less than 100 percent of the manufacturer's recycling obligation; and $0.00 per pound for manufacturers who recycle 100 percent or more of the manufacturer's recycling obligation. (c) A manufacturer may petition the agency to waive the per-pound cost of recycling fee, element D in the formula in paragraph (b), required under this section. The agency shall direct the commissioner of revenue to waive the per-pound cost of recycling fee if the manufacturer demonstrates to the agency's satisfaction a good faith effort to meet its recycling obligation as determined under section 115A.1320. The petition must include: (1) documentation that the manufacturer has met at least 75 percent of its recycling obligation as determined under section 115A.1320; (2) a list of political subdivisions and public and private collectors with whom the manufacturer had a formal contract or agreement in effect during the previous program year to recycle or collect covered electronic devices; (3) the total amounts of covered electronic devices collected from both within and outside of the 11-county metropolitan area, as defined in subdivision 2; (4) a description of the manufacturer's best efforts to meet its recycling obligation as determined under section 115A.1320; and (5) any other information requested by the agency. (d) A manufacturer may retain phase I and phase II recycling credits to be added, in whole or in part, to the actual value of C, as reported under section 115A.1316, subdivision 2, during any succeeding program year, provided that no more than 25 percent of a manufacturer's recycling obligation A for any program year may be met with phase I and phase II recycling credits, separately or in combination, generated in a prior program year. A manufacturer may sell any portion or all of its phase I and phase II recycling credits to another manufacturer, at a price negotiated by the parties, who may use the credits in the same manner. (e) For the purpose of determining B in calculating a manufacturer's variable recycling fee using the formula under paragraph (b), starting with the program year beginning July 1, 2019, and continuing each year thereafter, the weight of covered electronic devices that a manufacturer recycled or arranged to have collected and recycled from households located outside the 11-county metropolitan area, as defined in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), is calculated at 1.5 times their actual weight. Subd. 2. Use of registration fees. (a) Registration fees may be used by the commissioner for: (1) implementing sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1330, including transfer to the commissioner of revenue to carry out the department's duties under section 115A.1320, subdivision 2, and transfer to the commissioner of administration for responsibilities under section 115A.1324; and (2) grants to counties outside the 11-county metropolitan area, as defined in paragraph (b), and to private entities that collect for recycling covered electronic devices in counties outside the 11-county metropolitan area, where the collection and recycling is consistent with the respective county's solid waste plan, for the purpose of carrying out the activities under sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1330. In awarding competitive grants under this clause, the commissioner must give preference to counties and private entities that are working cooperatively with manufacturers to help them meet their recycling obligations under section 115A.1318, subdivision 1. (b) The 11-county metropolitan area consists of the counties of Anoka, Carver, Chisago, Dakota, Hennepin, Isanti, Ramsey, Scott, Sherburne, Washington, and Wright. 115A.1316 REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. Subdivision 1. Manufacturer reporting requirements. (a) By March 1 each year, each manufacturer must report to the agency using the form prescribed: (1) the total weight of each specific model of its video display devices sold to households during the previous calendar year; and (2) either: (i) the total weight of its video display devices sold to households during the previous calendar year; or (ii) an estimate of the total weight of its video display devices sold to households during the previous calendar year, calculated by multiplying the weight of its video display devices sold nationally times the quotient of Minnesota's population divided by the national population. All manufacturers with sales of 99 or fewer video display devices to households in the state during the previous calendar year must report using the method under this item for calculating sales. A manufacturer must submit with the report required under this paragraph a description of how the information or estimate was calculated. (b) By August 15 each year, each manufacturer must report to the agency: (1) the total weight of covered electronic devices the manufacturer collected from households and recycled or arranged to have collected and recycled during the preceding program year; (2) the number of phase I and phase II recycling credits the manufacturer has purchased and sold during the preceding program year; (3) the number of phase I and phase II recycling credits possessed by the manufacturer that the manufacturer elects to use in the calculation of its variable recycling fee under section 115A.1314, subdivision 1; and (4) the number of phase I and phase II recycling credits the manufacturer retains at the beginning of the current program year. (c) Upon request of the commissioner of revenue, the agency shall provide a copy of each report to the commissioner of revenue. Subd. 2. Recycler reporting requirements. (a) By July 15 each year, a recycler of covered electronic devices must report to the agency: (1) the total weight of covered electronic devices recycled during the preceding program year and must certify that the recycler has complied with section 115A.1318, subdivision 2; (2) the weight of video display devices recycled as part of covered electronic devices recycled during the previous program year; and (3) an estimate of the weight of portable batteries and any mercury-containing lamps that are associated with the covered electronic devices managed. (b) Upon request of the commissioner of revenue, the agency shall provide a copy of each report to the commissioner of revenue. Subd. 3. Collector reporting requirements. By July 15 each year, a collector must report separately to the agency using the form prescribed by the commissioner: (1) the total pounds of covered electronic devices collected in the state; (2) a list of all recyclers to whom collectors delivered covered electronic devices; and (3) whether the collector had a contract with a recycler or manufacturer to provide pounds toward meeting a manufacturer's obligation. 115A.1318 RESPONSIBILITIES. Subdivision 1. Manufacturer responsibilities. (a) In addition to fulfilling the requirements of sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330, a manufacturer must comply with paragraphs (b) to (f). (b) A manufacturer must annually recycle or arrange for the collection and recycling of an amount of video display devices as determined by the agency in section 115A.1320, subdivision 1. A manufacturer must assume all financial responsibility associated with transporting and recycling covered electronic devices that are used to meet the manufacturer's recycling obligation determined under section 115A.1320 or that are counted as phase I or II recycling credits, including any necessary supplies. This excludes costs that are associated with receiving and aggregating covered electronic devices from households and all the activities up to the time that covered electronic devices are loaded for transport to a recycler or arranged for transportation to a recycler. (c) The obligations of a manufacturer apply only to video display devices received from households and do not apply to video display devices received from sources other than households. (d) A manufacturer must conduct and document due diligence assessments of collectors and recyclers it contracts with, including an assessment of items specified under subdivision 2. A manufacturer is responsible for maintaining, for a period of three years, documentation that all covered electronic devices recycled, partially recycled, or sent to downstream recycling operations comply with the requirements of subdivision 2. (e) A manufacturer must provide the agency with contact information for a person who can be contacted regarding the manufacturer's activities under sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1320. (f) Only the covered electronic devices that are recycled by a registered recycler that is certified by an ANSI-ASQ National Accreditation Board-accredited third-party certification body to an environmentally sound management standard are eligible to meet the manufacturer's obligation. Subd. 1a. Collector responsibilities. (a) Collection sites must be: (1) staffed; and (2) open to the public at a frequency adequate to meet the needs of the area being served. (b) A collector may limit the number of covered electronic devices or covered electronic devices by product type accepted per customer per day or per delivery at a collection site or service. (c) A collector must use only registered recyclers. Subd. 2. Recycler responsibilities. (a) As part of the report submitted under section 115A.1316, subdivision 2, a recycler must certify, except as provided in paragraph (b), that facilities that recycle covered electronic devices, including all downstream recycling operations: (1) use only registered collectors; (2) comply with all applicable health, environmental, safety, and financial responsibility regulations; (3) are licensed by all applicable governmental authorities; (4) use no prison labor to recycle video display devices; (5) possess liability insurance of not less than $1,000,000 for environmental releases, accidents, and other emergencies; (6) provide a report annually to each registered collector regarding the video display devices received from that entity; and (7) do not charge collectors for transporting, recycling, or any necessary supplies related to transporting or recycling covered electronic devices that meet a manufacturer's recycling obligation as determined under section 115A.1320, unless otherwise mutually agreed upon. (b) A nonprofit corporation that contracts with a correctional institution to refurbish and reuse donated computers in schools is exempt from paragraph (a), clauses (4) and (5). (c) Except to the extent otherwise required by law and unless agreed upon otherwise by the recycler or manufacturer, a recycler has no responsibility for any data that may be contained in a covered electronic device if an information storage device is included in the covered electronic device. Subd. 3. Retailer responsibilities. A retailer who sells new video display devices shall provide information to households describing where and how they may recycle video display devices and advising them of opportunities and locations for the convenient collection of video display devices for the purpose of recycling. This requirement may be met by providing to households the agency's toll-free number and website address. Retailers selling through catalogs or the Internet may meet this requirement by including the information in a prominent location on the retailer's website. 115A.1320 AGENCY AND DEPARTMENT DUTIES. Subdivision 1. Duties of agency. (a) The agency shall administer sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330. (b) The agency shall establish procedures for: (1) receipt and maintenance of the registration statements and certifications filed with the agency under section 115A.1312; and (2) making the statements and certifications easily available to manufacturers, retailers, and members of the public. (c) The agency shall annually review the following variables that are used to calculate a manufacturer's annual registration fee under section 115A.1314, subdivision 1: (1) the obligation-setting mechanism for manufacturers as specified under paragraph (g); (2) the estimated per-pound price of recycling covered electronic devices sold to households; and (3) the base registration fee. (d) If the agency determines that any of these values must be changed in order to improve the efficiency or effectiveness of the activities regulated under sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1330, or if the revenues exceed the amount that the agency determines is necessary, the agency shall submit recommended changes and the reasons for them to the chairs of the senate and house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over solid waste policy. (e) By May 1 each year, the agency shall publish a statewide recycling goal for all video display device waste that is the weight of all video display devices collected for recycling during each of the three most recently completed program years, excluding the most recently concluded program year, divided by two. (f) By May 1 each year, the agency shall determine each registered manufacturer's market share of video display devices to be collected and recycled based on the manufacturer's percentage share of the total weight of video display devices sold as reported to the agency under section 115A.1316, subdivision 1. (g) By May 1 each year, the agency shall provide each manufacturer with a determination of the manufacturer's share of video display devices to be collected and recycled. A manufacturer's market share of video display devices as specified in paragraph (f) is applied proportionally to the statewide recycling goal as specified in paragraph (e) to determine an individual manufacturer's recycling obligation. Upon request by the commissioner of revenue, the agency must provide the information submitted to manufacturers under this paragraph to the commissioner of revenue. (h) The agency shall provide a report to the governor and the legislature on the implementation of sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330. For each program year, the report must discuss the total weight of covered electronic devices recycled and a summary of information in the reports submitted by manufacturers and recyclers under section 115A.1316. The report must also discuss the various collection programs used by manufacturers to collect covered electronic devices; information regarding covered electronic devices that are being collected by persons other than registered manufacturers, collectors, and recyclers; and information about covered electronic devices, if any, being disposed of in landfills in this state. The report must examine which covered electronic devices, based on economic and environmental considerations, should be subject to the obligation-setting mechanism under paragraph (g). The report must include a description of enforcement actions under sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330. The agency may include in its report other information received by the agency regarding the implementation of sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1330. The report must be done in conjunction with the report required under section 115A.121. (i) The agency shall promote public participation in the activities regulated under sections 115A.1312 to 115A.1330 through public education and outreach efforts. (j) The agency shall enforce sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330 in the manner provided by sections 115.071, subdivisions 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6; and 116.072, except for those provisions enforced by the department, as provided in subdivision 2. The agency may revoke a registration of a collector or recycler found to have violated sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330. (k) The agency shall facilitate communication between counties, collection and recycling centers, and manufacturers to ensure that manufacturers are aware of video display devices available for recycling. (l) The agency shall post on its website the contact information provided by each manufacturer under section 115A.1318, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). Subd. 2. Additional duties. (a) The agency must collect the data submitted to it annually by each manufacturer on the total weight of each specific model of video display device sold to households, if provided; the total weight of video display devices sold to households; the total weight of covered electronic devices collected from households that are recycled; and data on phase I and phase II recycling credits, as required under section 115A.1316. The department must use this data to review each manufacturer's annual registration fee submitted to the department to ensure that the fee was calculated accurately. (b) The agency must estimate, for each registered manufacturer, the sales of video display devices to households during the previous program year, based on: (1) data provided by a manufacturer on sales of video display devices to households, including documentation describing how that amount was calculated and certification that the amount is accurate; or (2) if a manufacturer does not provide the data specified in clause (1), national data on sales of video display devices. The department must use the data specified in this subdivision to review each manufacturer's annual registration fee submitted to the department to ensure that the fee was calculated accurately according to the formula in section 115A.1314, subdivision 1. (c) The department must enforce section 115A.1314, subdivision 1. The audit, assessment, appeal, collection, enforcement, disclosure, and other administrative provisions of chapters 270B, 270C, and 289A that apply to the taxes imposed under chapter 297A apply to the fee imposed under section 115A.1314, subdivision 1. To enforce section 115A.1314, subdivision 1, the commissioner of revenue may grant extensions to pay, and impose and abate penalties and interest on, the fee due under section 115A.1314, subdivision 1, in the manner provided in chapters 270C and 289A as if the fee were a tax imposed under chapter 297A. (d) The department may disclose nonpublic data to the agency only when necessary for the efficient and effective administration of the activities regulated under sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330. Any data disclosed by the department to the agency retains the classification it had when in the possession of the department. 115A.1322 OTHER RECYCLING PROGRAMS. A city, county, or other public agency may not require households to use public facilities to recycle their covered electronic devices to the exclusion of other lawful programs available. Cities, counties, and other public agencies, including those awarded contracts by the agency under section 115A.1314, subdivision 2, are encouraged to work with manufacturers to assist them in meeting their recycling obligations under section 115A.1318, subdivision 1. Nothing in sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330 prohibits or restricts the operation of any program recycling covered electronic devices in addition to those provided by manufacturers or prohibits or restricts any persons from receiving, collecting, transporting, or recycling covered electronic devices, provided that those persons are registered under section 115A.1312. 115A.1323 ANTICOMPETITIVE CONDUCT. (a) A manufacturer that organizes collection or recycling under sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1322 is authorized to engage in anticompetitive conduct to the extent necessary to plan and implement its chosen organized collection or recycling system and is immune from liability under state laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade or commerce. (b) An organization of manufacturers, an individual manufacturer, and its officers, members, employees, and agents who cooperate with a political subdivision that organizes collection or recycling under this section are authorized to engage in anticompetitive conduct to the extent necessary to plan and implement the organized collection or recycling system, provided that the political subdivision actively supervises the participation of each entity. An organization, entity, or person covered by this paragraph is immune from liability under state law relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade or commerce. 115A.1324 REQUIREMENTS FOR PURCHASES BY STATE AGENCIES. (a) The Department of Administration must ensure that acquisitions of video display devices under chapter 16C are in compliance with or not subject to sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1318. (b) The solicitation documents must specify that the prospective responder is required to cooperate fully in providing reasonable access to its records and documents that evidence compliance with paragraph (a) and sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1318. (c) Any person awarded a contract under chapter 16C for purchase or lease of video display devices that is found to be in violation of paragraph (a) or sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1318 is subject to the following sanctions: (1) the contract must be voided if the commissioner of administration determines that the potential adverse impact to the state is exceeded by the benefit obtained from voiding the contract; (2) the contractor is subject to suspension and disbarment under Minnesota Rules, part 1230.1150; and (3) if the attorney general establishes that any money, property, or benefit was obtained by a contractor as a result of violating paragraph (a) or sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1318, the court may, in addition to any other remedy, order the disgorgement of the unlawfully obtained money, property, or benefit. 115A.1326 REGULATING VIDEO DISPLAY DEVICES. If the United States Environmental Protection Agency adopts regulations under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act regarding the handling, storage, or treatment of any type of video display device being recycled, those regulations are automatically effective in this state on the same date and supersede any rules previously adopted by the agency regarding the handling, storage, or treatment of all video display devices being recycled. 115A.1328 MULTISTATE IMPLEMENTATION. The agency and department are authorized to participate in the establishment of a regional multistate organization or compact to assist in carrying out the requirements of this chapter. 115A.1330 LIMITATIONS. Sections 115A.1310 to 115A.1330 expire if a federal law, or combination of federal laws, take effect that is applicable to all video display devices sold in the United States and establish a program for the collection and recycling or reuse of video display devices that is applicable to all video display devices discarded by households. 115A.9155 DISPOSING OF CERTAIN DRY CELL BATTERIES. Subdivision 1. Prohibition. A person may not place in mixed municipal solid waste a dry cell battery containing mercuric oxide electrode, silver oxide electrode, nickel-cadmium, or sealed lead-acid that was purchased for use or used by a government agency, or an industrial, communications, or medical facility. Subd. 2. Manufacturer responsibility. (a) A manufacturer of batteries subject to subdivision 1 shall: (1) ensure that a system for the proper collection, transportation, and processing of waste batteries exists for purchasers in Minnesota; and (2) clearly inform each final purchaser of the prohibition on disposal of waste batteries and of the system or systems for proper collection, transportation, and processing of waste batteries available to the purchaser. (b) To ensure that a system for the proper collection, transportation, and processing of waste batteries exists, a manufacturer shall: (1) identify collectors, transporters, and processors for the waste batteries and contract or otherwise expressly agree with a person or persons for the proper collection, transportation, and processing of the waste batteries; or (2) accept waste batteries returned to its manufacturing facility. (c) At the time of sale of a battery subject to subdivision 1, a manufacturer shall provide in a clear and conspicuous manner a telephone number that the final consumer of the battery can call to obtain information on specific procedures to follow in returning the battery for recycling or proper disposal. The manufacturer may include the telephone number and notice of return procedures on an invoice or other transaction document held by the purchaser. The manufacturer shall provide the telephone number to the commissioner of the agency. (d) A manufacturer shall ensure that the cost of proper collection, transportation, and processing of the waste batteries is included in the sales transaction or agreement between the manufacturer and any purchaser. (e) A manufacturer that has complied with this subdivision is not liable under subdivision 1 for improper disposal by a person other than the manufacturer of waste batteries. 115A.9157 RECHARGEABLE BATTERIES AND PRODUCTS. Subdivision 1. Definition. For the purpose of this section, "rechargeable battery" means a sealed nickel-cadmium battery, a sealed lead acid battery, or any other rechargeable battery, except a rechargeable battery governed by section 115A.9155 or exempted by the commissioner under subdivision 9. Subd. 2. Prohibition. Effective August 1, 1991, a person may not place in mixed municipal solid waste a rechargeable battery, a rechargeable battery pack, a product with a nonremovable rechargeable battery, or a product powered by rechargeable batteries or rechargeable battery pack, from which all batteries or battery packs have not been removed. Subd. 3. Collection and management costs. A manufacturer of rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries is responsible for the costs of collecting and managing its waste rechargeable batteries and waste products to ensure that the batteries are not part of the solid waste stream. Subd. 5. Collection and management programs. (a) By September 20, 1995, the manufacturers or their representative organization shall implement permanent programs, based on the results of the pilot projects required in Minnesota Statutes 1994, section 115A.9157, subdivision 4, that may be reasonably expected to collect 90 percent of the waste rechargeable batteries and the participating manufacturers' products powered by rechargeable batteries that are generated in the state. The batteries and products collected must be recycled or otherwise managed or disposed of properly. (b) In every odd-numbered year after 1995, each manufacturer or a representative organization shall provide information to the senate and house of representatives committees having jurisdiction over environment and natural resources and environment and natural resources finance that specifies at least the estimated amount of rechargeable batteries subject to this section sold in the state by each manufacturer and the amount of batteries each collected during the previous two years. A representative organization may report the amounts in aggregate for all the members of the organization. Subd. 6. List of participants. A manufacturer or its representative organization shall inform the committees listed in subdivision 5 when they begin participating in the projects and programs and immediately if they withdraw participation. Subd. 7. Contracts. A manufacturer or a representative organization of manufacturers may contract with the state or a political subdivision to provide collection services under this section. The manufacturer or organization shall fully reimburse the state or political subdivision for the value of any contractual services rendered under this subdivision. Subd. 8. Anticompetitive conduct. A manufacturer or organization of manufacturers and its officers, members, employees, and agents who participate in projects or programs to collect and properly manage waste rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries are immune from liability under state law relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade or commerce for activities related to the collection and management of batteries and products required under this section. Subd. 9. Exemptions. To ensure that new types of batteries do not add additional hazardous or toxic materials to the mixed municipal solid waste stream, the commissioner of the agency may exempt a new type of rechargeable battery from the requirements of this section if it poses no unreasonable hazard when placed in and processed or disposed of as part of a mixed municipal solid waste. 115A.961 HOUSEHOLD BATTERIES; COLLECTION, PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL. Subdivision 1. Definition. For the purposes of this section, "household batteries" means disposable or rechargeable dry cells commonly used as power sources for household or consumer products including, but not limited to, nickel-cadmium, alkaline, mercuric oxide, silver oxide, zinc oxide, lithium, and carbon-zinc batteries, but excluding lead acid batteries. Subd. 2. Program. (a) The commissioner, in consultation with other state agencies, political subdivisions, and representatives of the household battery industry, may develop household battery programs. The commissioner must coordinate the programs with the Legislative-Citizen Commission on Minnesota Resources study on batteries. (b) The commissioner shall investigate options and develop guidelines for collection, processing, and disposal of household batteries. The options the commissioner may investigate include: (1) establishing a grant program for counties to plan and implement household battery collection, processing, and disposal projects; (2) establishing collection and transportation systems; (3) developing and disseminating educational materials regarding environmentally sound battery management; and (4) developing markets for materials recovered from the batteries. (c) The commissioner may also distribute funds to political subdivisions to develop battery management plans and implement those plans. Subd. 3. Participation. A political subdivision, on its own or in cooperation with others, may implement a program to collect, process, or dispose of household batteries. A political subdivision may provide financial incentives to any person, including public or private civic groups, to collect the batteries. 116C.04 POWERS AND DUTIES. Subd. 11. Coordination. The Environmental Quality Board shall coordinate the implementation of an interagency compliance with existing state and federal lead regulations and report to the legislature by January 31, 1992, on the changes in programs needed to comply. 116C.991 ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW; SILICA SAND PROJECTS. (a) Until a final rule is adopted pursuant to Laws 2013, chapter 114, article 4, section 105, paragraph (d), an environmental assessment worksheet must be prepared for any silica sand project that meets or exceeds the following thresholds, unless the project meets or exceeds the thresholds for an environmental impact statement under rules of the Environmental Quality Board and an environmental impact statement must be prepared: (1) excavates 20 or more acres of land to a mean depth of ten feet or more during its existence. The local government is the responsible governmental unit; or (2) is designed to store or is capable of storing more than 7,500 tons of silica sand or has an annual throughput of more than 200,000 tons of silica sand and is not required to receive a permit from the Pollution Control Agency. The Pollution Control Agency is the responsible governmental unit. (b) In addition to the contents required under statute and rule, an environmental assessment worksheet completed according to this section must include: (1) a hydrogeologic investigation assessing potential groundwater and surface water effects and geologic conditions that could create an increased risk of potentially significant effects on groundwater and surface water; (2) for a project with the potential to require a groundwater appropriation permit from the commissioner of natural resources, an assessment of the water resources available for appropriation; (3) an air quality impact assessment that includes an assessment of the potential effects from airborne particulates and dust; (4) a traffic impact analysis, including documentation of existing transportation systems, analysis of the potential effects of the project on transportation, and mitigation measures to eliminate or minimize adverse impacts; (5) an assessment of compatibility of the project with other existing uses; and (6) mitigation measures that could eliminate or minimize any adverse environmental effects for the project. 116D.04 ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT STATEMENTS. Subd. 5b. Review of environmental assessment worksheets and environmental impact statements. By December 1, 2018, and every three years thereafter, the Environmental Quality Board, Pollution Control Agency, Department of Natural Resources, and Department of Transportation, after consultation with political subdivisions, shall submit to the governor and the chairs of the house of representatives and senate committees having jurisdiction over environment and natural resources a list of mandatory environmental assessment worksheet and mandatory environmental impact statement categories for which the agency or a political subdivision is designated as the responsible government unit, and for each worksheet or statement category, a document including: (1) intended historical purposes of the category; (2) whether projects that fall within the category are also subject to local, state, or federal permits; and (3) an analysis of and recommendations for whether the mandatory category should be modified, eliminated, or unchanged based on its intended outcomes and relationship to existing permits or other federal, state, or local laws or ordinances. 325E.125 GENERAL AND SPECIAL PURPOSE BATTERY REQUIREMENTS. Subdivision 1. Labeling. (a) The manufacturer of a button cell battery that is to be sold in this state shall ensure that each battery contains no intentionally introduced mercury or is labeled to clearly identify for the final consumer of the battery the type of electrode used in the battery. (b) The manufacturer of a rechargeable battery that is to be sold in this state shall ensure that each rechargeable battery is labeled to clearly identify for the final consumer of the battery the type of electrode and the name of the manufacturer. The manufacturer of a rechargeable battery shall also provide clear instructions for properly recharging the battery. Subd. 2. Mercury content. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (c), a manufacturer may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state an alkaline manganese battery that contains more than 0.025 percent mercury by weight. (b) On application, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency may exempt a specific type of battery from the requirements of paragraph (a) or (d) if there is no battery meeting the requirements that can be reasonably substituted for the battery for which the exemption is sought. A battery exempted by the commissioner under this paragraph is subject to the requirements of section 115A.9155, subdivision 2. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a manufacturer may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state a button cell nonrechargeable battery not subject to paragraph (a) that contains more than 25 milligrams of mercury. (d) A manufacturer may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state a dry cell battery containing a mercuric oxide electrode. (e) After January 1, 1996, a manufacturer may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state an alkaline manganese battery, except an alkaline manganese button cell, that contains mercury unless the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency determines that compliance with this requirement is not technically and commercially feasible. Subd. 2a. Approval of new batteries. A manufacturer may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state a nonrechargeable battery other than a zinc air, zinc carbon, silver oxide, lithium, or alkaline manganese battery, without first having received approval of the battery from the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency. The commissioner shall approve only batteries that comply with subdivision 1 and do not pose an undue hazard when disposed of. This subdivision is intended to ensure that new types of batteries do not add additional hazardous or toxic materials to the state's mixed municipal waste stream. Subd. 3. Rechargeable tools and appliances. (a) A manufacturer may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state a rechargeable consumer product unless: (1) the battery can be easily removed by the consumer or is contained in a battery pack that is separate from the product and can be easily removed; and (2) the product and the battery are both labeled in a manner that is clearly visible to the consumer indicating that the battery must be recycled or disposed of properly and the battery must be clearly identifiable as to the type of electrode used in the battery. (b) "Rechargeable consumer product" as used in this subdivision means any product that contains a rechargeable battery and is primarily used or purchased to be used for personal, family, or household purposes. (c) On application by a manufacturer, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency may exempt a rechargeable consumer product from the requirements of paragraph (a) if: (1) the product cannot be reasonably redesigned and manufactured to comply with the requirements prior to the effective date of Laws 1990, chapter 409, section 2; (2) the redesign of the product to comply with the requirements would result in significant danger to public health and safety; or (3) the type of electrode used in the battery poses no unreasonable hazards when placed in and processed or disposed of as part of mixed municipal solid waste. (d) An exemption granted by the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency under paragraph (c), clause (1), must be limited to a maximum of two years and may be renewed. Subd. 4. Rechargeable batteries and products; notice. (a) A person who sells rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries governed by section 115A.9157 at retail shall post the notice in paragraph (b) in a manner clearly visible to a consumer making purchasing decisions. (b) The notice must be at least four inches by six inches and state: "ATTENTION USERS OF RECHARGEABLE BATTERIES AND CORDLESS PRODUCTS: Under Minnesota law, manufacturers of rechargeable batteries, rechargeable battery packs, and products powered by nonremovable rechargeable batteries will provide a special collection system for these items by April 15, 1994. It is illegal to put rechargeable batteries in the garbage. Use the special collection system that will be provided in your area. Take care of our environment. DO NOT PUT RECHARGEABLE BATTERIES OR PRODUCTS POWERED BY NONREMOVABLE RECHARGEABLE BATTERIES IN THE GARBAGE." (c) Notice is not required for home solicitation sales, as defined in section 325G.06, or for catalogue sales. Subd. 5. Prohibitions. A manufacturer of rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries that does not participate in the pilot projects and programs required in section 115A.9157 may not sell, distribute, or offer for sale in this state rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries after January 1, 1992. After January 1, 1992, a person who first purchases rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries for importation into the state for resale may not purchase rechargeable batteries or products powered by rechargeable batteries made by any person other than a manufacturer that participates in the projects and programs required under section 115A.9157. 325E.1251 PENALTY ENFORCEMENT. Subdivision 1. Penalty. Violation of section 325E.125 is a misdemeanor. A manufacturer who violates section 325E.125 is also subject to a minimum fine of $100 per violation. Subd. 2. Recovery of costs. Section 325E.125 may be enforced under section 115.071. In an enforcement action under this section in which the state prevails, the state may recover reasonable administrative expenses, court costs, and attorney fees incurred to take the enforcement action, in an amount to be determined by the court.